
Julie Johnston is what I would call a loud central defender, as far as how she tackles and how she plays - you notice her. And you notice her in a positive way. She's a destroyer. She interrupts plays and tackles the crap out of people. That's a very visual thing.
Becky Sauerbrunn
 
   
Getting elected Governor of New Mexico, I really did enjoy that job. I thought I made a really big difference, and I think the same running for president of the United States - that I could make a really big, positive difference.
Gary Johnson
 
   
A lasting solution to this problem will have an exceptionally positive influence foremost on the peoples of Palestine and Israel, as well as on the region and the international community.
Recep Tayyip Erdogan
 
   
So many of our young women today, they're growing up without a father, but they're still thirsty for that and desiring positive male love.
Hill Harper
 
   
Whenever there's an opportunity to celebrate the written word and celebrate the folks that read the written word, and, I think, to encourage other writers to write and encourage folks to read more and get connected to it in a personal way, it's a positive thing.
Hill Harper
 
   

'Fortnite' has, I think, the most positive gamer community that's ever emerged from a game at this scale. I think it's partly because of the great community and partly because of the tone set by the game.
Tim Sweeney
 
   
We all go through things in life, and it's just how you deal with it. Try to stay positive throughout the worst.
Phil Heath
 
   
Write down everything you feel about money - 'I love you;' 'I wish I had more of you;' 'I don't trust you;' - Then, look at the ones that aren't quite so pretty and figure out how you can shift them to be in a more positive, grateful space.
Jen Sincero
 
   
The two things I was positive about in life were that I was going to be a teacher at a boarding school or an operative with the CIA posted abroad. I could write a book about all the things I was sure about.
Tucker Carlson
 
   

The rapid growth of prenatal testing has had some undeniably positive effects: A woman who knows she will bear a child with a handicap can plan to deliver in a hospital equipped for risky births. And many couples prefer the opportunity to prepare psychologically for the work of raising a disabled child.
Tucker Carlson
 
   
When people who are close to me say that they see positive changes in me as I grow, it makes me work harder on myself. Life always surprises us with something new, and I want to be capable enough to handle it.
Harshvardhan Rane
 
   

One day, I went to meet a film producer and entered the wrong flat. It was a casting agency, and they suggested that I audition for a four-hero Telugu film. I was confirmed a month later. Interestingly, it's not easy down South for a newcomer to bag positive roles, but I was adamant.
Harshvardhan Rane
 
   
I believe that anyone who chooses a path and keeps walking will find a positive result some day. I didn't want to go with the flow and do any kind of film that came my way and wind up my career swiftly.
Harshvardhan Rane
 
   
People look up to me as somebody who is able to switch the image of our country from negative to positive.
Novak Djokovic
 
   
Everyone has things that they don't love about themselves but I think that as a woman its much healthier and more positive to focus on your good parts and the things you like about yourself, not pick yourself apart.
Miranda Kerr
 
   
I have done 'Sports Illustrated,' but I don't regret it because it portrayed me in a positive way - as an athlete.
Alex Morgan
 
   

There's those young girls that I once was, looking up to Mia Hamm, Christine Lilly, all those players, and I know how much of an effect they had on me. Knowing that, I feel like I'm in a position where I can really help be a positive influence in girls' lives.
Alex Morgan
 
   
I think it's important to keep things positive. Sometimes you don't win, and that sucks, and you work on improving.
Alex Morgan
 
   
My size is a huge part of me. You just have to appreciate those kinds of things. So I wasn't born with long legs - who cares. You just have to embrace it. Being body positive is really important to your overall happiness.
Sabrina Carpenter
 
   
Being body positive is really important to your overall happiness. It's hard to see someone with a 'perfect' body and be like, 'Why can't I be like her?' But that person was born to be who she is, and you're born to be who you are.
Sabrina Carpenter
 
   
I work so hard to make that sure I'm successful. If you're positive and really excited and enthusiastic about what you're doing, it's going to happen, and it's going to happen big time.
Shawn Mendes
 
   

It's extremely important just to keep things positive and happy as much as we can... I think it's important that singers, actors, or whatever use our voice to spread positive messages as much as we possibly can.
Shawn Mendes
 
   
Haiti, if you've ever met a Haitian person, they are just really positive, and literally, if you're friends with them, then they will do anything for you. So I think that's something that is, like, a really good trait, and I'm really happy that my grandparents and my dad's side of the family is like that.
Naomi Osaka
 
   
You know what? I'm not always in a positive, happy place. But I'm able to concentrate enough to come up with a really good song.
Brian Wilson
 
   
The first thing successful people do is view failure as a positive signal to success.
Brendon Burchard
 
   
Talking about income inequality, even if you're not on the Forbes 400 list, can make us feel uncomfortable. It feels less positive, less optimistic, to talk about how the pie is sliced than to think about how to make the pie bigger.
Chrystia Freeland
 
   

The main point of democracy is to deliver positive results for the majority.
Chrystia Freeland
 
   
The thing that lies at the foundation of positive change, the way I see it, is service to a fellow human being.
Lech Walesa
 
   
Food culture is like listening to the Beatles - it's international, it's very positive, it's inventive and creative.
Alice Waters
 
   
If we want children to learn to tend the land and nourish themselves and have conversations at the table, we need to communicate with them in ways that are positive.
Alice Waters
 
   
How do you nurture a positive attitude when all the statistics say you're a dead man? You go to work.
Patrick Swayze
 
   

Lotteries are just one way to provide positive reinforcement. Their power comes from the fact that the chance of winning the prize is overvalued.
Richard Thaler
 
   
I have to stay positive and try to find time to do what I want to do while working at the same time.
Lee Min-ho
 
   
I see everything as a positive that can only help me.
Fred Armisen
 
   
Among many of my friends and acquaintances, I seem to be one of the very few individuals who felt or feels no ambivalence about my mother. All my feelings for my mother were positive, very strong and abiding.
Joyce Carol Oates
 
   

Fan Luv is a powerful positive movement. All over the world they come. It's a force of luv.
DJ Khaled
 
   
I've been blessed to be somebody that's been climbing that success mountain top for years of hard work, you know, but now it's all connecting. And now, the whole world is watching, you know what I'm saying, and it feels good 'cause it's good energy. This is all positive vibes, and good vibes and good energy, so it feels incredible.
DJ Khaled
 
   

I feel ups and downs are a part of one's career, and this totally depends on how you take it. You can either be knocked down by the negative things, or you can take it in a positive way and learn from it.
Deepika Padukone
 
   
The ferment and viability in any society is directly proportionate to the number of people actively living their ideas. This is not positive thinking - it is positive action: the spirit of experiment.
Marilyn Ferguson
 
   
Obviously social media has had a massive impact on the fame game, but not in a positive way. But it can be for some.
Margot Robbie
 
   
I met with my spiritual teacher and went to a therapist. I realized that if I came from a positive place, not only will everyone feel better and I will feel happier, but the company will work better.
Adam Neumann
 
   
I'm a positive man.
Mariano Rivera
 

When we try to make a car that drives itself, we believe - whether we're right or not - we believe that there would be strong net positive benefit to the world if cars could drive themselves safer than people could.
Astro Teller
 
   
If I have affected someone in a positive way, that means a lot to me.
Bill Parcells
 
   
On the field, aggression can sometimes be a positive emotion. It boosts performance and can lift your game. But over the years, I have learnt that restrained aggression is a better animal. That way, you will conserve your energy and won't spend yourself quickly.
Virat Kohli
 
   
Positive, healthy, loving relationships in your twenties... I don't know if anyone would disagree with it: I think they're the exception, not the norm. People are either playing house really aggressively because they're scared of what an uncertain time it is, or they're avoiding commitment altogether.
Lena Dunham
 
   
Most of the people I know who work out seriously do so because they have such an amazing outlook on life. To be who I want to be, I'm going to work out to be more positive, more active. It's proactive.
John Krasinski
 
   

Unilever, Nestle and SAB Miller are all taking a long-term approach to investing in sustainable resource consumption. Each is driving through better resource management, which is expected to yield positive returns in the future.
Jacob Rothschild
 
   
Normally you hear about Southeast London, and you hear about all the stuff that goes on down there, all the negative things, and the tabloids kind of stay away from all the positive things that happen that I see every day, which kind of outshines the negative.
John Boyega
 
   
It's also a question of finding good material and interesting roles. I'm not the only actress out there, and good parts just don't fall into your lap that easily. But I like most of the films I've made recently and so I'm pretty positive about the future.
Winona Ryder
 
   
I'm very conscious of my body, and how I take care of it. I like clean foods, drink a lot of water, and soak up much sunlight and positive energy as I can.
Princess Nokia
 
   
My work is still very much light-hearted, positive outlook, laugh at yourself. But it isn't going to be the laugh-a-minute kind of thing that my early work was.
Tom Bodett
 
   

I am positive I was not a neglected child. I remember reading 'The Jungle Book' and 'The Sleeping Beauty.'
Keri Russell
 
   
I'm part of the mushball middle. I consider 'confused' the majority position because, thankfully, most people would rather be uncertain some of the time than 100% positive all the time - even when they're wrong.
Al Franken
 
   
No matter what nationalities became a part of our country in the future, they would have to assimilate into the Han nationality. The nationalism our party supports is a positive nationalism. Do not forget that.
Sun Yat-sen
 
   
I'm really careful about not slamming my politics home in my shows, but I don't try to hide, either. The arts can be a great way to bring people together. I don't preach from the stage. I try to stay positive on solutions.
Bonnie Raitt
 
   
There's a certain darkness to Slipknot, but at the same time, there's a very strong dose of positivity. Stone Sour is the same way. There's a certain melancholy that comes with the slower stuff, but at the end of the day there's also that other side that is very positive. It's all how you deliver.
Corey Taylor
 
   

If I can be some kind of vessel to show people that, no matter the hard time you experienced, you can still succeed, I want to put out that positive energy to never quit and never give up.
Brian Banks
 
   
For me, I just want to be positive.
Brian Banks
 
  
Engaging in social business is beneficial to a company because it leverages on business competencies to address social issues, involves one-time investment with sustainable results, and produces other positive effects such as employee motivation and improved organizational culture.
Muhammad Yunus
 
   
I get nostalgic for British negativity. There is an inherent hope and positive drive to New Yorkers. When you go back to Britain, everybody is just running everything down. It's like whatever the opposite of a hug is.
John Oliver
 
   

There is an inherent hope and positive drive to New Yorkers.
John Oliver
 
   
When we're on stage doing a song about positive body image or another about female empowerment, everyone out there is super into it and right there with us. It's been awesome. I feel like we fit right in.
Lizzo
 
   

Frankly speaking, if I care what people write, whether it is positive or negative, I believe, personally, I'm on the wrong path.
John McLaughlin
 
   
Pride is tough. You go to high school, and its 'pride,' 'courage;' it's all these types of words that we use to motivate us. I don't think there's anywhere in the Scriptures through the saints' lives where pride was ever a positive characteristic of anybody.
Troy Polamalu
 
   
I've never really been aware of what is said about me, whether it's positive or negative. I ignore it. I've always had the mind-set: 'No one can challenge me better than myself.'
Troy Polamalu
 
   
The response from the beginning has been really, really wonderful and positive. People have always really responded to me talking about mental health.
Lili Reinhart
 
   
It's human nature that if you get 20 positive comments and one negative one, you're going to focus on the negative. We all do that. It can be something that drags you down. It's easy to get bogged down with it, but I try to concentrate on the good things.
Bindi Irwin
 
   

I'm proud of Jay Z's success and Kanye's success. Inside, I feel like I had something to do with their success... I don't have anything but positive things to say.
Damon Dash
 
   
It comes down to building your own world out here on the road. It's who you surround yourself with. My band and crew are really positive guys.
Brad Paisley
 
   
The issue is sometimes when people are themselves, like, what if you suck, you know? There's a good chance you're not gonna resonate and not be relatable to people. You gotta be a goodhearted, positive person. And a lot of YouTubers I've met anyways are.
Logan Paul
 
   
Conserving energy and thus saving money, reducing consumption of unnecessary products and packaging and shifting to a clean-energy economy would likely hurt the bottom line of polluting industries, but would undoubtedly have positive effects for most of us.
David Suzuki
 
   
I've learned that to survive, you need a positive state of mind.
Thalia
 
   

I've always been able to transform happiness and pain and sorrow and tears into positive energy.
Thalia
 
   
I was incarcerated for a little while in Baltimore, and my celly was Muslim. I was watching him pray every day, and his outlook on getting out of that situation was a lot more positive than the other dudes that were Muslim in the jail.
Dave East
 
   
I believe in the imperative to explore, so any project that I can be involved with that celebrates that, and expands people's imagination around that idea of pushing out, is one of the most positive things that I think I could be involved with.
Ron Howard
 
   
Slavery, if it can be legalized at all, can be legalized only by positive legislation. Natural law gives it no aid. Custom imparts to it no legal sanction.
Lysander Spooner
 
   
I look at all the ingredients of a film and say, 'Is this a positive thing that I'm putting into the world? Is there honor and respect in the way the story is being told about them? And would they approve of that?'
Jessica Chastain
 
   

I have a very positive attitude in life. My insecurity, fear and need to know about tomorrow has fortunately eased. What is going to happen will happen anyway. So why break my head over it?
Katrina Kaif
 
   
'Yes' is the mother of all positive words, next to 'love.' Maybe 'love' is the father of all positive words.
Jason Mraz
 
   
When you think positively, you attract positive people. If I'm on a mission to be successful, and I'm positive all the time, then more positive people will come around me, and we'll help each other. If you're negative, you'll find yourself surrounded by negative people.
Astro
 
   
I'm very positive - music-wise, production-wise and life-wise.
Martin Garrix
 
Facing the press is not easy, but because you have to go, you have to try to take a lot of positive things for yourself from these face-to-face meetings.
Jose Mourinho
 
   

If you don't find time to meditate and get all that negative out, and if you don't have the right people being positive around you, this is a very scary job to have if you don't learn how to control your fear.
Nick Diaz
 
   
Studies show that children of divorced parents can have outcomes as positive as those coming from intact homes, provided the father remains financially supportive and active in his children's lives.
Larry Elder
 
   
I choose to focus on the positive.
Halima Aden
 
 
I learned about being positive from my parents. They're the most positive people I've ever known.
Brendon Urie
 
   

I don't really remember, but I'm positive that whenever I cried, my mother gave me something to eat. I'm sure that whenever I had a fight with the little girl next door, or it was raining and I couldn't go out, or I wasn't invited to a birthday party, my mother gave me a piece of candy to make me feel better.
Jean Nidetch
 
   
Muhammad Ali was hated, and then he was loved at the very end. Floyd Mayweather was hated, and a lot of people are really coming around on him. So, I'm just trying to stay positive and try not to offend too many people along the way and hope for the best end result.
Jon Jones
 
   

Things can go away just like that. You got to be always respectful and nice and positive.
Rich Brian
 
   
I think that politics could be a positive thing. My beef is that people focus on the personal aspect of a politician too much. They should focus on the results.
LL Cool J
 
   
I think fitness is important. I think a healthy lifestyle is important. I think putting positive energy out there is important and just staying connected with the people.
LL Cool J
 
   
I'm the kind of person who likes to hang out and observe what's going on in the streets, or in certain places. I used to do that a lot. But having to become an international superstar, I can't do that comfortably! But it's all positive, you know.
Jimmy Cliff
 
   
I don't just want a better deal for Britain. I want a better deal for Europe too. So I speak as British prime minister with a positive vision for the future of the European Union. A future in which Britain wants, and should want, to play a committed and active part.
David Cameron
 
   

America needs a strong, rational, positive, practical conservative movement. It needs that bulwark against liberal delusion and hubris. It needs a voice that says we are imperfect, that life is complex, that government can create need even as it meets need, that you can't fix everything, and freedom is worth some danger and sorrow.
Jon Lovett
 
   
In nicey-nicey land, you must be happy-clappy and positive all the time - bad news is taboo.
Michael Leunig
 
   
While positive mental states may be associated with less stress and more resilience to infection, positive well-being might also be accompanied by a healthy lifestyle.
Michael Greger
 
   
It's so essential to happiness to speak your truth out loud - because this sharing of your core pain is what creates a necessary healing shift - from negative beliefs about the world - to positive beliefs - and frees you up to be able to fully view life with meaning, purpose and connection with others.
Karen Salmansohn
 
   
A lot of people love to do affirmations first thing in the morning - to keep themselves feeling peppy and positive.
Karen Salmansohn
 
   

I'm a big believer in the power of visualizations. And so are neuroscientists. Numerous studies have proven how merely imagining positive circumstances sends blood flowing from negative brain regions to positive ones.
Karen Salmansohn
 
   
That first snowdrop, the flowering of the rose you pruned, a lettuce you grew from seed, the robin singing just for you. These are smallthings but all positive, all healing in a way that medicine tries to mimic.
Monty Don
 
   
Those at the top would do better with a smaller share of a booming economy that elicits a positive politics than they will do with an ever-larger share of an anemic economy that fuels the politics of anger.
Robert Reich
 
   
I would say that engineering has been a very positive experience overall, but usually coming into the situation it would be one of being underestimated. People would actually have low expectations. But I would take advantage of it quite honestly, because I would take my time to underestimate the situation.
Lonnie Johnson
 
   
I'm into crystals and good energy and harnessing more. It's just like prayer. It helps you be grateful, think about good things, and keep that positive energy around you.
Kali Uchis
 
   

Anytime you get an opportunity to put more fun into the game, that's good. I've got a lot of positive energy.
Antonio Brown
 
   
I have learned that champions aren't just born; champions can be made when they embrace and commit to life-changing positive habits.
Lewis Howes
 
   
Staying consistent with positive habits can be a challenge.
Lewis Howes
 
   
Kids are absolutely starved for positive adult contact.
Richard Louv
 
   
If war occurs, that positive adult contact in every shape is needed more than ever. It will be a matter of emotional life and death. There's not a handy one-minute way of talking to your kid about war.
Richard Louv
 
   

Being able to jump off a swing is actually a useful and meaningful thing for a child to do... those are the tests that help us understand the limits of our body. That's a positive learning experience that we deny children on a regular basis.
Gever Tulley
 
   
Since turning professional at 18, I have travelled the world playing the game that I love and consider myself a global player. As the World No.1 right now, I wish to be a positive role model and a sportsperson that people respect, and enjoy watching.
Rory McIlroy
 
   
I like to think of myself as a positive person. Otherwise I wouldn't have had a child.
Grace Jones
 
   
'Grease' changed my life in the most amazing way, and I've had such an amazing life. When things go wrong, you've got to believe you will get through them and focus on the positive things in your life.
Olivia Newton-John
 
   

Dedicating some time to meditation is a meaningful expression of caring for yourself that can help you move through the mire of feeling unworthy of recovery. As your mind grows quieter and more spacious, you can begin to see self-defeating thought patterns for what they are, and open up to other, more positive options.
Sharon Salzberg
 
   
A good part of my leadership skills is crafted from learning from experiences early in my career that were not positive experiences.
John Lasseter
 
   

We're going to be human, and we are going to make mistakes, but you really should understand the power that you have and embrace it in a positive way.
Drake Bell
 
   
I hate banks. They do nothing positive for anybody except take care of themselves. They're first in with their fees and first out when there's trouble.
Earl Warren
 
   
In Seattle, I've talked about how Pete Carroll is such... I'm kind of surprised at the variety of styles that successful coaches can have. Some are very communicative and positive and energized - like, Pete Carroll has all that in spades. Some of them are more cerebral; some are more directive.
Paul Allen
 
   
Food is kind of my entry card into everything. Food kind of opens the doors... because food is peace. It's good; it's positive.
Lidia Bastianich
 
   
It's in the nature of Italians to live life with a positive tone and to celebrate the invitations that come along in life. Italian food is so conducive to all of that.
Lidia Bastianich
 
   

For the liberal state to accommodate a diversity of beliefs while having few positive convictions is one of the more admirable achievements of civilization.
Terry Eagleton
 
   
I always say just stay positive. If you ever get down on yourself, try to find something that takes away that negative. Always find that positive area.
Kane Brown
 
   
I feel like I should show people that no matter where you come from - you can get beat by your stepdad, if you get picked on for your clothes and having no money - I just feel like everyone should know it will be all right as long as you keep focusing on trying to move forward and looking at the positive things in life.
Kane Brown
 
   
I believe in human-centered AI to benefit people in positive and benevolent ways.
Fei-Fei Li
 
   
I am blood type O-positive, which I remember by staying 'optimistic positive.'
Michael Weatherly
 
   

You have to be positive, and I'm not just talking about athletics, this also applies to life.
Sheryl Swoopes
 
   
UKIP believe that immigration can be an extremely positive thing. But it has to be controlled.
Nigel Farage
 
   
What is important is to have a positive intent right from the start, and positive intent doesn't always mean looking for the big shots. Positive intention when it comes to defending a ball or looking for a single.
MS Dhoni
 
   
What we have seen is that sports is definitely developing in India. I can see a lot of positive things happening in India. It may take a bit more time, but with proper guidance and people having passion for sports, I don't think we are far away from becoming a good sporting nation.
MS Dhoni
 
   
Getting beaten is sometimes a good thing. If you're a positive person, you can turn it around and make it into a good thing.
Naseem Hamed
 
   

There is slow growth, but it is positive slow growth. At the same time, ratios of debt-to-incomes go down. That's a beautiful deleveraging.
Ray Dalio
 
   
If you look just at the decades after 1934, you know it's hard to point to really inspired and positive support from outside of Haiti, to Haiti, and much easier to point to either small-minded or downright mean-spirited policies.
Paul Farmer
 
   
You know I think that going into therapy is a very positive thing, and talking about it is really helpful, because the more you talk the more your fears fade, because you get it out.
Fran Drescher
 
   
My mom is the most positive person. She has always had a smile on her face no matter what came her way. After seeing that, I'm not going to let a little cellulite get in the way of my happiness!
Ashley Graham
 
   
I had to overcome bullies and other people who didn't like me and tormented me. I overcame those things with positive affirmations and setting goals. When I would set goals, I wouldn't let anything get in the way of me breaking them. As I found success, a lot of those things subsided and became less important.
Jake Paul
 
   

There is something in even the darkest situations that we can make a positive in our lives.
Deborah Norville
 
   
Children may not notice the positive moments in life unless we point them out to them.
Deborah Norville
 
   
I'm a positive person who likes to have fun and get the best out of every day.
Eddie the Eagle
 
   
I've never really let any kind of negative things affect me, generally. I would take a positive out of the most desperately horrible situation.
Eddie the Eagle
 
   

Why use your natural abilities to make someone feel bad? I just want to be the guy who uses his power to be positive.
Kenny Omega
 
   
A lot of people get writer's block, and I think you just have to show up for work, sit down, and be like, 'I'm here.' You have to stay confident and positive that you're going to write something.
Brian Fallon
 
   

There have been some positive things that have happened for the tribes, but it's a constant, vigilant fight about protecting what resources we have in terms of land and rights.
John Trudell
 
   
Good things are associated with blue, like clear days, more than singing the blues. Just the word 'blue' in the singular is full of optimism and positive connotation to most people.
David Carson
 
   
Some people hate lime-green; red has all this emotional baggage. Blue seems to be overall one of the more positive colors, and a little more serious than yellow.
David Carson
 
   
I'm always fighting the cup-is-half-empty way of being, versus the cup-is-half-full. I'm always fighting the pessimistic versus the positive.
Juliette Lewis
 
   
A positive attitude causes a chain reaction of positive thoughts, events and outcomes. It is a catalyst and it sparks extraordinary results.
Wade Boggs
 
  

People worry that gas prices are high and how they are affecting their pocket book. But they want to know about renewable energy. People are really starting to question things, and that's made people look to the future in a positive way.
Michael Franti
 
   
There's not always going to be something out there for you, especially not a positive role, so once you get up there and start being well known, you can't just think projects will come to you. You have to start doing your own projects because if you don't, you'll miss out, and eventually your fame will be over.
Keke Palmer
 
   
I always try to set a positive example for my generation and promote confidence.
Keke Palmer
 
   
I don't think the world focuses on the positive things enough.
Dwyane Wade
 
   
The thing is, I don't do these things for recognition, being a good teammate, being a positive member of the community. I do them because those things make me whole and complete.
Dwyane Wade
 
   

I think what I can do is to focus more on what I'm good at and see if I can improve on these positive qualities so that I can continue on the path I'm on now.
Lee Seung-gi
 
   
I am very positive. I like to box. I like my life. I am happy every day.
Gennady Golovkin
 
   
I'm a positive guy, even if I don't smile a lot.
James Arthur
 
   
There've been lots of positive changes in the city since I worked at Salford Tech in the seventies, and I'm pleased to be known as Salford's Bard and to have helped put it on the map.
John Cooper Clarke
 
   
To me, the #1 key to success is 'creating lasting positive change in yourself and others.' That is what is most rare, most difficult, and most valuable about leading people.
Marshall Goldsmith
 
   

To be perfectly honest, I feel I have a duty to use my celebrity status in a positive way.
David Schwimmer
 
   
I remember when I was first time in Serie A, we were down the bottom, no one was speaking about Cagliari. And we were safe, one day before the final match. With Parma, we went down, but we were positive right to the end. There are the little details, but you have to continue.
Claudio Ranieri
 
   
Coming to terms with the fear of death is conducive to healing, positive personality transformation, and consciousness evolution.
Stanislav Grof
 
   
When you're young, stay active no matter what you do, and look up to positive role models.
DeAndre Hopkins
 
   
Removing all stimulation around you is a really positive thing in terms of stimulating your creativity.
Grimes
 
   

I have rules about eating, exercising and rules about staying positive. And these rules are sacred to me.
Richard Simmons
 
   
I want to give my followers a positive message. I want to give those girls a positive message who have been forcefully married, who continue to sacrifice. I want to be an example for those people. That's my aim.
Qandeel Baloch
 
   
I search my name on Twitter because I don't want to miss the compliments, and I favorite the nice things people say about me so they know I saw it. People are more positive than they are negative, and I try not to harp on the negative.
Nicole Byer
 
   
I'm generally a positive person.
Nicole Byer
 
  

My mom was a really positive, jovial person, so I try to keep it upbeat like that.
Nicole Byer
 
   
I believe the continually advancing Information Revolution will lend us the wisdom and strength to address humanity's previously unsolvable problems and help us make a positive impact on all of society.
Masayoshi Son
 
   

Everything has positive and negative consequences.
Farrah Fawcett
 
  
Like Koeman, Klopp knows exactly how to get the best out of me - by being critical. When the media are hyping me and being very positive, he will downplay the praise and all that - often with a wink.
Virgil van Dijk
 
   
Why be negative when you can enjoy life and be positive? That's something I learned over the years.
Virgil van Dijk
 
   
To me, it doesn't matter how good you are. Sport is all about playing and competing. Whatever you do in cricket and in sport, enjoy it, be positive and try to win.
Ian Botham
 
   
Being positive is like going up a mountain. Being negative is like sliding down a hill. A lot of times, people want to take the easy way out, because it's basically what they've understood throughout their lives.
Chuck D
 
   

You need to be able to manage stress because hard times will come, and a positive outlook is what gets you through.
Marie Osmond
 
   
You can do everything you can to try to stop bad things from happening to you, but eventually things will happen, so the best prevention is a positive attitude.
Marie Osmond
 
   
I surf more now for other people than myself. I feel a lot of support from people wanting me to do well, and I feed off that. I can send a positive message to people from what I do.
Kelly Slater
 
   
It's a horrible name, Coldplay. It doesn't conjure up any positive thoughts.
Ian Brown
 
   
I think it is very important to not be too much on social media. You have a lot of positive comments but also negative ones, and at the end of the day, that shouldn't affect you, but it is much more important not to read it so you just don't know.
Max Verstappen
 
   

It's our responsibility for the village to say, 'Hey we're going to create these programs,' whether it's sports, creative arts, music, we need some things to give young people positive things to do, and that's including jobs.
Common
 
   
You have to learn how to harness technology so you can use it for positive stuff without being disconnected from nature.
Talib Kweli
 
   
Although our inattention can contribute to our lack of total well-being, we also have the power to choose positive behaviors and responses. In that choice we change our every experience of life!
Greg Anderson
 
   
Religion is supposed to be a positive thing when you look at the true religions around the world, not the fundamentalists. You always have to go with what your spirit tells you, not what people advise you. I'm a man that will always follow my own path.
Anthony Joshua
 
   
I like the fact that Tess Holliday is comfortable in her own skin and loves herself. I think that's a hugely positive message that women of all sizes really need to adopt.
Jameela Jamil
 
   

People should focus on my foundation, my projects, and everything positive and important that I am doing in Latin America and the around the world.
Maluma
 
   
Me and my husband think the internet is a really positive thing. We know games that have taught our children problem-solving skills but that doesn't mean we are going to say play 'Call of Duty.'
Konnie Huq
 
   
Life in 'Blue Peter's' world is always presented as happy, positive and fun. It's an adventure that you have to make the kids believe they want to join in. There are no marks for being a scaredy-cat.
Konnie Huq
 
   
If you tell your own story to your children - that includes your positive moments and your negative moments, and how you overcame them - you give your children the skills and the confidence they need to feel like they can overcome some hardship that they've felt.
Bruce Feiler
 
   
The bottom line: if you want a happier family, create, refine and retell the story of your family's positive moments and your ability to bounce back from the difficult ones. That act alone may increase the odds that your family will thrive for many generations to come.
Bruce Feiler
 
   

Decades of research have shown that most happy families communicate effectively. But talking doesn't mean simply 'talking through problems,' as important as that is. Talking also means telling a positive story about yourselves.
Bruce Feiler
 
   
You must be active; you must be positive, even if things don't go the way you want them to.
Norman Lloyd
 
   
People with a mental illness aren't mentally weak. In fact, many of them are incredibly strong. And just like everyone else, they possess the ability to create positive change in their lives.
Amy Morin
 
   
Positive thinking is a valuable tool that can help you overcome obstacles, deal with pain, and reach new goals.
Amy Morin
 
   

Just like it's not healthy to think overly negative thoughts, exaggeratedly positive thoughts can be equally detrimental. If you overestimate how much of a positive impact a particular change will have on your life, you may end up feeling disappointed when reality doesn't live up to your fantasy.
Amy Morin
 
   
Somewhere along the line, positive thinking seems to have been confused with magical thinking. There's a notion that if you think positively enough, you can make anything happen by using the power of your mind. All the positive thinking in the world won't deliver good fortune or prevent tragedy from striking.
Amy Morin
 
   

Building mental strength is about regulating your emotions, managing your thoughts, and behaving in a positive manner, despite your circumstances.
Amy Morin
 
   
If you quit every time you face a new challenge, giving up can change how you view yourself. You may begin to think you're weak or that you're a failure because you can't seem to stick with things long enough to see positive results.
Amy Morin
 
   
I love Snoop. I worked with him on 'Old School,' and he's very accessible. He's very kind. He's always nice to everyone, to the crew. He's always got something positive to say. He's very childlike and loves to come and play. So, I had fun working with him.
Vince Vaughn
 
   
There are a lot of ways to make a positive impact on the community without necessarily being a politician.
Theo Epstein
 
   
Kant introduced the concept of the negative into philosophy. Would it not also be worthwhile to try to introduce the concept of the positive into philosophy?
Karl Wilhelm Friedrich Schlegel
 
   

I contracted malaria in rural Mozambique. I was a youth ambassador for Australia. For a year after high school, you give positive speeches about Australia and as part of it I traveled to lots of different countries.
Rebel Wilson
 
   
You see kids walking to the bus, and they're watching product on their phones. I'm positive that my grandkids and their grandkids are going to put on a pair of glasses and watch something.
Jeffrey Tambor
 
   
And to me, fame is not a positive thing. The idea of being famous is a lot better than the reality. It's fantastic when you go to premieres and people cheer you, but it's not real. And it's totally not my approach to get my name on a club door just because I can.
Tom Felton
 
   
We don't care who you is - Blood, Crip, Mexican, Chinese. You feel me? If you about doing something positive with yourself and your community, let's join forces together.
Jay Rock
 
   
With gangs, there could be a positive outlook because it takes the older guys to come school these younger guys on the right roles.
Jay Rock
 
   

I been around negativity all my life. To do something positive, it's a beautiful thing.
Jay Rock
 
   
Because a person has to be either working or looking for work to be counted as part of the labor force, an increase in the number of people too discouraged to continue their search for work would reduce the unemployment rate, all else being equal - but not for a positive reason.
Ben Bernanke
 
   
I think my philosophy in music has been to accentuate the positive.
Mike Love
 
   
I know there's millions of problems in the world, but if you dwell on those, then you're going to be miserable. I think my meditation helps me to transcend and get beyond the grip of all the negativity and regenerate from within a more positive attitude, which comes in very handy when you're going to do 150 concerts a year.
Mike Love
 
   
A positive attitude can really make dreams come true - it did for me.
David Bailey
 
    

Kids go to school and college and get through, but they don't seem to really care about using their minds. School doesn't have the kind of long term positive impact that it should.
Howard Gardner
 
   
In my work in Haiti, I've seen the hugely positive effects that happen when people come together to build something in the middle of the most desperate situations.
Olivia Wilde
 
   
Adopting a really positive attitude can work wonders to adding years to your life, a spring to your step, a sparkle to your eye, and all of that.
Christie Brinkley
 
   
If you don't find time to meditate and get all that negative out, and if you don't have the right people being positive around you, this is a very scary job to have if you don't learn how to control your fear.
Nate Diaz
 
   
Injustice, poverty, slavery, ignorance - these may be cured by reform or revolution. But men do not live only by fighting evils. They live by positive goals, individual and collective, a vast variety of them, seldom predictable, at times incompatible.
Isaiah Berlin
 
   

Happiness is just a positive perception from our brain. Some days, you will be unhappy. Our brain is a tool we use. It's not who we are.
James Altucher
 
   
Pop music has been the center of change, you know? And positive messages. I would love to get back to that place because I think we've lost it a little bit.
King Princess
 
   
I would like to do something dark or small. I love independent films. I love emotional scenes. I love people who are struggling with something. I think it's just the juxtaposition to my incredibly happy, positive demeanor.
Shailene Woodley
 
   
There are certain things about me that I will never tell to anyone because I am a very private person. But basically, what you see is who I am. I'm independent, I do like to be liked, I do look for the good side of life and people. I'm positive, I'm disciplined, I like my life in order, and I'm neat as a pin.
Mary Tyler Moore
 
   

I made myself a little angry before beam. That's the best way to do beam. It's important to fuel yourself with some devastating things, but I also realized that if I daydream about doing well and having this silver medal, it's more motivating than focusing on the negatives. So I learned to focus on the positive.
Aly Raisman
 
   
I make negative music, but I also make positive music because that's what thrown at me with life.
Tyga
 
   

Of the thousands of ways that humans differ from one another, turns out there's this one cluster of traits called conscientiousness that predict a whole host of positive life outcomes, such as longevity over our health, life satisfaction.
Daniel Levitin
 
   
I'm somebody who tries to remain positive and looks forward to setting goals and reaching them. But that's easier said than done.
CM Punk
 
   
I don't get why people love to hate John Cena. But as long as he gets a reaction that's positive or negative, he's doing his job.
CM Punk
 
   
I have to think of the positive; that's how I cope.
Ingrid Newkirk
 
  
Our line of work is very cynical, and a lot of it is driven by cynicism, cruelty, and meanness. It's easier to believe the negative stuff than the positive stuff. The feel-good stories don't usually spend a lot of time on the front pages.
Shawn Michaels
 
   

Women of worth are those who want positive change for themselves, their families, community or society, which I think is important. For me, a woman of worth is someone who has self -espect, who believes that she can change things in society.
Sonam Kapoor
 
   
What you feel inside reflects on your face. So be happy and positive all the time.
Sridevi
 
   
For me, stardom is feeling happiness and being positive.
Sridevi
 
   
I always welcome being part of something positive in WWE.
Mick Foley
 
   
I think for any small business that's bootstrapped, the overwhelming challenge initially is getting to positive cash flow.
John Mackey
 
   

Every company has messy data, and even the best of AI companies are not fully satisfied with their data. If you have data, it is probably a good idea to get an AI team to have a look at it and give feedback. This can develop into a positive feedback loop for both the IT and AI teams in any company.
Andrew Ng
 
   
Embracing the freedom of Brexit gives us the choice of what sort of country we want to become and means we can look forward to a more positive tomorrow.
Priti Patel
 
   
Britain has a long and proud record of welcoming migrants. They have made many positive contributions to our economy. But the impact of uncontrolled immigration from the E.U. has placed new pressures on our country.
Priti Patel
 
   
Psychologists, for reasons of clinical necessity or vagaries of temperament, have chosen to dissect and catalog the morbid emotions - depression, anger, anxiety - and to leave largely unexamined the more vital, positive ones.
Kay Redfield Jamison
 
   
The most positive step is to try to expand the employment base by making it, if not economically friendly, at least not economically disastrous, for studios to take on deficits.
Dick Wolf
 
   

I want to encourage people. One of the things I do encourage people is that - that Internet is a place where we should share our ideas and be positive, not negative.
Ansel Elgort
 
   
'The Fault in Our Stars' is a beautiful film that's really positive. The second half gets sad, but it's always positive.
Ansel Elgort
 
   
I think we've always thought that it's important to have a positive relationships with local government rather than taking a confrontational kind of stance.
Nathan Blecharczyk
 
   
The similarity between my music and The Beatles' music is it has within it a very positive quality. It's woven with humor.
Donovan
 
   
I'm not a positive guy.
Jeff Van Gundy
 

Every team has leadership. The leadership is the best players. But there's positive leadership, and there's negative leadership.
Jeff Van Gundy
 
   
I came into this environment where there was so much love, so much positive energy. I never heard my parents say, 'We have adopted kids.' The minute my sister Linda and I landed in Sweden, we were their kids.
Marcus Samuelsson
 
   
I think that if you stay positive and remain positive, you can definitely achieve the things you set out to.
Franchesca Ramsey
 
   
At the last Celebration I spoke before an auditorium full of people and I could just feel the affection and the positive feelings that they were exuding. It was actually moving. I remember thinking, 'I'm not worthy,' because 'Star Wars' is so much bigger than all of us.
Mark Hamill
 
   

I think of myself as a positive agnostic. I don't know, therefore I'm open. I don't know, therefore I'm interested.
Grace Slick
 
   
Does not the very word 'creative' mean to build, to initiate, to give out, to act - rather than to be acted upon, to be subjective? Living photography is positive in its approach, it sings a song of life - not death.
Berenice Abbott
 
   

We are happy to see China prospering; we are happy to see China playing a constructive and positive role in the region.
Lee Hsien Loong
 
   
Negative attitude is nine times more powerful than positive attitude.
Bikram Choudhury
 
  
Having to wake up at seven and go take the subway every morning, having to get over there with all these commuters and see every possible face of humanity and realizing that you're just the same as these other people is actually an amazingly positive thing.
Mike D
 
   
I really believe in the power of positive thinking and the collective power of people's thoughts spawning something into becoming reality.
Finn Balor
 
   
I believe that when you work on yourself, you are attracted by different, more positive beings.
Isabelle Adjani
 
   

I'm hoping that these next 20 years will show what we did 20 years ago in sequencing the first human genome, was the beginning of the health revolution that will have more positive impact in people's lives than any other health event in history.
Craig Venter
 
   
We are all products of our experiences, good and bad. Sometimes you learn as much from the negative experiences as you do from the positive.
Brad Garlinghouse
 
   
Al Gore has all of the positive attributes of Bill Clinton but is saddled with none of his negatives. He's a great big teddy bear of a political figure - Teflon coated, road tested, and everyone's nice guy.
Peter Navarro
 
   
I feel that losing both my legs was a blessing. It was meant to happen to me: I wouldn't have had the opportunity to touch so many lives in such a positive way.
Amy Purdy
 
   
You don't have to be positive all the time.
Amy Purdy
 
 

Everybody has those certain fighters they follow and that they really put on a high pedestal. They want to give the most shine that they possibly can. They look for any reason to break down a fighter's performance to when it isn't their favorite fighter in any positive thought.
Terence Crawford
 
   
I've noticed that my resolutions involve me not doing stuff that I wasn't going to do anyway so here's something more positive. I'm going to retrain as a Latin teacher in a provincial public school.
Arthur Smith
 
   
I just want to start conversations. I want to do films that prompt conversations - whether that is positive, negative, indifferent - just ones that you leave the theater wanting to know more, wanting to watch the film over and over again.
Lily Collins
 
   
Climate change is not an excuse for the EPA to ignore the bounds of law and issue illegal regulations that will cost jobs, shutter industries, and have little to no positive impact on the environment.
Luther Strange
 
   
I'd love to be more involved in sports. There's so much positive energy - I have to be around it. Especially as I get older.
Kyle
 
   

My grandmother, she's been the positive portion of my life the entire time. She raised us Baptist, and when I got old enough to say I didn't want to go to church, she didn't force me. She was cool.
Curtis Jackson
 
   
My grandmother, she's been the positive portion of my life the entire time.
Curtis Jackson
 
   
The more you drive positive change, the more enhanced your business model.
Anand Mahindra
 
   
The Rise credo is about accepting no limits, alternative thinking, and driving positive change - the three pillars.
Anand Mahindra
 
   
Our credo says that, in the end, we want to drive positive change in the lives of our stakeholders and communities across the world, enabling them to rise.
Anand Mahindra
 
   

Virtue is a positive quality developed by taking a firm stand for the right in temptation, or by the suffering endured in consequence of wrongdoing.
Max Heindel
 
   
When a person listens to a good song, and they can look out at the world and their lives and see the dark and the light, the negative and the positive, all the different elements, all come together in one holistic poem, that is a very healing and very reductive thing, and that's what my music is about.
Matisyahu
 
   
I just try to keep myself positive and really active.
Ivan Moody
 
   
I think if you just look at life in a positive way, positive things will happen.
Jake Owen
 
   

My whole idea, to me, is if you're a heel in wrestling, you should not having a band playing for when you come out and people will react in a positive way.
Edge
 
   
And what I love about music and art in general is that you can take something so negative or positive - any emotion, no matter how sad or happy - and turn it into art.
Amber Liu
 
   

I'd like young girls to be able to listen to my music and take something positive away from it.
Jorja Smith
 
   
I didn't come up in a culture or society that looked on me as a movie star. I was the bad guy. I was fortunate enough to be cast in some roles that weren't bad, were positive.
Bill Duke
 
   
I think that when you rally powerful voices around powerful issues, what you get are positive results.
Kerby Jean-Raymond
 
   
I am often offered roles or women who are very strong, uncompromising. But it's fun to do 'Manglehorn,' where I'm playing somebody who's very open, very optimistic, very positive. I don't want to bore myself.
Holly Hunter
 
   
I had many teachers that were great, positive role models and taught me to be a good person and stand up and be a good man. A lot of the principals they taught me still affect how I act sometimes and it's 30 years later.
Kevin James
 
   

I just want to put some positive stuff out there. If it works, great. If it doesn't, no problem.
Kevin James
 
   
My main focus is to get positive yards.
Derrick Henry
 
   
All I can control is myself and just keep having a positive attitude.
Rose Namajunas
 
   
You just keep a positive attitude no matter what comes in your way - challenges, roadblocks - don't let it faze you, and you can overcome anything.
Rose Namajunas
 
   
I want to be the most influential champion, in a positive light. I want to change the world.
Rose Namajunas
 
   

I had to really create a positive atmosphere for myself, and that has to come from within.
Rose Namajunas
 
   
One tech-related concern with religion is that it appears to be a positive feedback loop to the accelerating rich-poor gap, as the disenfranchised opt out of modernity.
Steve Jurvetson
 
   
The word queer first started being used in the late 1980s by members of the community who wanted to reclaim something negative and turn it into a positive. It's still a painful word for some, and lots of people don't identify with it. But for me it's a helpful and empowering term that unifies an ever-growing community.
Olly Alexander
 
   
When I meet gay kids and they know who we are, I remember that's amazing because literally every gay person in every gay story I knew growing up was doomed to die. There weren't any positive gay stories and it's incredible that has changed.
Olly Alexander
 
   
I think music can be therapeutic and a really positive thing, but that seeing a therapist is the best form of therapy you can get.
Olly Alexander
 
   

I genuinely do want the world to change in a positive way, but I wouldn't call myself an activist, you know? I'm an entertainer who engages with activism because it feels really meaningful for me.
Olly Alexander
 
   
If I try to act cool and do things that get a positive reaction, then I'm not doing anything for the person I'm in the ring with.
Carmella
 
   
I love interacting with the fans and being a positive role model for little girls.
Carmella
 
   
People have lost their faith that if they work hard, if they try to get ahead, if they play by the rules, then that will ultimately result in positive outcomes.
J. D. Vance
 
   
How much do you as a consumer value a positive experience with a brand or its customer service department? How willing are you to share that with your friends? How inclined are you to let that person know that you're interaction with them was positive?
Simon Mainwaring
 
   

When a positive exchange between a brand and customers becomes quantifiable metrics, it encourages brand to provide better service, customer service to do a better job, and consumers to actively show their gratitude.
Simon Mainwaring
 
   
More brands are waking up to their social responsibility and doing good work through cause marketing campaigns. Yet too many still go about it the wrong way. I mean 'wrong' in two senses. Firstly, they are marketing ineffectively, and secondly, as a consequence their positive social impact is not maximized.
Simon Mainwaring
 
   
My goal is to make people feel passionately, if it's negative or positive, I did my job.
Katee Sackhoff
 
   
What is important is that in a capital-scarce country like India, the real interest rate needs to be positive enough to encourage healthy growth of financial savings; we get into macro difficulties when real rates on financial savings become negative for a length of time.
Urjit Patel
 
   

I think if I have a lot of positive energy out there, I'll be fine.
Nick Kyrgios
 
   
I want to work with Peter Robinson as first minister in a positive, constructive way and leave the elections to the electorate.
Martin McGuinness
 
   

There is no positive outlook about Shawn Kemp in Seattle. When that name is mentioned, it brings nothing but negativity.
Shawn Kemp
 
   
I'm not going to sit here and tell anybody I haven't had difficulties in my life, haven't made any bad decisions. But to sit back and consider myself a bad person or not doing something positive, it's so untrue.
Shawn Kemp
 
   
I'm all for doing positive. I've worked in the community. My wife, she's spending her life basically giving back to the community. That's something that we take pretty seriously, man.
Shawn Kemp
 
   
The power of the individual, market forces, and the private sector permeate our lives. With that power comes responsibility to address huge challenges. Climate change cannot be solved by governments alone. Xenophobia, hatred, and intolerance - more business leaders have to play a role in trying to be positive leaders, civic leaders.
Daniel Lubetzky
 
   
So much of what young people perceive about their body image is taken from watching their parents... I think we need to look at ways we can help parents pass on more positive messages to their children, and perhaps some of that can be done through health visitors, for example.
Jo Swinson
 
   

I know as an aunt, you fall into the trap of turning to your niece and saying, 'you look beautiful' - because of course all children do look beautiful - but if the message they get is that is what's important and that is what gets praise, then that's not necessarily the most positive message you want them to hear.
Jo Swinson
 
   
To take on the forces of nationalism and populism, we need to rally a liberal movement that offers a positive, alternative vision for the kind of country we want to be.
Jo Swinson
 
   
Even though she's my younger sister, Becky's definitely a role model in my life. She's the most genuinely positive person I've ever met.
Jennifer Hyman
 
   
I think that life is difficult. People have challenges. Family members get sick, people get older, you don't always get the job or the promotion that you want. You have conflicts in your life. And really, life is about your resilience and your ability to go through your life and all of the ups and downs with a positive attitude.
Jennifer Hyman
 
   
The more time goes by, the more things will happen to you in your life. And the ability to be positive throughout and look for the good in people, look for the good in situations - it's so important.
Jennifer Hyman
 
   

Music is about truth, and truth contains the ugliness and the dark and evil and hate and sadness as well as the happiness and beauty and everything in between. Having all those extremes is itself a satisfying, positive thing.
Andrew W.K.
 
   
If you have a negative model, you do negative things. If you have a positive model, like Guardiola, who says positive things and tells you to compete on the pitch and to play football, it's much better.
Dani Alves
 
   
I'm looking at the world through a very positive prism.
Jim Nantz
 
   
My job is to pay attention to the feel of the game and always add a positive energy to it on my team through the ups and downs of the game.
Iman Shumpert
 
   
If I bring positive energy to the court, most times, I can get that back.
Iman Shumpert
 
   

Some people have these small, positive schemes for survival, a kind of strength that I am attracted to, maybe because I'm prone to the blues.
Debra Granik
 
   
I think people are so immersed in the anti-Scientology mindset by consuming tabloid media and stories about space aliens. It's baffling. When I say I want to see a more positive side of the church, all I'm saying is I want to get past these headlines that talk about aliens and Tom Cruise jumping on a sofa.
Louis Theroux
 
   
I don't judge anyone of any stripe by what they read. Reading is always good for you. It's a positive act.
George Pelecanos
 
   
I believe that the family unit has fundamentally been the most positive thing for society, and I don't believe that any minority has the right to create changes that impact on the majority.
Stephen Baldwin
 
   
My emotions, when I think about the time I spent at Spurs, are always really positive.
Luka Modric
 
   

A core part of Teach For America's mission has always been affecting positive change in the traditional public school system.
Wendy Kopp
 
   
I try to be as positive as I can because I truly believe I am my feelings, and if I'm sad, if I have regrets, they will show up as illnesses, they will show up as cancers... I don't want that.
Marie Helvin
 
   
When you've been touched by sadness and grief, it makes you vulnerable. And because I am vulnerable, I try to be positive. And when I say 'try,' I really do mean try, because it's an effort.
Marie Helvin
 
   
My style motto is pretty classic: you give off a positive energy when you wear what you're most comfortable in.
Petra Collins
 
   

All I would say is that when I've been very down or having kind of a tough time in my life, certain films or pieces of music or books have changed that. They've taken me out of a dark place and put me into a more positive one. And I think that if we can do that for people, then it's certainly worth doing.
Rupert Friend
 
   
Being famous is having the power to really implement positive change in the world, and it gives you the power to do what you want. I'm really grateful for it because I can play music and people will listen.
Sean Lennon
 
   

I think it is important for young people to see other young people on television doing something positive with their life, making positive changes and growing. I don't think there is enough of that on TV. I mean, we've got 'Jersey Shore,' and I don't know what that teaches young kids.
Johnny Weir
 
   
New tech explosions create winners and losers, but overall are remarkably positive for the country, middle-class folks, the economy, jobs, and wages.
Lawrence Kudlow
 
   
I never - I mean, I never saw any doctor's report saying I was HIV positive. I never had a doctor explain to me and show me what was going on.
Tommy Morrison
 
   
I don't think I have HIV. I don't think that I ever had HIV. I think I had hepatitis. I got rid of the hepatitis, and since then, every single time I have tested for HIV, it has been negative. The original test was a false positive.
Tommy Morrison
 
   
When I went to Test Pilot School, that's when we came to Johnson Space Center. And I ended up seeing John Young and listening to him talk and getting a positive influence from him.
Sunita Williams
 
   

I have never had a problem with national service. I am not sure the draft is the way to go about it, but I am positive that you live in a society and you take from this society, which every citizen here does. You owe something back to this country, and that should be paid back in some form of national service.
Montel Williams
 
   
One of the most gratifying, rewarding things is when people come up, and they tell you how the show influenced their lives in a very positive way. When I do these things like Comic Con, I get people who are lawyers, judges, plumbers, carpenters, and entire families, and it's mostly for 'Batman.' But now, amazingly, it's also for 'Family Guy.'
Adam West
 
   
I generally don't read articles about myself/'Chappelle's Show,' nor do I read reviews. It's basically playing Russian Roulette. They're not all gonna be positive.
Neal Brennan
 
   
We need Big Ideas, as we are in a time of small people, and as Kennedy showed with Apollo, doing something grand in space is the biggest. At a time of huge national doubt and fear of losing our leadership as a nation to others, it focused us, gave us something positive and inspired a generation.
Rick Tumlinson
 
   
In the early 2000s, people expected that anonymity on the Internet would be positive for the development of democracy in South Korea. In a Confucian culture like South Korea's, hierarchy can block the free exchange of opinions in face-to-face situations. The web offered a way around that.
Kim Young-ha
 
   

I became so focused on this desire to have a child that it really took over over my life, not in a positive way. It definitely impacted on my work, life, and work opportunities: I couldn't travel at particular times. I turned down a lot of opportunities, to be honest.
Julia Leigh
 
   
I think the environmental movement has failed in that it's used the stick too much; it's used the apocalyptic tone too much; it hasn't sold the positive aspects of being environmentally concerned and trying to pull us out.
Edward Burtynsky
 
   
My wife Cecily Adams was dying of cancer, my daughter Madeline was struggling to overcome an autism diagnosis, and my father was dying, all at the same time. Writing the journal was a cathartic experience, and an extremely positive one.
Jim Beaver
 
   
Because of the wonderfully positive response to 'Life's That Way,' I am considering writing some more autobiographical stuff - maybe another book. I don't know. It doesn't help that I'm lazy.
Jim Beaver
 
   
When families are strong and stable, so are children - showing higher levels of wellbeing and more positive outcomes. But when things go wrong - either through family breakdown or a damaged parental relationship - the impact on a child's later life can be devastating.
Iain Duncan Smith
 
   

I appreciate both good and bad - I don't want to sit in a bubble where everyone just tells me everything positive to keep my morale high.
Big Narstie
 
   
It's arguing, in a very good and positive way. It's sort of sitting down and pulling an argument apart. I think that's a very oddly Jewish thing. And it's the chaos of family and a slight sort of cosy messiness of it all.
Emily Maitlis
 
   
I don't even read positive reviews unless they are absolutely certified by eight different people to not contain one thing that could upset me.
Jonathan Franzen
 
   
It is really important that we get more women doing exercise and being active, and those that have taken up boxing or boxing training will definitely find that it has a really positive impact on their health, fitness and well-being.
Nicola Adams
 
   
What you do on the field can only be a positive if you take care of what you need to off the field, and that means recovery and refueling.
Kelley O'Hara
 
   

It's always in our mind-set to encourage young girls to get playing. The only way we can do that is being positive off the pitch, trying to engage as much as possible.
Fran Kirby
 
   
I'm motivated by the positive ways in which Bitcoin use being widespread will make the world a better place.
Roger Ver
 
   
I've always loved the use of the word 'thick' when it comes to heavy because it's always a positive thing.
Paula Pell
 
   
I don't think lying has any ultimate justification. I don't think it ever leads to anything positive. The good fight to have is not to lie. That's one of the challenges in a way.
Andy Garcia
 
   

I've specifically decided to say no to projects that weren't advancing Latinos, that weren't showing us in a positive light, roles that were gratuitous and spreading untruths.
Gina Rodriguez
 
   
I learned one thing - never hate a positive option.
Kevin Garnett
 
   

We manage to bounce ideas off one another. Every band fights, but at the end of the day, we're very positive about the way we fight. At least we come out with a result.
Keith Emerson
 
   
I have a very positive outlook.
Pat Nixon
 
 
I am a local economic revitalization strategist. But I am also a TV/radio host, and a small business owner. I find ways to use money more efficiently to realize positive goals for everyone.
Majora Carter
 
   
Christians were instructed to serve others, and the thanksgiving was for the grace of God and the fact that God offered a way for man to return to a positive relationship with Him.
John Clayton
 
   
There is no racial or ethnic involvement in Thanksgiving, and people who may be very distant from the Christian system can see the beauty and the positive spirit that comes from the holiday.
John Clayton
 
   

As a goalie, you must stay positive. And if you do make a mistake, well, those things happen when you play my position.
Henrik Lundqvist
 
   
If we can produce more ethanol and bio-diesel to help fuel our vehicles, we will create jobs, boost local economies and produce cleaner burning fuels. This will keep dollars here at home where they can have a positive impact on our economy.
Rick Renzi
 
   
The power of pop culture stories should not be underestimated, and there is an enormous potential for inspirational stories that can have a positive, transformative effect on our lives.
Anita Sarkeesian
 
   
There are many positive things to say about the black community. No question about it.
William Julius Wilson
 
   
There are plenty of studies that have shown that depression is associated with decreased immunity. So I want to harness all of the positive emotional energy I can in a patient to get better.
Allan Hamilton





Love Quotes
Quotes tagged as "love" Showing 1-30 of 77,831
I'm selfish, impatient and a little insecure. I make mistakes, I am out of control
I'm selfish, impatient and a little insecure. I make mistakes, I am out of control and at times hard to handle. But if you can't handle me at my worst, then you sure as hell don't deserve me at my best.
 Marilyn Monroe
tags: attributed-no-source, best, life, love, mistakes, out-of-control, truth, worst151750 likesLike
William W. Purkey
You've gotta dance like there's nobody watching,
Love like you'll never be hurt,
Sing like there's nobody listening,
And live like it's heaven on earth.
 William W. Purkey
tags: dance, heaven, hurt, inspirational, life, love, sing119537 likesLike
Dr. Seuss
You know you're in love when you can't fall asleep because reality is finally better than your dreams.
 Dr. Seuss
tags: attributed-no-source, dreams, love, reality, sleep116224 likesLike
Elbert Hubbard
A friend is someone who knows all about you and still loves you.
 Elbert Hubbard
tags: friend, friendship, knowledge, love79086 likesLike
Martin Luther King Jr.
Darkness cannot drive out darkness: only light can do that. Hate cannot drive out hate: only love can do that.
 Martin Luther King Jr., A Testament of Hope: The Essential Writings and Speeches
tags: darkness, drive-out, hate, inspirational, light, love, peace73059 likesLike
We accept the love we think we deserve.
We accept the love we think we deserve.
 Stephen Chbosky, The Perks of Being a Wallflower
tags: inspirational, love66660 likesLike
Andr Gide
It is better to be hated for what you are than to be loved for what you are not.
 Andre Gide, Autumn Leaves
tags: life, love55988 likesLike
Bob Marley
Only once in your life, I truly believe, you find someone who can completely turn your world around. You tell them things that youve never shared with another soul and they absorb everything you say and actually want to hear more. You share hopes for the future, dreams that will never come true, goals that were never achieved and the many disappointments life has thrown at you. When something wonderful happens, you cant wait to tell them about it, knowing they will share in your excitement. They are not embarrassed to cry with you when you are hurting or laugh with you when you make a fool of yourself. Never do they hurt your feelings or make you feel like you are not good enough, but rather they build you up and show you the things about yourself that make you special and even beautiful. There is never any pressure, jealousy or competition but only a quiet calmness when they are around. You can be yourself and not worry about what they will think of you because they love you for who you are. The things that seem insignificant to most people such as a note, song or walk become invaluable treasures kept safe in your heart to cherish forever. Memories of your childhood come back and are so clear and vivid its like being young again. Colours seem brighter and more brilliant. Laughter seems part of daily life where before it was infrequent or didnt exist at all. A phone call or two during the day helps to get you through a long days work and always brings a smile to your face. In their presence, theres no need for continuous conversation, but you find youre quite content in just having them nearby. Things that never interested you before become fascinating because you know they are important to this person who is so special to you. You think of this person on every occasion and in everything you do. Simple things bring them to mind like a pale blue sky, gentle wind or even a storm cloud on the horizon. You open your heart knowing that theres a chance it may be broken one day and in opening your heart, you experience a love and joy that you never dreamed possible. You find that being vulnerable is the only way to allow your heart to feel true pleasure thats so real it scares you. You find strength in knowing you have a true friend and possibly a soul mate who will remain loyal to the end. Life seems completely different, exciting and worthwhile. Your only hope and security is in knowing that they are a part of your life.
 Bob Marley
tags: love55195 likesLike
John Green
As he read, I fell in love the way you fall asleep: slowly, and then all at once.
 John Green, The Fault in Our Stars
tags: love45222 likesLike
Elie Wiesel
The opposite of love is not hate, it's indifference. The opposite of art is not ugliness, it's indifference. The opposite of faith is not heresy, it's indifference. And the opposite of life is not death, it's indifference.
 Elie Wiesel
tags: activism, apathy, hate, indifference, inspirational, love, opposite, philosophy39553 likesLike
Friedrich Nietzsche
It is not a lack of love, but a lack of friendship that makes unhappy marriages.
 Friedrich Nietzsche
tags: friendship, lack-of-friendship, lack-of-love, love, marriage, unhappy-marriage39514 likesLike
Pablo Neruda
I love you without knowing how, or when, or from where. I love you simply, without problems or pride: I love you in this way because I do not know any other way of loving but this, in which there is no I or you, so intimate that your hand upon my chest is my hand, so intimate that when I fall asleep your eyes close.
 Pablo Neruda, 100 Love Sonnets
tags: love, poetry37258 likesLike
William Shakespeare
Love all, trust a few, do wrong to none.
 William Shakespeare, All's Well That Ends Well
tags: do-wrong, love, trust, wrong35359 likesLike
Neil Gaiman
Have you ever been in love? Horrible isn't it? It makes you so vulnerable. It opens your chest and it opens up your heart and it means that someone can get inside you and mess you up.
 Neil Gaiman, The Kindly Ones
tags: love34986 likesLike
Lao Tzu
Being deeply loved by someone gives you strength, while loving someone deeply gives you courage.
 Lao Tzu
tags: courage, deeply-loved, love, strength, widely-misattributed32454 likesLike
Marilyn Monroe
This life is what you make it. No matter what, you're going to mess up sometimes, it's a universal truth. But the good part is you get to decide how you're going to mess it up. Girls will be your friends - they'll act like it anyway. But just remember, some come, some go. The ones that stay with you through everything - they're your true best friends. Don't let go of them. Also remember, sisters make the best friends in the world. As for lovers, well, they'll come and go too. And baby, I hate to say it, most of them - actually pretty much all of them are going to break your heart, but you can't give up because if you give up, you'll never find your soulmate. You'll never find that half who makes you whole and that goes for everything. Just because you fail once, doesn't mean you're gonna fail at everything. Keep trying, hold on, and always, always, always believe in yourself, because if you don't, then who will, sweetie? So keep your head high, keep your chin up, and most importantly, keep smiling, because life's a beautiful thing and there's so much to smile about.
 Marilyn Monroe
tags: attributed-no-source, friends, heartbreak, inspirational, life, love, sisters31339 likesLike
Sarah Dessen
There is never a time or place for true love. It happens accidentally, in a heartbeat, in a single flashing, throbbing moment.
 Sarah Dessen, The Truth About Forever
tags: love30818 likesLike
Robert A. Heinlein
Love is that condition in which the happiness of another person is essential to your own.
 Robert A. Heinlein, Stranger in a Strange Land
tags: essential, happiness, love29592 likesLike
Bob Marley
You may not be her first, her last, or her only. She loved before she may love again. But if she loves you now, what else matters? She's not perfectyou aren't either, and the two of you may never be perfect together but if she can make you laugh, cause you to think twice, and admit to being human and making mistakes, hold onto her and give her the most you can. She may not be thinking about you every second of the day, but she will give you a part of her that she knows you can breakher heart. So don't hurt her, don't change her, don't analyze and don't expect more than she can give. Smile when she makes you happy, let her know when she makes you mad, and miss her when she's not there.
 Bob Marley
tags: love27284 likesLike
Suzanne Collins
You love me. Real or not real?"
I tell him, "Real.
 Suzanne Collins, Mockingjay
tags: katniss, love, peeta, suzanne-collins, the-hunger-games26745 likesLike
John Green
I'm in love with you," he said quietly.

"Augustus," I said.

"I am," he said. He was staring at me, and I could see the corners of his eyes crinkling. "I'm in love with you, and I'm not in the business of denying myself the simple pleasure of saying true things. I'm in love with you, and I know that love is just a shout into the void, and that oblivion is inevitable, and that we're all doomed and that there will come a day when all our labor has been returned to dust, and I know the sun will swallow the only earth we'll ever have, and I am in love with you.
 John Green, The Fault in Our Stars
tags: doomed, inevitable, love, oblivion, pleasure, simple23999 likesLike
Nicholas Sparks
I am nothing special, of this I am sure. I am a common man with common thoughts and I've led a common life. There are no monuments dedicated to me and my name will soon be forgotten, but I've loved another with all my heart and soul, and to me, this has always been enough..
 Nicholas Sparks, The Notebook
tags: love23832 likesLike
William Shakespeare
Love looks not with the eyes, but with the mind,
And therefore is winged Cupid painted blind.
 William Shakespeare, A Midsummer Night's Dream
tags: love23146 likesLike
Nicholas Sparks
Love is like the wind, you can't see it but you can feel it.
 Nicholas Sparks, A Walk to Remember
tags: love, simile22226 likesLike
Elizabeth Gilbert
People think a soul mate is your perfect fit, and that's what everyone wants. But a true soul mate is a mirror, the person who shows you everything that is holding you back, the person who brings you to your own attention so you can change your life.

A true soul mate is probably the most important person you'll ever meet, because they tear down your walls and smack you awake. But to live with a soul mate forever? Nah. Too painful. Soul mates, they come into your life just to reveal another layer of yourself to you, and then leave.

A soul mates purpose is to shake you up, tear apart your ego a little bit, show you your obstacles and addictions, break your heart open so new light can get in, make you so desperate and out of control that you have to transform your life, then introduce you to your spiritual master...
 Elizabeth Gilbert, Eat, Pray, Love
tags: love21681 likesLike
Jodi Picoult
You don't love someone because they're perfect, you love them in spite of the fact that they're not.
 Jodi Picoult, My Sister's Keeper
tags: imperfect, love21495 likesLike
Marilyn Monroe
If you can make a woman laugh, you can make her do anything.
 Marilyn Monroe
tags: attributed-no-source, girls, love21214 likesLike
Jane Austen
There is nothing I would not do for those who are really my friends. I have no notion of loving people by halves, it is not my nature.
 Jane Austen, Northanger Abbey
tags: friendship, love21125 likesLike
Robert Fulghum
Were all a little weird. And life is a little weird. And when we find someone whose weirdness is compatible with ours, we join up with them and fall into mutually satisfying weirdnessand call it lovetrue love.
 Robert Fulghum, True Love
tags: love, weirdness21106 likesLike
Anas Nin
Love never dies a natural death. It dies because we don't know how to replenish its source. It dies of blindness and errors and betrayals. It dies of illness and wounds; it dies of weariness, of witherings, of tarnishings.
 Anais Nin
tags: death, love20975 likesLike

Love Quotes
Quotes tagged as "love" Showing 31-60 of 77,836
Alfred Tennyson
If I had a flower for every time I thought of you...I could walk through my garden forever.
 Alfred Tennyson
tags: friendship, love20333 likesLike
Marilyn Monroe
The real lover is the man who can thrill you by kissing your forehead or smiling into your eyes or just staring into space.
 Marilyn Monroe
tags: attributed-no-source, love19955 likesLike
C.S. Lewis
To love at all is to be vulnerable. Love anything and your heart will be wrung and possibly broken. If you want to make sure of keeping it intact you must give it to no one, not even an animal. Wrap it carefully round with hobbies and little luxuries; avoid all entanglements. Lock it up safe in the casket or coffin of your selfishness. But in that casket, safe, dark, motionless, airless, it will change. It will not be broken; it will become unbreakable, impenetrable, irredeemable. To love is to be vulnerable.
 C.S. Lewis, The Four Loves
tags: love19221 likesLike
J.K. Rowling
Dumbledore watched her fly away, and as her silvery glow faded he turned back to Snape, and his eyes were full of tears.
"After all this time?"
"Always," said Snape.
 J.K. Rowling, Harry Potter and the Deathly Hallows
tags: dumbledore, life, love, snape19071 likesLike
When someone loves you, the way they talk about you is different. You feel safe and comfortable.
 Jess C. Scott, The Intern
tags: desire, emotion, friendship, honesty, imagination, individuality, life, love, passion, reality, relationships, romance, truth, wisdom, wise-words18888 likesLike
Neil Gaiman
I've been making a list of the things they don't teach you at school. They don't teach you how to love somebody. They don't teach you how to be famous. They don't teach you how to be rich or how to be poor. They don't teach you how to walk away from someone you don't love any longer. They don't teach you how to know what's going on in someone else's mind. They don't teach you what to say to someone who's dying. They don't teach you anything worth knowing.
 Neil Gaiman, The Kindly Ones
tags: dying, facts, fame, knowing, love, poverty, reality, school, teach, wealth18306 likesLike
J.M. Barrie
To die will be an awfully big adventure.
 J.M. Barrie, Peter Pan
tags: adventure, love17097 likesLike
Jane Austen
A lady's imagination is very rapid; it jumps from admiration to love, from love to matrimony in a moment.
 Jane Austen, Pride and Prejudice
tags: humor, love, romantic, women16906 likesLike
Nicholas Sparks
So it's not gonna be easy. It's going to be really hard; we're gonna have to work at this everyday, but I want to do that because I want you. I want all of you, forever, everyday. You and me... everyday.
 Nicholas Sparks, The Notebook
tags: love, marriage16515 likesLike
Nicholas Sparks
Just when you think it can't get any worse, it can. And just when you think it can't get any better, it can.
 Nicholas Sparks, At First Sight
tags: life, love15482 likesLike
Alfred Tennyson
Tis better to have loved and lost
Than never to have loved at all.
 Alfred Lord Tennyson, In Memoriam
tags: love, paraphrase-of-congreve15334 likesLike
Pablo Neruda
I love you as certain dark things are to be loved,
in secret, between the shadow and the soul.
 Pablo Neruda, 100 Love Sonnets
tags: love, poetry15009 likesLike
Bob Marley
Hes not perfect. You arent either, and the two of you will never be perfect. But if he can make you laugh at least once, causes you to think twice, and if he admits to being human and making mistakes, hold onto him and give him the most you can. He isnt going to quote poetry, hes not thinking about you every moment, but he will give you a part of him that he knows you could break. Dont hurt him, dont change him, and dont expect for more than he can give. Dont analyze. Smile when he makes you happy, yell when he makes you mad, and miss him when hes not there. Love hard when there is love to be had. Because perfect guys dont exist, but theres always one guy that is perfect for you.
 Bob Marley
tags: inspirational, love14428 likesLike
Chuck Palahniuk
The one you love and the one who loves you are never, ever the same person.
 Chuck Palahniuk, Invisible Monsters
tags: life, love13652 likesLike
John Green
Some people don't understand the promises they're making when they make them," I said.

"Right, of course. But you keep the promise anyway. That's what love is. Love is keeping the promise anyway.
 John Green, The Fault in Our Stars
tags: faith, faithfulness, love, promises13517 likesLike
Paulo Coelho
When we love, we always strive to become better than we are. When we strive to become better than we are, everything around us becomes better too.
 Paulo Coelho, The Alchemist
tags: hope, inspiration, love, santiago12187 likesLike
Lisa Kleypas
I no longer believed in the idea of soul mates, or love at first sight. But I was beginning to believe that a very few times in your life, if you were lucky, you might meet someone who was exactly right for you. Not because he was perfect, or because you were, but because your combined flaws were arranged in a way that allowed two separate beings to hinge together.
 Lisa Kleypas, Blue-Eyed Devil
tags: love, relationships, romance12182 likesLike
Paulo Coelho
One is loved because one is loved. No reason is needed for loving.
 Paulo Coelho, The Alchemist
tags: love11775 likesLike
Mahatma Gandhi
When I despair, I remember that all through history the way of truth and love have always won. There have been tyrants and murderers, and for a time, they can seem invincible, but in the end, they always fall. Think of it--always.
 Mahatma Gandhi
tags: despair, evil, goodness, inspirational, love, sadness, truth, victory11621 likesLike
Sarah Dessen
Love is needing someone. Love is putting up with someone's bad qualities because they somehow complete you.
 Sarah Dessen, This Lullaby
tags: love11385 likesLike
Love is patient, love is kind. It does not envy, it does not boast, it is not proud. It is not rude, it is not self-seeking, it is not easily angered, it keeps no record of wrongs. Love does not delight in evil but rejoices with the truth. It always protects, always trusts, always hopes, always perseveres.
 Anonymous, Holy Bible: New International Version
tags: bible, love11203 likesLike
Robert Frost
We love the things we love for what they are.
 Robert Frost
tags: love, poetry11190 likesLike
Jane Austen
In vain have I struggled. It will not do. My feelings will not be repressed. You must allow me to tell you how ardently I admire and love you.
 Jane Austen, Pride And Prejudice
tags: love, mr-darcy11095 likesLike
Rainer Maria Rilke
Perhaps all the dragons in our lives are princesses who are only waiting to see us act, just once, with beauty and courage. Perhaps everything that frightens us is, in its deepest essence, something helpless that wants our love.
 Rainer Maria Rilke, Letters to a Young Poet
tags: love11015 likesLike
I would die for you. But I won't live for you.
 Stephen Chbosky, The Perks of Being a Wallflower
tags: love10990 likesLike
Paulo Coelho
So, I love you because the entire universe conspired to help me find you.
 Paulo Coelho, The Alchemist
tags: love10768 likesLike
E.E. Cummings
I carry your heart with me (I carry it in my heart)I am never without it (anywhere
I go you go,my dear; and whatever is done by only me is your doing,my darling)
I fear no fate (for you are my fate,my sweet)I want no world (for beautiful you are my world,my true)
and it's you are whatever a moon has always meant and whatever a sun will always sing is you

here is the deepest secret nobody knows
(here is the root of the root and the bud of the bud and the sky of the sky of a tree called life; which grows
higher than the soul can hope or mind can hide)
and this is the wonder that's keeping the stars apart

I carry your heart (I carry it in my heart)
 E.E. Cummings
tags: love, poetry10709 likesLike
Oscar Wilde
Never love anyone who treats you like you're ordinary.
 Oscar Wilde
tags: love, ordinary, people10562 likesLike
Nicholas Sparks
You are, and always have been, my dream.
 Nicholas Sparks, The Notebook
tags: love10459 likesLike
Markus Zusak
The only thing worse than a boy who hates you: a boy that loves you.
 Markus Zusak, The Book Thief
tags: boys, hate, love10448 likesLike

You are my best friend as well as my lover, and I do not know which side of you I enjoy the most. I treasure each side, just as I have treasured our life together.
 Nicholas Sparks, The Notebook
tags: friendship, love10417 likesLike
Cassandra Clare
And now Im looking at you, he said, and youre asking me if I still want you, as if I could stop loving you. As if I would want to give up the thing that makes me stronger than anything else ever has. I never dared give much of myself to anyone before  bits of myself to the Lightwoods, to Isabelle and Alec, but it took years to do it  but, Clary, since the first time I saw you, I have belonged to you completely. I still do. If you want me.
 Cassandra Clare, City of Glass
tags: cassandra-clare, city-of-glass, clary, jace, love, mortal-instruments10045 likesLike
Louise Erdrich
Life will break you. Nobody can protect you from that, and living alone won't either, for solitude will also break you with its yearning. You have to love. You have to feel. It is the reason you are here on earth. You are here to risk your heart. You are here to be swallowed up. And when it happens that you are broken, or betrayed, or left, or hurt, or death brushes near, let yourself sit by an apple tree and listen to the apples falling all around you in heaps, wasting their sweetness. Tell yourself you tasted as many as you could.
 Louise Erdrich, The Painted Drum
tags: heartbreak, life, living, love, strength10017 likesLike
Promise Yourself

To be so strong that nothing
can disturb your peace of mind.
To talk health, happiness, and prosperity
to every person you meet.

To make all your friends feel
that there is something in them
To look at the sunny side of everything
and make your optimism come true.

To think only the best, to work only for the best,
and to expect only the best.
To be just as enthusiastic about the success of others
as you are about your own.

To forget the mistakes of the past
and press on to the greater achievements of the future.
To wear a cheerful countenance at all times
and give every living creature you meet a smile.

To give so much time to the improvement of yourself
that you have no time to criticize others.
To be too large for worry, too noble for anger, too strong for fear,
and too happy to permit the presence of trouble.

To think well of yourself and to proclaim this fact to the world,
not in loud words but great deeds.
To live in faith that the whole world is on your side
so long as you are true to the best that is in you.
 Christian D. Larson, Your Forces and How to Use Them
tags: happiness, inspirational, love, optimism, strength9976 likesLike
Charlotte Bront
I would always rather be happy than dignified.
 Charlotte Bront, Jane Eyre
tags: love, pride, women9956 likesLike
Mahatma Gandhi
Where there is love there is life.
 Mahatma Gandhi
tags: life, love9672 likesLike
Emily Bront
He's more myself than I am. Whatever our souls are made of, his and mine are the same.
 Emily Bront, Wuthering Heights
tags: love9317 likesLike
Zelda Fitzgerald
Nobody has ever measured, not even poets, how much the heart can hold.
 Zelda Fitzgerald
tags: love9267 likesLike
Lady Gaga
Some women choose to follow men, and some women choose to follow their dreams. If you're wondering which way to go, remember that your career will never wake up and tell you that it doesn't love you anymore.
 Lady Gaga
tags: love, romance, work9241 likesLike
Haruki Murakami
I think you still love me, but we cant escape the fact that Im not enough for you. I knew this was going to happen. So Im not blaming you for falling in love with another woman. Im not angry, either. I should be, but Im not. I just feel pain. A lot of pain. I thought I could imagine how much this would hurt, but I was wrong.
 Haruki Murakami, South of the Border, West of the Sun
tags: breakup, infidelity, love, pain, relationships9238 likesLike
Nicole Krauss
Once upon a time there was a boy who loved a girl, and her laughter was a question he wanted to spend his whole life answering.
 Nicole Krauss, The History of Love
tags: love9191 likesLike
Nicholas Sparks
The best love is the kind that awakens the soul and makes us reach for more, that plants a fire in our hearts and brings peace to our minds. And that's what you've given me. That's what I'd hoped to give you forever
 Nicholas Sparks
tags: love, nicholas-sparks, romance, the-notebook9189 likesLike
John Lennon
There are two basic motivating forces: fear and love. When we are afraid, we pull back from life. When we are in love, we open to all that life has to offer with passion, excitement, and acceptance. We need to learn to love ourselves first, in all our glory and our imperfections. If we cannot love ourselves, we cannot fully open to our ability to love others or our potential to create. Evolution and all hopes for a better world rest in the fearlessness and open-hearted vision of people who embrace life.
 John Lennon
tags: beatles, fear, life, love9122 likesLike
Plato
Every heart sings a song, incomplete, until another heart whispers back. Those who wish to sing always find a song. At the touch of a lover, everyone becomes a poet.
 Plato
tags: love, poetry, song9055 likesLike
William Shakespeare
Doubt thou the stars are fire;
Doubt that the sun doth move;
Doubt truth to be a liar;
But never doubt I love.
 William Shakespeare, Hamlet
tags: love8952 likesLike
Nicholas Sparks
We fell in love, despite our differences, and once we did, something rare and beautiful was created. For me, love like that has only happened once, and that's why every minute we spent together has been seared in my memory. I'll never forget a single moment of it.
 Nicholas Sparks, The Notebook
tags: love8936 likesLike
Fyodor Dostoyevsky
Above all, don't lie to yourself. The man who lies to himself and listens to his own lie comes to a point that he cannot distinguish the truth within him, or around him, and so loses all respect for himself and for others. And having no respect he ceases to love.
 Fyodor Dostoevsky, The Brothers Karamazov
tags: lies, love, respect, self-deception, truth8927 likesLike
Edgar Allan Poe
We loved with a love that was more than love.
 Edgar Allen Poe
tags: logic, love8795 likesLike
Elizabeth Gilbert
This is a good sign, having a broken heart. It means we have tried for something.
 Elizabeth Gilbert, Eat, Pray, Love
tags: heartache, love8698 likesLike
Rainbow Rowell
Eleanor was right. She never looked nice. She looked like art, and art wasn't supposed to look nice; it was supposed to make you feel something.
 Rainbow Rowell, Eleanor & Park
tags: art, love8647 likesLike
And so the lion fell in love with the lamb" he murmured. I looked away, hiding my eyes as I thrilled to the word.
"What a stupid lamb," I sighed.
"What a sick, masochistic lion.
 Stephenie Meyer, Twilight
tags: bella, edward, love8572 likesLike
Rumi
Out beyond ideas of wrongdoing
and rightdoing there is a field.
I'll meet you there.

When the soul lies down in that grass
the world is too full to talk about.
 Rumi
tags: friendship, love, peace, silence, soul, zen8480 likesLike
Shana Abe
I heard what you said. Im not the silly romantic you think. I dont want the heavens or the shooting stars. I dont want gemstones or gold. I have those things already. I wanta steady hand. A kind soul. I want to fall asleep, and wake, knowing my heart is safe. I want to love, and be loved.
 Shana Abe
tags: love, romance8406 likesLike
A guy and a girl can be just friends, but at one point or another, they will fall for each other...Maybe temporarily, maybe at the wrong time, maybe too late, or maybe forever
 Dave Matthews Band
tags: dave-matthews, friends, love, relationships8314 likesLike
Jane Austen
The more I know of the world, the more I am convinced that I shall never see a man whom I can really love. I require so much!
 Jane Austen, Sense and Sensibility
tags: love, requirements8181 likesLike
Martin Luther King Jr.
I have decided to stick to love...Hate is too great a burden to bear.
 Martin Luther King Jr., A Testament of Hope: The Essential Writings and Speeches
tags: hate, love7921 likesLike
Trisha Yearwood
What's meant to be will always find a way
 Trisha Yearwood
tags: fate, inspiration, love7838 likesLike
Tom Bodett
They say a person needs just three things to be truly happy in this world: someone to love, something to do, and something to hope for.
 Tom Bodett
tags: happiness, hope, joy, love, wishing7774 likesLike
Cassandra Clare
We live and breathe words. .... It was books that made me feel that perhaps I was not completely alone. They could be honest with me, and I with them. Reading your words, what you wrote, how you were lonely sometimes and afraid, but always brave; the way you saw the world, its colors and textures and sounds, I felt--I felt the way you thought, hoped, felt, dreamt. I felt I was dreaming and thinking and feeling with you. I dreamed what you dreamed, wanted what you wanted--and then I realized that truly I just wanted you.
 Cassandra Clare, Clockwork Prince
tags: dreams, letters, love, love-at-first-sight, power-of-words, writing7710 likesLike
Lemony Snicket
Everyone, at some point in their lives, wakes up in the middle of the night with the feeling that they are all alone in the world, and that nobody loves them now and that nobody will ever love them, and that they will never have a decent night's sleep again and will spend their lives wandering blearily around a loveless landscape, hoping desperately that their circumstances will improve, but suspecting, in their heart of hearts, that they will remain unloved forever. The best thing to do in these circumstances is to wake somebody else up, so that they can feel this way, too.
 Lemony Snicket, Horseradish
tags: love7590 likesLike

Love Quotes
Quotes tagged as "love" Showing 121-150 of 77,836
Jane Austen
I cannot fix on the hour, or the spot, or the look or the words, which laid the foundation. It is too long ago. I was in the middle before I knew that I had begun.
 Jane Austen, Pride and Prejudice
tags: love, romance5683 likesLike
Joan Crawford
Love is a fire. But whether it is going to warm your hearth or burn down your house, you can never tell.
 Joan Crawford
tags: love5650 likesLike
Kahlil Gibran
If you love somebody, let them go, for if they return, they were always yours. If they don't, they never were.
 Kahlil Gibran
tags: life, love, romance5640 likesLike
Andrew  Boyd
Were all seeking that special person who is right for us. But if youve been through enough relationships, you begin to suspect theres no right person, just different flavors of wrong. Why is this? Because you yourself are wrong in some way, and you seek out partners who are wrong in some complementary way. But it takes a lot of living to grow fully into your own wrongness. And it isnt until you finally run up against your deepest demons, your unsolvable problemsthe ones that make you truly who you arethat were ready to find a lifelong mate. Only then do you finally know what youre looking for. Youre looking for the wrong person. But not just any wrong person: it's got to be the right wrong personsomeone you lovingly gaze upon and think, This is the problem I want to have.

I will find that special person who is wrong for me in just the right way.
 Andrew Boyd, Daily Afflictions: The Agony of Being Connected to Everything in the Universe
tags: being-loved, completion, inspirational, love, relationships5623 likesLike
And now these three remain: faith, hope and love. But the greatest of these is love.
 Anonymous, Holy Bible: King James Version
tags: faith, god, hope, love5591 likesLike
Kinky Friedman
My dear,
Find what you love and let it kill you.
Let it drain you of your all. Let it cling onto your back and weigh you down into eventual nothingness.
Let it kill you and let it devour your remains.
For all things will kill you, both slowly and fastly, but its much better to be killed by a lover.
~ Falsely yours
 Kinky Friedman
tags: death, love5582 likesLike
Nicholas Sparks
You are the answer to every prayer I've offered. You are a song, a dream, a whisper, and I don't know how I could have lived without you for as long as I have.
 Nicholas Sparks, The Notebook
tags: love5492 likesLike
Veronica Roth
I have something I need to tell you," he says. I run my fingers along the tendons in his hands and look back at him. "I might be in love with you." He smiles a little. "I'm waiting until I'm sure to tell you, though."
"That's sensible of you," I say, smiling too. "We should find some paper so you can make a list or a chart or something."
I feel his laughter against my side, his nose sliding along my jaw, his lips pressing my ear.
"Maybe I'm already sure," he says, "and I just don't want to frighten you."
I laugh a little. "Then you should know better."
"Fine," he says. "Then I love you.
 Veronica Roth, Divergent
tags: beatrice, divergent, humor, love, tobias5479 likesLike
Paulo Coelho
If pain must come, may it come quickly. Because I have a life to live, and I need to live it in the best way possible. If he has to make a choice, may he make it now. Then I will either wait for him or forget him.
 Paulo Coelho, By the River Piedra I Sat Down and Wept
tags: forgetting, hope, love, pain, suffering, waiting5364 likesLike
Suzanne Collins
I can feel Peeta press his forehead into my temple and he asks, 'So now that you've got me, what are you going to do with me?' I turn into him. 'Put you somewhere you can't get hurt.
 Suzanne Collins, The Hunger Games
tags: love, romance5361 likesLike
Rick Riordan
Be careful of love. It'll twist your brain around and leave you thinking up is down and right is wrong.
 Rick Riordan, The Battle of the Labyrinth
tags: love5241 likesLike
Kahlil Gibran
Let there be spaces in your togetherness, And let the winds of the heavens dance between you. Love one another but make not a bond of love: Let it rather be a moving sea between the shores of your souls. Fill each other's cup but drink not from one cup. Give one another of your bread but eat not from the same loaf. Sing and dance together and be joyous, but let each one of you be alone, Even as the strings of a lute are alone though they quiver with the same music. Give your hearts, but not into each other's keeping. For only the hand of Life can contain your hearts. And stand together, yet not too near together: For the pillars of the temple stand apart, And the oak tree and the cypress grow not in each other's shadow.
 Khalil Gibran, The Prophet
tags: love, marriage5193 likesLike
How many slams in an old screen door? Depends how loud you shut it. How many slices in a bread? Depends how thin you cut it. How much good inside a day? Depends how good you live 'em. How much love inside a friend? Depends how much you give 'em.
 Shel Silverstein
tags: friend, friendship, good-day, how-many, how-much, life, live-well, love5169 likesLike
James Baldwin
Love does not begin and end the way we seem to think it does. Love is a battle, love is a war; love is a growing up.
 James A. Baldwin
tags: love5138 likesLike
Pedro Caldern de la Barca
When love is not madness it is not love.
 Pedro Calderon de la Barca
tags: love, romance5086 likesLike
Nicholas Sparks
If you like her, if she makes you happy, and if you feel like you know her---then don't let her go.
 Nicholas Sparks, Message in a Bottle
tags: love5076 likesLike
Vincent van Gogh
It is good to love many things, for therein lies the true strength, and whosoever loves much performs much, and can accomplish much, and what is done in love is well done.
 Vincent Van Gogh
tags: art, inspiration, love, strength5054 likesLike
Gillian Anderson
Well, it seems to me that the best relationships - the ones that last - are frequently the ones that are rooted in friendship. You know, one day you look at the person and you see something more than you did the night before. Like a switch has been flicked somewhere. And the person who was just a friend is... suddenly the only person you can ever imagine yourself with.
 Gillian Anderson
tags: friendship, love, men, relationships, women4979 likesLike
Nicholas Sparks
I love you more than there are stars in the sky and fish in the sea.
 Nicholas Sparks
tags: love4903 likesLike
Nicholas Sparks
True love is rare, and it's the only thing that gives life real meaning.
 Nicholas Sparks, Message in a Bottle
tags: love, romance4895 likesLike
Cassandra Clare
Declarations of love amuse me. Especially when unrequited.
 Cassandra Clare, City of Bones
tags: clary-fray, jace-wayland, love4884 likesLike
Leo Tolstoy
I think... if it is true that
there are as many minds as there
are heads, then there are as many
kinds of love as there are hearts.
 Leo Tolstoy, Anna Karenina
tags: care, diversity, heart, individuality, love, mind, seduction, soul4883 likesLike
Max Lucado
A woman's heart should be so hidden in God that a man has to seek Him just to find her.
 Max Lucado
tags: inspirational, love4879 likesLike
Richelle Mead
Do you think I'm pretty?
I think you're beautiful
Beautiful?
You are so beautiful, it hurts sometimes.
 Richelle Mead, Vampire Academy
tags: beauty, love4865 likesLike
Cassandra Clare
What's this?" he demanded, looking from Clary to his companions, as if they might know what she was doing there.
"It's a girl," Jace said,recovering his composure. "Surely you've seen girls before, Alec. Your sister Isabelle is one.
 Cassandra Clare, City of Bones
tags: humor, jace, love, mortal-instruments4861 likesLike
Lauren Oliver
I love you. Remember. They cannot take it
 Lauren Oliver, Delirium
tags: amor-deliria-nervosa, love4829 likesLike
Ernest Hemingway
The most painful thing is losing yourself in the process of loving someone too much, and forgetting that you are special too.
 Ernest Hemingway, Men Without Women
tags: love, pain, relationships, self4721 likesLike
Santosh Kalwar
I was smiling yesterday,I am smiling today and I will smile tomorrow.Simply because life is too short to cry for anything.
 Santosh Kalwar, Quote Me Everyday
tags: cry, inspirational, joke, love, romance, smile4668 likesLike
Charles Dickens
I loved her against reason, against promise, against peace, against hope, against happiness, against all discouragement that could be.
 Charles Dickens, Great Expectations
tags: love4654 likesLike
Robert Frost
Love is an irresistible desire to be irresistibly desired.
 Robert Frost
tags: love4649 likesLike

Love Quotes
Quotes tagged as "love" Showing 151-180 of 77,836
More smiling, less worrying. More compassion, less judgment. More blessed, less stressed. More love, less hate.
 Roy T. Bennett, The Light in the Heart
tags: authentic-living, being-positive, blessed, compassion, hate, inspiration, inspirational, inspirational-quotes, judgment, less-more, life, life-purpose, life-quotes, living, love, mind, motivation, optimism, optimistic, positive, positive-affirmation, positive-life, positive-thinking, smile, smiles, spirituality, stress, stressed, worry, worrying4710 likesLike
 
          
  
tags: love, 4566 likesLike
Emily Dickinson
If I can stop one heart from breaking, I shall not live in vain.
 Emily Dickinson
tags: life, love4539 likesLike
Agatha Christie
It is a curious thought, but it is only when you see people looking ridiculous that you realize just how much you love them. 
 Agatha Christie, Agatha Christie: An Autobiography
tags: love4518 likesLike
F. Scott Fitzgerald
I fell in love with her courage, her sincerity, and her flaming self respect. And it's these things I'd believe in, even if the whole world indulged in wild suspicions that she wasn't all she should be. I love her and it is the beginning of everything.
 F. Scott Fitzgerald
tags: love4496 likesLike
Jimi Hendrix
When the power of love overcomes the love of power, the world will know peace.
 Jimi Hendrix
tags: hippy, love, misattributed, peace, william-gladstone4483 likesLike
Bertrand Russell
Of all forms of caution, caution in love is perhaps the most fatal to true happiness.
 Bertrand Russell, The Conquest of Happiness
tags: happiness, love4478 likesLike
Mahatma Gandhi
Hate the sin, love the sinner.
 Mahatma Gandhi
tags: hate, love, religion, sin, sinners4398 likesLike
Be the reason someone smiles. Be the reason someone feels loved and believes in the goodness in people.
 Roy T. Bennett, The Light in the Heart
tags: being-human, goodness, human, human-nature, humanism, humanity, inspiration, inspirational, inspirational-attitude, inspirational-life, inspirational-quote, inspirational-quotes, inspire, inspiring, kindness, life, life-and-living, life-lessons, life-philosophy, life-quotes, living, love, optimism, optimistic, positive, positive-affirmation, positive-life, positive-thinking, smile, smiles4398 likesLike
Fyodor Dostoyevsky
What is hell? I maintain that it is the suffering of being unable to love.
 Fyodor Dostoevsky, The Brothers Karamazov
tags: hell, love, suffering4373 likesLike
J.K. Rowling
There was a clatter as the basilisk fangs cascaded out of Hermione's arms. Running at Ron, she flung them around his neck and kissed him full on the mouth. Ron threw away the fangs and broomstick he was holding and responded with such enthusiasm that he lifted Hermione off her feet.
"Is this the moment?" Harry asked weakly, and when nothing happened except that Ron and Hermione gripped each other still more firmly and swayed on the spot, he raised his voice. "OI! There's a war going on here!"
Ron and Hermione broke apart, their arms still around each other.
"I know, mate," said Ron, who looked as though he had recently been hit on the back of the head with a Bludger, "so it's now or never, isn't it?"
"Never mind that, what about the Horcrux?" Harry shouted. "D'you think you could just --- just hold it in, until we've got the diadem?"
"Yeah --- right --- sorry ---" said Ron, and he and Hermione set about gathering up fangs, both pink in the face.
 J.K. Rowling, Harry Potter and the Deathly Hallows
tags: love, romance, war4354 likesLike
All I ever wanted was to reach out and touch another human being not just with my hands but with my heart.
 Tahereh Mafi, Shatter Me
tags: compassion, empathy, loneliness, love4351 likesLike
Pablo Neruda
Well, now
If little by little you stop loving me
I shall stop loving you
Little by little
If suddenly you forget me
Do not look for me
For I shall already have forgotten you

If you think it long and mad the wind of banners that passes through my life
And you decide to leave me at the shore of the heart where I have roots
Remember
That on that day, at that hour, I shall lift my arms
And my roots will set off to seek another land
 Pablo Neruda, Selected Poems
tags: forgetting, heartbreak, inspirational, living, love, moving-on4345 likesLike
Victor Hugo
What Is Love? I have met in the streets a very poor young man who was in love. His hat was old, his coat worn, the water passed through his shoes and the stars through his soul
 Victor Hugo , Les Misrables
tags: love, soul, stars4329 likesLike
C. JoyBell C.
We have to allow ourselves to be loved by the people who really love us, the people who really matter. Too much of the time, we are blinded by our own pursuits of people to love us, people that don't even matter, while all that time we waste and the people who do love us have to stand on the sidewalk and watch us beg in the streets! It's time to put an end to this. It's time for us to let ourselves be loved.
 C. JoyBell C.
tags: growing, humanity, inspirational, inspirational-life, inspirational-love, inspirational-quotes, learning, life-and-living, life-lessons, love, people, real-love, reality, reality-of-life, those-who-love-us, to-be-loved, true-love, what-matters4324 likesLike
Charles Bukowski
Find what you love and let it kill you.
 Charles Bukowski
tags: love4315 likesLike
Nicholas Sparks
The greater the love, the greater the tragedy when it's over.
 Nicholas Sparks, Nights in Rodanthe
tags: love4257 likesLike
Bob Marley
One love, one heart, one destiny.
 Robert Marley
tags: bob-marley, compassion, destiny, heart, humanity, inspirational, love4230 likesLike
Friedrich Nietzsche
The man of knowledge must be able not only to love his enemies but also to hate his friends.
 Friedrich Nietzsche
tags: enemies, friends, friendship, hatred, intelligence, knowledge, love, wisdom4216 likesLike
Bob Marley
If she's amazing, she won't be easy. If she's easy, she won't be amazing. If she's worth it, you wont give up. If you give up, you're not worthy. ... Truth is, everybody is going to hurt you; you just gotta find the ones worth suffering for.
 Bob Marley, Guitar Chord Songbook - Bob Marley
tags: inspirational, love4208 likesLike
Jodi Picoult
If you gave someone your heart and they died, did they take it with them? Did you spend the rest of forever with a hole inside you that couldn't be filled?
 Jodi Picoult, Nineteen Minutes
tags: death, heart, love4204 likesLike
E.M. Forster
It isn't possible to love and part. You will wish that it was. You can transmute love, ignore it, muddle it, but you can never pull it out of you. I know by experience that the poets are right: love is eternal.
 E.M. Forster, A Room with a View
tags: love, poets, romance4173 likesLike
Charles Dickens
Never close your lips to those whom you have already opened your heart.
 Charles Dickens
tags: kissing, love, romance4173 likesLike
It's not the face, but the expressions on it. It's not the voice, but what you say. It's not how you look in that body, but the thing you do with it. You are beautiful.
 Stephenie Meyer, The Host
tags: inspirational, love4162 likesLike
J.K. Rowling
Things we lose have a way of coming back to us in the end, if not always in the way we expect.
 JK Rowling, Harry Potter and the Order of the Phoenix
tags: death, love4161 likesLike
Clive Barker
Any fool can be happy. It takes a man with real heart to make beauty out of the stuff that makes us weep.
 Clive Barker, Abarat: Days of Magic, Nights of War
tags: art, inspirational, love, redemption, sadness4116 likesLike
Edna St. Vincent Millay
They say when you are missing someone that they are probably feeling the same, but I don't think it's possible for you to miss me as much as I'm missing you right now
 Edna St. Vincent Millay
tags: longing, love, missing, sadness4030 likesLike
Virginia Woolf
One cannot think well, love well, sleep well, if one has not dined well.
 Virginia Woolf, A Room of One's Own
tags: food, love4020 likesLike
Pablo Neruda
I want
To do with you what spring does with the cherry trees.
 Pablo Neruda, Twenty Love Poems and a Song of Despair
tags: love4009 likesLike
Maya Angelou
Have enough courage to trust love one more time and always one more time.
 Maya Angelou
tags: courage, love, trust4003 likesLike

Love Quotes
Quotes tagged as "love" Showing 181-210 of 77,836
Antoine de Saint-Exupry
It is the time you have wasted for your rose that makes your rose so important.
 Antoine de Saint-Exupry, The Little Prince
tags: caring, inspirational, love, roses, time4066 likesLike
C.S. Lewis
Love is not affectionate feeling, but a steady wish for the loved person's ultimate good as far as it can be obtained.
 C.S. Lewis
tags: love4027 likesLike
Sarah Dessen
You know, when it works, love is pretty amazing. It's not overrated. There's a reason for all those songs.
 Sarah Dessen, This Lullaby
tags: love4008 likesLike
Tom Robbins
We waste time looking for the perfect lover, instead of creating the perfect love.
 Tom Robbins
tags: love, sex4004 likesLike
Albert Einstein
Gravitation is not responsible for people falling in love.
 Albert Einstein
tags: love3993 likesLike
To me, Fearless is not the absense of fear. It's not being completely unafraid. To me, Fearless is having fears. Fearless is having doubts. Lots of them. To me, Fearless is living in spite of those things that scare you to death.
 Taylor Swift
tags: fearless, inspirational, love3965 likesLike
Scott Adams
I love you like a fat kid loves cake!
 Scott Adams
tags: food, humor, love3950 likesLike
Margaret Atwood
I would like to be the air that inhabits you for a moment only. I would like to be that unnoticed and that necessary.
 Margaret Atwood
tags: love, obsession, sleep3935 likesLike
Nicholas Sparks
And when her lips met mine, I knew that I could live to be a hundred and visit every country in the world, but nothing would ever compare to that single moment when I first kissed the girl of my dreams and knew that my love would last forever.
 Nicholas Sparks, Dear John
tags: bestseller, love, nicholas-sparks, north-carolina, novel3911 likesLike
J.R. Ward
Welcome to the wonderful world of jealousy, he thought. For the price of admission, you get a splitting headache, a nearly irresistable urge to commit murder, and an inferiority complex. Yippee.
 J.R. Ward, Dark Lover
tags: humor, jealousy, love3902 likesLike
Markus Zusak
He does something to me, that boy. Every time. Its his only detriment. He steps on my heart. He makes me cry.
 Markus Zusak, The Book Thief
tags: heartbreak, love, sad3896 likesLike
Coco Chanel
Its probably not just by chance that Im alone. It would be very hard for a man to live with me, unless hes terribly strong. And if hes stronger than I, Im the one who cant live with him.  Im neither smart nor stupid, but I dont think Im a run-of-the-mill person. Ive been in business without being a businesswoman, Ive loved without being a woman made only for love. The two men Ive loved, I think, will remember me, on earth or in heaven, because men always remember a woman who caused them concern and uneasiness. Ive done my best, in regard to people and to life, without precepts, but with a taste for justice.
 Coco Chanel
tags: autonomy, bachelorhood, empowerment, freedom, independence, individuality, love, marriage, matrimony, men, self-determination, self-sufficiency, singles, strength, women3895 likesLike
Pablo Neruda
As if you were on fire from within.

The moon lives in the lining of your skin.
 Pablo Neruda
tags: beauty, inner-beauty, love, passion3892 likesLike
Pablo Neruda
Tonight I can write the saddest lines
I loved her, and sometimes she loved me too.
 Pablo Neruda, Twenty Love Poems and a Song of Despair
tags: love, sadness3839 likesLike
Paulo Coelho
Love is an untamed force. When we try to control it, it destroys us. When we try to imprison it, it enslaves us. When we try to understand it, it leaves us feeling lost and confused.
 Paulo Coelho
tags: love3823 likesLike
Stewart O'Nan
You couldn't relive your life, skipping the awful parts, without losing what made it worthwhile. You had to accept it as a whole--like the world, or the person you loved.
 Stewart O'Nan, The Odds: A Love Story
tags: acceptance, life, love, worth3820 likesLike
Look after my heart - I've left it with you.
 Stephenie Meyer, Eclipse
tags: bella, edward, love, twilight-saga3808 likesLike
Hunter S. Thompson
We are all alone, born alone, die alone, andin spite of True Romance magazineswe shall all someday look back on our lives and see that, in spite of our company, we were alone the whole way. I do not say lonelyat least, not all the timebut essentially, and finally, alone. This is what makes your self-respect so important, and I don't see how you can respect yourself if you must look in the hearts and minds of others for your happiness.
 Hunter S. Thompson, The Proud Highway: Saga of a Desperate Southern Gentleman, 1955-1967
tags: alone, birth, death, growing-up, growth, life, lonely, love, self-respect3805 likesLike
Love is a temporary madness, it erupts like volcanoes and then subsides. And when it subsides, you have to make a decision. You have to work out whether your roots have so entwined together that it is inconceivable that you should ever part. Because this is what love is. Love is not breathlessness, it is not excitement, it is not the promulgation of promises of eternal passion, it is not the desire to mate every second minute of the day, it is not lying awake at night imagining that he is kissing every cranny of your body. No, don't blush, I am telling you some truths. That is just being "in love", which any fool can do. Love itself is what is left over when being in love has burned away, and this is both an art and a fortunate accident.
 Shawn Slovo, Captain Corelli's Mandolin
tags: love3800 likesLike
Nicholas Sparks
Life, he realize, was much like a song. In the beginning there is mystery, in the end there is confirmation, but it's in the middle where all the emotion resides to make the whole thing worthwhile.
 Nicholas Sparks, The Last Song
tags: life, love, music, simile, song3792 likesLike
Milan Kundera
You can't measure the mutual affection of two human beings by the number of words they exchange.
 Milan Kundera
tags: love3763 likesLike
A.A. Milne
How do you spell 'love'?" - Piglet
"You don't spell it...you feel it." - Pooh
 A.A. Milne
tags: love, piglet, pooh-bear, winnie-the-pooh3759 likesLike
Jon Krakauer
Happiness [is] only real when shared
 Jon Krakauer, Into the Wild
tags: family, happiness, inspirational, love, marriage3745 likesLike
Pablo Neruda
I crave your mouth, your voice, your hair.
Silent and starving, I prowl through the streets.
Bread does not nourish me, dawn disrupts me, all day
I hunt for the liquid measure of your steps.

I hunger for your sleek laugh,
your hands the color of a savage harvest,
hunger for the pale stones of your fingernails,
I want to eat your skin like a whole almond.

I want to eat the sunbeam flaring in your lovely body,
the sovereign nose of your arrogant face,
I want to eat the fleeting shade of your lashes,

and I pace around hungry, sniffing the twilight,
hunting for you, for your hot heart,
Like a puma in the barrens of Quitratue.
 Pablo Neruda
tags: love, poetry3740 likesLike
Thomas Merton
The beginning of love is the will to let those we love be perfectly themselves, the resolution not to twist them to fit our own image. If in loving them we do not love what they are, but only their potential likeness to ourselves, then we do not love them: we only love the reflection of ourselves we find in them
 Thomas Merton, No Man Is an Island
tags: friendship, love, self-discovery, trust, truth3732 likesLike
Mary Oliver
Someone I loved once gave me a box full of darkness. It took me years to understand that this too, was a gift.
 Mary Oliver
tags: box, darkness, gift, love3713 likesLike
Suzanne Collins
And then he gives me a smile that just seems so genuinely sweet with just the right touch of shyness that unexpected warmth rushes through me.
 Suzanne Collins, The Hunger Games
tags: hunger-games, katniss-everdeen, love, peeta-mellark, smile, suzanne-collins3702 likesLike
Ernest Hemingway
Maybe...you'll fall in love with me all over again."
"Hell," I said, "I love you enough now. What do you want to do? Ruin me?"
"Yes. I want to ruin you."
"Good," I said. "That's what I want too.
 Ernest Hemingway, A Farewell to Arms
tags: infatuation, love3676 likesLike
F. Scott Fitzgerald
I wasn't actually in love, but I felt a sort of tender curiosity.
 F. Scott Fitzgerald, The Great Gatsby
tags: affection, amity, love3671 likesLike
Deborah Reber
Letting go doesn't mean that you don't care about someone anymore. It's just realizing that the only person you really have control over is yourself.
 Deborah Reber, Chicken Soup for the Teenage Soul
tags: acceptance, letting-go, love, moving-on3631 likesLike

Love Quotes
Quotes tagged as "love" Showing 211-240 of 77,836
Before you, Bella, my life was like a moonless night. Very dark, but there were stars, points of light and reason. ...And then you shot across my sky like a meteor. Suddenly everything was on fire; there was brilliancy, there was beauty. When you were gone, when the meteor had fallen over the horizon, everything went black. Nothing had changed, but my eyes were blinded by the light. I couldnt see the stars anymore. And there was no more reason, for anything.
 Stephenie Meyer, New Moon
tags: edward, light, love, reason3604 likesLike
Lisa Schroeder
Was it hard?" I ask.
Letting go?"

Not as hard as holding on to something that wasn't real.
 Lisa Schroeder
tags: heartbreak, life, love3587 likesLike
Markus Zusak
A DEFINITION NOT FOUND
IN THE DICTIONARY
Not leaving: an act of trust and love,
often deciphered by children
 Markus Zusak, The Book Thief
tags: children, love3573 likesLike
Rumi
When I am with you, we stay up all night.
When you're not here, I can't go to sleep.
Praise God for those two insomnias!
And the difference between them.
 Rumi
tags: love3562 likesLike
David Byrne
Sometimes it's a form of love just to talk to somebody that you have nothing in common with and still be fascinated by their presence.
 David Byrne
tags: love3560 likesLike
Cassandra Clare
I could not tell you if I loved you the first moment I saw you, or if it was the second or third or fourth. But I remember the first moment I looked at you walking toward me and realized that somehow the rest of the world seemed to vanish when I was with you.
 Cassandra Clare, Clockwork Prince
tags: devotion, love, love-at-first-sight, true-love3552 likesLike
Jos N. Harris
Tears shed for another person are not a sign of weakness. They are a sign of a pure heart.
 Jos N. Harris, MI VIDA: A Story of Faith, Hope and Love
tags: grief, grieving, hope, loss, love, pain, sadness, strength, tears3517 likesLike
Haruki Murakami
Anyone who falls in love is searching for the missing pieces of themselves. So anyone who's in love gets sad when they think of their lover. It's like stepping back inside a room you have fond memories of, one you haven't seen in a long time.
 Murakami, Haruki
tags: love3492 likesLike
Chuck Klosterman
Art and love are the same thing: Its the process of seeing yourself in things that are not you.
 Chuck Klosterman, Killing Yourself to Live: 85% of a True Story
tags: art, love, profound3482 likesLike
Charles Bukowski
I loved you like a man loves a woman he never touches, only writes to, keeps little photographs of.
 Charles Bukowski, Love Is a Dog from Hell
tags: love3477 likesLike
Karen Marie Moning
One day you will kiss a man you can't breathe without, and find that breath is of little consequence.
 Karen Marie Moning, Bloodfever
tags: kiss, love3472 likesLike
A.A. Milne
Promise me you'll never forget me because if I thought you would, I'd never leave.
 A.A. Milne
tags: goodbyes, love3450 likesLike
Carl Sagan
Every one of us is, in the cosmic perspective, precious. If a human disagrees with you, let him live. In a hundred billion galaxies, you will not find another.
 Carl Sagan, Cosmos
tags: humanity, individuality, love, mercy3438 likesLike
Veronica Roth
Then I realize what it is. It's him. Something about him makes me feel like I am about to fall. Or turn to liquid. Or burst into flames.
 Veronica Roth, Divergent
tags: love3380 likesLike
Sharon Salzberg
You yourself, as much as anybody in the entire universe, deserve your love and affection
 Sharon Salzberg
tags: inspiration, life, love, self-acceptance, self-esteem, wisdom3374 likesLike
Haruki Murakami
Sometimes when I look at you, I feel I'm gazing at a distant star.
It's dazzling, but the light is from tens of thousands of years ago.
Maybe the star doesn't even exist any more. Yet sometimes that light seems more real to me than anything.
 Haruki Murakami, South of the Border, West of the Sun
tags: longing, love3374 likesLike
Jeaniene Frost
I'm saying that I'm a moody, insecure, narrow-minded, jealous, borderline homicidal bitch, and I want you to promise me that you're okay with that, because it's who I am, and you're what I need.
 Jeaniene Frost, Halfway to the Grave
tags: humor, love3363 likesLike
Emily Bront
Be with me always - take any form - drive me mad! only do not leave me in this abyss, where I cannot find you! Oh, God! it is unutterable! I can not live without my life! I can not live without my soul!
 Emily Bront, Wuthering Heights
tags: love3329 likesLike
Kurt Vonnegut Jr.
A purpose of human life, no matter who is controlling it, is to love whoever is around to be loved.
 Kurt Vonnegut, The Sirens of Titan
tags: life, love3321 likesLike
F. Scott Fitzgerald
I'm not sentimental--I'm as romantic as you are. The idea, you know,
is that the sentimental person thinks things will last--the romantic
person has a desperate confidence that they won't.
 F. Scott Fitzgerald, This Side of Paradise
tags: love, romance, romantic, sentimentality3310 likesLike
Markus Zusak
She leaned down and looked at his lifeless face and Leisel kissed her best friend, Rudy Steiner, soft and true on his lips. He tasted dusty and sweet. He tasted like regret in the shadows of trees and in the glow of the anarchist's suit collection. She kissed him long and soft, and when she pulled herself away, she touched his mouth with her fingers...She did not say goodbye. She was incapable, and after a few more minutes at his side, she was able to tear herself from the ground. It amazes me what humans can do, even when streams are flowing down their faces and they stagger on...
 Markus Zusak, The Book Thief
tags: love, the-book-thief3281 likesLike
Nicholas Sparks
The saddest people I've ever met in life are the ones who don't care deeply about anything at all. Passion and satisfaction go hand in hand, and without them, any happiness is only temporary, because there's nothing to make it last.
 Nicholas Sparks, Dear John
tags: life, love, passion3227 likesLike
David Mitchell
A half-read book is a half-finished love affair.
 David Mitchell, Cloud Atlas
tags: books, love, reading3225 likesLike
Oscar Wilde
To love oneself is the beginning of a lifelong romance.
 Oscar Wilde, An Ideal Husband
tags: love3224 likesLike
Nicholas Sparks
If conversation was the lyrics, laughter was the music, making time spent together a melody that could be replayed over and over without getting stale.
 Nicholas Sparks
tags: love, nicholas-sparks, relationships, the-choice3214 likesLike
Top 15 Things Money Cant Buy
Time. Happiness. Inner Peace. Integrity. Love. Character. Manners. Health. Respect. Morals. Trust. Patience. Class. Common sense. Dignity.
 Roy T. Bennett, The Light in the Heart
tags: character, class, common-sense, dignity, happiness, health, inner-peace, inspiration, inspirational, inspirational-quotes, integrity, life, life-quotes, love, manners, money, morals, patience, respect, time, trust3189 likesLike
Veronica Roth
I fell in love with him. But I don't just stay with him by default as if there's no one else available to me. I stay with him because I choose to, every day that I wake up, every day that we fight or lie to each other or disappoint each other. I choose him over and over again, and he chooses me.
 Veronica Roth, Allegiant
tags: agency, choices, love3179 likesLike
Leo Tolstoy
Respect was invented to cover the empty place where love should be.
 Leo Tolstoy, Anna Karenina
tags: love, respect3155 likesLike
Orhan Pamuk
Happiness is holding someone in your arms and knowing you hold the whole world.
 Orhan Pamuk, Snow
tags: happiness, love3152 likesLike
Cassandra Clare
You could have fooled me. Everytime I called you, Luke said you were sick. I figured you were avoiding me. Again."
"I wasn't. I did want to talk to you. I've been thinking about you all the time."
"I've been thinking about you, too."
"I really was sick. I swear. I almost died back there on the ship, you know."
"I know. Everytime you almost die, I almost die myself.
 Cassandra Clare, City of Ashes
tags: die, love, romance3143 likesLike

Love Quotes
Quotes tagged as "love" Showing 241-270 of 77,836
Even if you cannot change all the people around you, you can change the people you choose to be around. Life is too short to waste your time on people who dont respect, appreciate, and value you. Spend your life with people who make you smile, laugh, and feel loved.
 Roy T. Bennett, The Light in the Heart
tags: appreciate, change, happiness, inspiration, inspirational, inspirational-attitude, inspirational-life, inspirational-quotes, inspire, inspiring, laugh, life, life-and-living, life-lessons, life-quotes, living, love, optimism, optimistic, positive, positive-affirmation, positive-life, positive-thinking, relationship, respect, smile, value3255 likesLike
Sylvia Plath
Yes, I was infatuated with you: I am still. No one has ever heightened such a keen capacity of physical sensation in me. I cut you out because I couldn't stand being a passing fancy. Before I give my body, I must give my thoughts, my mind, my dreams. And you weren't having any of those.
 Sylvia Plath, The Unabridged Journals of Sylvia Plath
tags: dreams, infatuation, love, sensation, thoughts3134 likesLike
Dodie Smith
There is only one page left to write on. I will fill it with words of only one syllable. I love. I have loved. I will love.
 Dodie Smith, I Capture the Castle
tags: love3114 likesLike
C.S. Lewis
I'm on Aslan's side even if there isn't any Aslan to lead it. I'm going to live as like a Narnian as I can even if there isn't any Narnia.
 C.S. Lewis, The Silver Chair
tags: hell, love, safe3108 likesLike
I'm oxygen and he's dying to breathe.
 Tahereh Mafi, Shatter Me
tags: beautiful, couples, kiss, love, metaphor, need, ya3097 likesLike
Antoine de Saint-Exupry
People have forgotten this truth," the fox said. "But you mustnt forget it. You become responsible forever for what youve tamed. Youre responsible for your rose.
 Antoine de Saint-Exupry, The Little Prince
tags: friendship, love, responsibility3075 likesLike
Oscar Wilde
Who, being loved, is poor?
 Oscar Wilde
tags: love3068 likesLike
Nicholas Sparks
In time, the hurt began to fade and it was easier to just let it go. At least I thought it was. But in every boy I met in the next few years, I found myself looking for you, and when the feelings got too strong, I'd write you another letter. But I never sent them for fear of what I might find. By then, you'd gone on with your life and I didn't want to think about you loving someone else. I wanted to remember us like we were that summer. I didn't ever want to lose that.
 Nicholas Sparks, The Notebook
tags: love3067 likesLike
Caitlyn Siehl
Do not fall in love with people like me.
I will take you to museums, and parks, and monuments, and kiss you in every beautiful place, so that you can never go back to them without tasting me like blood in your mouth.
I will destroy you in the most beautiful way possible. And when I leave you will finally understand, why storms are named after people.
 Caitlyn Siehl, Literary Sexts: A Collection of Short & Sexy Love Poems
tags: beautiful, blood, kiss, life, love, mouth, museums, parks3049 likesLike
Lemony Snicket
Love can change a person the way a parent can change a baby- awkwardly, and often with a great deal of mess.
 Lemony Snicket, Horseradish
tags: babies, change, humor, love, parents3045 likesLike
Brian Andreas
I read once that the ancient Egyptians had fifty words for sand & the Eskimos had a hundred words for snow. I wish I had a thousand words for love, but all that comes to mind is the way you move against me while you sleep & there are no words for that.
 Brian Andreas, Story People: Selected Stories & Drawings of Brian Andreas
tags: inspiration, love, story-people2998 likesLike
Nicholas Sparks
The reason it hurts so much to separate is because our souls are connected. Maybe they always have been and will be. Maybe we've lived a thousand lives before this one and in each of them we've found each other. And maybe each time, we've been forced apart for the same reasons. That means that this goodbye is both a goodbye for the past ten thousand years and a prelude to what will come.
 Nicholas Sparks, The Notebook
tags: goodbye, inspiration, love2991 likesLike
John Updike
It is easy to love people in memory; the hard thing is to love them when they are there in front of you.
 John Updike, My Father's Tears and Other Stories
tags: love2987 likesLike
Elie Wiesel
Friendship marks a life even more deeply than love. Love risks degenerating into obsession, friendship is never anything but sharing.
 Elie Wiesel
tags: deep, friendship, life, love, obsession, sharing2987 likesLike
Sarah Dessen
I like flaws. I think they make things interesting.
 Sarah Dessen, The Truth About Forever
tags: life, love2978 likesLike
Mitch Albom
Lost love is still love. It takes a different form, that's all. You can't see their smile or bring them food or tousle their hair or move them around a dance floor. But when those senses weaken another heightens. Memory. Memory becomes your partner. You nurture it. You hold it. You dance with it.
 Mitch Albom
tags: love2971 likesLike
Suzanne Collins
Peeta, how come I never know when you're having a nightmare? I say.

I don't know. I don't think I cry out or thrash around or anything. I just come to, paralyzed with terror, he says.

You should wake me, I say, thinking about how I can interrupt his sleep two or three times on a bad night. About how long it can take to calm me down.

It's not necessary. My nightmares are usually about losing you, he says. I'm okay once I realize you're here.
 Suzanne Collins, Catching Fire
tags: catching-fire, katniss-and-peeta, katniss-everdeen, love, peeta-mellark, romance, the-hunger-games2965 likesLike
Chuck Palahniuk
You know how they say you only hurt the ones you love? Well, it works both ways.
 Chuck Palahniuk, Fight Club
tags: love2949 likesLike
Blaise Pascal
The heart has its reasons which reason knows not.
 Blaise Pascal
tags: heart, love, quip, reason2932 likesLike
Jonathan Safran Foer
Time was passing like a hand waving from a train I wanted to be on.
I hope you never have to think about anything as much as I think about you.
 jonathan safran foer
tags: desperate, life, losing, love, nostalgia, pain, regret, solitude2920 likesLike
Julio Cortzar
Come sleep with me: We won't make Love, Love will make us.
 Julio Cortzar
tags: love, poem, relationships, romance2916 likesLike
Arrigo Boito
When I saw you I fell in love, and you smiled because you knew.
 Arrigo Boito
tags: love2895 likesLike
Kahlil Gibran
Ever has it been that love knows not its own depth until the hour of separation.
 Kahlil Gibran
tags: emotion, heartbreak, lost-love, love, parting2887 likesLike
Henry Wadsworth Longfellow
The love of learning, the sequestered nooks,
And all the sweet serenity of books
 Henry Wadsworth Longfellow
tags: books, learning, love, serenity2882 likesLike
Nicholas Sparks
I fell in love with her when we were together, then fell deeper in love with her in the years we were apart.
 Nicholas Sparks, Dear John
tags: love, separation2876 likesLike
E.E. Cummings
Trust your heart if the seas catch fire, live by love though the stars walk backward.
 E.E. Cummings
tags: decisions, love, stars, taking-chances2872 likesLike
Stieg Larsson
What she had realized was that love was that moment when your heart was about to burst.
 Stieg Larsson, The Girl with the Dragon Tattoo
tags: adoration, infatuation, love2856 likesLike
Laurell K. Hamilton
I will love you always. When this red hair is white, I will still love you. When the smooth softness of youth is replaced by the delicate softness of age, I will still want to touch your skin. When your face is full of the lines of every smile you have ever smiled, of every surprise I have seen flash through your eyes, when every tear you have ever cried has left its mark upon your face,I will treasure you all the more, because I was there to see it all. I will share your life with you, Meredith, and I will love you until the last breath leaves your body or mine.
 Laurell K. Hamilton, A Lick of Frost
tags: inspirational, love, relationships2847 likesLike
Jamie McGuire
I know we're fucked up, alright? I'm impulsive, and hot tempered, and you get under my skin like no one else. You act like you hate me one minute, and then need me the next. I never get anything right, and I don't deserve you...but I fucking love you, Abby. I love you more than I loved anyone or anything ever. When you're around, I don't need booze, or money, or the fighting, or the one-night stands...
 Jamie McGuire, Beautiful Disaster
tags: love2846 likesLike
Nicholas Sparks
The emotion that can break your heart is sometimes the very one that heals it...
 Nicholas Sparks, At First Sight
tags: at-first-sight, emotions, healing, heartbreak, love, nicholas, nicholas-sparks, sparks2827 likesLike

Love Quotes
Quotes tagged as "love" Showing 271-300 of 77,836
Sophocles
One word
Frees us of all the weight and pain of life:
That word is love.
 Sophocles
tags: love, pain2907 likesLike
Edgar Allan Poe
From childhood's hour I have not been. As others were, I have not seen. As others saw, I could not awaken. My heart to joy at the same tone. And all I loved, I loved alone.
 Edgar Allan Poe
tags: heartache, loss, love2856 likesLike
Honor de Balzac
The more one judges, the less one loves.
 Honor de Balzac, Physiologie Du Mariage
tags: human-nature, love2835 likesLike
Rita Mae Brown
Sorrow is how we learn to love. Your heart isn't breaking. It hurts because it's getting larger. The larger it gets, the more love it holds.
 Rita Mae Brown, Riding Shotgun
tags: love2805 likesLike
Rainbow Rowell
Holding Eleanor's hand was like holding a butterfly. Or a heartbeat. Like holding something complete, and completely alive.
 Rainbow Rowell, Eleanor & Park
tags: friendship, high-school, love, relationships, sweet, teenage-love2805 likesLike
Eleanor Roosevelt
It takes courage to love, but pain through love is the purifying fire which those who love generously know. We all know people who are so much afraid of pain that they shut themselves up like clams in a shell and, giving out nothing, receive nothing and therefore shrink until life is a mere living death.
 Eleanor Roosevelt
tags: love2798 likesLike
Lauren Oliver
I guess thats just part of loving people: You have to give things up. Sometimes you even have to give them up.
 Lauren Oliver, Delirium
tags: give, love, sacrifice2778 likesLike
Erma Bombeck
When God Created Mothers"

When the Good Lord was creating mothers, He was into His sixth day of "overtime" when the angel appeared and said. "You're doing a lot of fiddling around on this one."

And God said, "Have you read the specs on this order?" She has to be completely washable, but not plastic. Have 180 moveable parts...all replaceable. Run on black coffee and leftovers. Have a lap that disappears when she stands up. A kiss that can cure anything from a broken leg to a disappointed love affair. And six pairs of hands."

The angel shook her head slowly and said. "Six pairs of hands.... no way."

It's not the hands that are causing me problems," God remarked, "it's the three pairs of eyes that mothers have to have."

That's on the standard model?" asked the angel. God nodded.

One pair that sees through closed doors when she asks, 'What are you kids doing in there?' when she already knows. Another here in the back of her head that sees what she shouldn't but what she has to know, and of course the ones here in front that can look at a child when he goofs up and say. 'I understand and I love you' without so much as uttering a word."

God," said the angel touching his sleeve gently, "Get some rest tomorrow...."

I can't," said God, "I'm so close to creating something so close to myself. Already I have one who heals herself when she is sick...can feed a family of six on one pound of hamburger...and can get a nine year old to stand under a shower."

The angel circled the model of a mother very slowly. "It's too soft," she sighed.

But tough!" said God excitedly. "You can imagine what this mother can do or endure."

Can it think?"

Not only can it think, but it can reason and compromise," said the Creator.

Finally, the angel bent over and ran her finger across the cheek.

There's a leak," she pronounced. "I told You that You were trying to put too much into this model."

It's not a leak," said the Lord, "It's a tear."

What's it for?"

It's for joy, sadness, disappointment, pain, loneliness, and pride."

You are a genius, " said the angel.

Somberly, God said, "I didn't put it there.
 Erma Bombeck, When God Created Mothers
tags: children, family, humor, love, mothers, mothers-day, sadness2745 likesLike
Rainer Maria Rilke
Therefore, dear Sir, love your solitude and try to sing out with the pain it causes you. For those who are near you are far away... and this shows that the space around you is beginning to grow vast.... be happy about your growth, in which of course you can't take anyone with you, and be gentle with those who stay behind; be confident and calm in front of them and don't torment them with your doubts and don't frighten them with your faith or joy, which they wouldn't be able to comprehend. Seek out some simple and true feeling of what you have in common with them, which doesn't necessarily have to alter when you yourself change again and again; when you see them, love life in a form that is not your own and be indulgent toward those who are growing old, who are afraid of the aloneness that you trust.... and don't expect any understanding; but believe in a love that is being stored up for you like an inheritance, and have faith that in this love there is a strength and a blessing so large that you can travel as far as you wish without having to step outside it.
 Rainer Maria Rilke, Letters to a Young Poet
tags: aloneness, change, common-ground, faith, love, loved-ones, relationships, solitude2708 likesLike
Elizabeth Gilbert
To be fully seen by somebody, then, and be loved anyhow - this is a human offering that can border on miraculous.
 Elizabeth Gilbert, Committed: A Skeptic Makes Peace with Marriage
tags: acceptance, being-loved, love, marriage, relationships, truth2683 likesLike
Rumi
In your light I learn how to love. In your beauty, how to make poems. You dance inside my chest where no-one sees you, but sometimes I do, and that sight becomes this art.
 Rumi
tags: love2662 likesLike
Johnny Depp
If someone were to harm my family or a friend or somebody I love, I would eat them. I might end up in jail for 500 years, but I would eat them.
 Johnny Depp
tags: humour, love2661 likesLike
Fannie Flagg
I wonder how many people don't get the one they want, but end up with the one they're supposed to be with.
 Fannie Flagg, Fried Green Tomatoes at the Whistle Stop Cafe
tags: couples, deep, dissapointment, fate, heart, inspirational, love, people, romance2660 likesLike
Mitch Albom
When someone is in your heart, they're never truly gone. They can come back to you, even at unlikely times.
 Mitch Albom, For One More Day
tags: love2655 likesLike
Rick Riordan
We're staying together," he promised. "You're not getting away from me. Never again.
 Rick Riordan, The Mark of Athena
tags: annabeth-chase, emotion, heartbreak, love, percy-jackson2638 likesLike
Melissa Marr
Sometimes love means letting go when you want to hold on tighter.
 Melissa Marr, Ink Exchange
tags: love2632 likesLike
Don't cry over someone who wouldn't cry over you.
 Lauren Conrad
tags: crying, heartache, love, sadness, tears2630 likesLike
Fred Rogers
When I say it's you I like, I'm talking about that part of you that knows that life is far more than anything you can ever see or hear or touch. That deep part of you that allows you to stand for those things without which humankind cannot survive. Love that conquers hate, peace that rises triumphant over war, and justice that proves more powerful than greed.
 Fred Rogers
tags: friends, friendship, love, peace2630 likesLike
Benjamin Alire Senz
I bet you could sometimes find all the mysteries of the universe in someone's hand.
 Benjamin Alire Senz, Aristotle and Dante Discover the Secrets of the Universe
tags: answers, love, true, universe2609 likesLike
Franois de La Rochefoucauld
Absence diminishes small loves and increases great ones, as the wind blows out the candle and fans the bonfire.
 Francois Duc de la Rochefoucauld, Maxims
tags: love2606 likesLike
Even
After
All this time
The Sun never says to the Earth,

"You owe me."

Look
What happens
With a love like that,
It lights the whole sky.
 Hafiz
tags: life, love, sky, sun2597 likesLike
Ellen Bass
to love life, to love it even
when you have no stomach for it
and everything you've held dear
crumbles like burnt paper in your hands,
your throat filled with the silt of it.
When grief sits with you, its tropical heat
thickening the air, heavy as water
more fit for gills than lungs;
when grief weights you like your own flesh
only more of it, an obesity of grief,
you think, How can a body withstand this?
Then you hold life like a face
between your palms, a plain face,
no charming smile, no violet eyes,
and you say, yes, I will take you
I will love you, again.
 Ellen Bass
tags: acceptance, hope, life, love2596 likesLike
Ive been fighting to be who I am all my life. Whats the point of being who I am, if I cant have the person who was worth all the fighting for?
 Stephanie Lennox, I Don't Remember You
tags: fighting, funny, humour, husband, inspirational, love, lover, relationships, romance, spiritual, sweet, wife2595 likesLike
Gayle Forman
If you stay, I'll do whatever you want. I'll quit the band, go with you to New York. But if you need me to go away, I'll do that, too. I was talking to Liz and she said maybe coming back to your old life would be too painful, that maybe it'd be easier for you to erase us. And that would suck, but I'd do it. I can lose you like that if I don't lose you today. I'll let you go. If you stay.
 Gayle Forman, If I Stay
tags: infatuation, life, love, self-sacrifice2589 likesLike
Steve Maraboli
I want to be in a relationship where you telling me you love me is just a ceremonious validation of what you already show me.
 Steve Maraboli, Life, the Truth, and Being Free
tags: action, being-loved, inspirational, life, love, relationships2583 likesLike
Victor Hugo
The power of a glance has been so much abused in love stories, that it has come to be disbelieved in. Few people dare now to say that two beings have fallen in love because they have looked at each other. Yet it is in this way that love begins, and in this way only.
 Victor Hugo, Les Misrables
tags: attraction, love2562 likesLike
Albert Einstein
When you trip over love, it is easy to get up. But when you fall in love, it is impossible to stand again.
 Albert Einstein
tags: love2557 likesLike
Becca Fitzpatrick
Being with you never felt wrong. It's the one thing I did right. You're the one thing I did right.
 Becca Fitzpatrick, Crescendo
tags: crescendo, love, patch2555 likesLike
Elizabeth Barrett Browning
How do I love thee? Let me count the ways.
I love thee to the depth and breadth and height
My soul can reach
 Elizabeth Barrett Browning
tags: love, sonnet2546 likesLike
Nicholas Sparks
Without you in my arms, I feel an emptiness in my soul. I find myself searching the crowds for your face - I know it's an impossibility, but I cannot help myself.
 Nicholas Sparks, Message in a Bottle
tags: grief, love2513 likesLike

Love Quotes
Quotes tagged as "love" Showing 301-330 of 77,836
Kiera Cass
True love is usually the most inconvenient kind.
 Kiera Cass, The Selection
tags: inconvenient, love, relationship, true-love2658 likesLike
Charles M. Schulz
Nothing takes the taste out of peanut butter quite like unrequited love.
 Charles M. Schulz
tags: humor, love2575 likesLike
Anne Sexton
Watch out for intellect,
because it knows so much it knows nothing
and leaves you hanging upside down,
mouthing knowledge as your heart
falls out of your mouth.
 Anne Sexton, The Complete Poems
tags: intellect, love, poetry2508 likesLike
Richelle Mead
Stop fighting me!" he said, trying to pull on the arm he held.

He was in a precarious position himself, straddling the rail as he tried to lean over far enough to get me and actually hold onto me.

Let go of me! I yelled back.

But he was too strong and managed to haul most of me over the rail, enough so that I wasnt in total danger of falling again.

See, heres the thing. In that moment before I let go, I really had been contemplating my death. Id come to terms with it and accepted it. I also, however, had known Dimitri might do something exactly like this. He was just that fast and that good. That was why I was holding my stake in the hand that was dangling free.

I looked him in the eye. "I will always love you."

Then I plunged the stake into his chest.

It wasnt as precise a blow as I would have liked, not with the skilled way he was dodging. I struggled to get the stake in deep enough to his heart, unsure if I could do it from this angle. Then, his struggles stopped. His eyes stared at me, stunned, and his lips parted, almost into a smile, albeit a grisly and pained one.

"Thats what I was supposed to say. . . he gasped out.

Those were his last words.
 Richelle Mead, Blood Promise
tags: blood, bridge, death, dhampir, dimitri, love, magic, promise, rose, stake, strigoi2505 likesLike
Jeanette Winterson
Youll get over it Its the clichs that cause the trouble. To lose someone you love is to alter your life for ever. You dont get over it because it is the person you loved. The pain stops, there are new people, but the gap never closes. How could it? The particularness of someone who mattered enough to grieve over is not made anodyne by death. This hole in my heart is in the shape of you and no-one else can fit it. Why would I want them to?
 Jeanette Winterson, Written on the Body
tags: loss, love2504 likesLike
David Nicholls
This is where it all begins. Everything starts here, today.
 David Nicholls, One Day
tags: hope, love2495 likesLike
The things we love destroy us every time, lad. Remember that.
 George R.R. Martin, A Game of Thrones
tags: love, mormont2470 likesLike
Elizabeth Gilbert
To lose balance sometimes for love is part of living a balanced
life.
 Elizabeth Gilbert, Eat, Pray, Love: One Woman's Search for Everything
tags: love2448 likesLike
Percy Bysshe Shelley
The sunlight claps the earth, and the moonbeams kiss the sea: what are all these kissings worth, if thou kiss not me?
 Percy Bysshe Shelley
tags: kiss, love, nature2447 likesLike
Haruki Murakami
I was always hungry for love. Just once, I wanted to know what it was like to get my fill of it -- to be fed so much love I couldn't take any more. Just once. 
 Haruki Murakami, Norwegian Wood
tags: love2437 likesLike
William Shakespeare
The course of true love never did run smooth.
 William Shakespeare, A Midsummer Night's Dream
tags: love, true-love2422 likesLike
Anas Nin
Throw your dreams into space like a kite, and you do not know what it will bring back, a new life, a new friend, a new love, a new country.
 Anais Nin
tags: dreams, life, love2391 likesLike
Rick Riordan
The world was collapsing, and the only thing that really mattered to me was that she was alive.
 Rick Riordan, The Last Olympian
tags: infatuation, love, obsession2383 likesLike
Jodi Picoult
You know it's never fifty-fifty in a marriage. It's always seventy-thirty, or sixty-forty. Someone falls in love first. Someone puts someone else up on a pedestal. Someone works very hard to keep things rolling smoothly; someone else sails along for the ride.
 Jodi Picoult, Mercy
tags: inequality, love, marriage2335 likesLike
Andr Breton
My wish is that you may be loved to the point of madness.
 Andr Breton, What Is Surrealism?: Selected Writings
tags: love, madness2316 likesLike
Mother Teresa
If we have no peace, it is because we have forgotten that we belong to each other.
 Mother Teresa
tags: compassion, connecting, humanity, inspirational, love, sharing2310 likesLike
Paulo Coelho
This is what we call love. When you are loved, you can do anything in creation. When you are loved, there's no need at all to understand what's happening, because everything happens within you.
 Paulo Coelho, The Alchemist
tags: love2310 likesLike
Chuck Palahniuk
If you love something set it free, but don't be surprised if it comes back with herpes.
 Chuck Palahniuk
tags: humor, love2300 likesLike
David Levithan
livid, adj.

Fuck You for cheating on me. Fuck you for reducing it to the word cheating. As if this were a card game, and you sneaked a look at my hand. Who came up with the term cheating, anyway? A cheater, I imagine. Someone who thought liar was too harsh. Someone who thought devastator was too emotional. The same person who thought, oops, hed gotten caught with his hand in the cookie jar. Fuck you. This isnt about slipping yourself an extra twenty dollars of Monopoly money. These are our lives. You went and broke our lives. You are so much worse than a cheater. You killed something. And you killed it when its back was turned.
 David Levithan, The Lover's Dictionary
tags: cheating, hate, infidelity, love2293 likesLike
Pablo Neruda
I love you as certain dark things are loved, secretly, between the shadow and the soul.
 Pablo Neruda, 100 Love Sonnets
tags: love, love-quotes2277 likesLike
Audrey Niffenegger
I won't ever leave you, even though you're always leaving me.
 Audrey Niffenegger, The Time Traveler's Wife
tags: heartbreak, love2271 likesLike
Sophie Kinsella
sometimes you don't need a goal in life, you don't need to know the big picture. you just need to know what you're going to do next!
 Sophie Kinsella, The Undomestic Goddess
tags: life, love, shopaholic, sophie2255 likesLike
I want to be the friend you fall hopelessly in love with. The one you take into your arms and into your bed and into the private world you keep trapped in your head. I want to be that kind of friend. The one who will memorize the things you say as well as the shape of your lips when you say them. I want to know every curve, every freckle, every shiver of your body.

I want to know where to touch you, I want to know how to touch you. I want to know convince you to design a smile just for me. Yes, I do want to be your friend. I want to be your best friend in the entire world.
 Tahereh Mafi, Unravel Me
tags: love2255 likesLike
Gabriel Garca Mrquez
sex is the consolation you have when you can't have love
 Gabriel Garca Mrquez
tags: desire, loneliness, love, lust, passion, sex2249 likesLike
Orson Scott Card
In the moment when I truly understand my enemy, understand him well enough to defeat him, then in that very moment I also love him. I think its impossible to really understand somebody, what they want, what they believe, and not love them the way they love themselves. And then, in that very moment when I love them.... I destroy them.
 Orson Scott Card, Ender's Game
tags: enemy, epiphany, hate, love, understanding2245 likesLike
Ted Hughes
The only calibration that counts is how much heart people invest, how much they ignore their fears of being hurt or caught out or humiliated. And the only thing people regret is that they didn't live boldly enough, that they didn't invest enough heart, didn't love enough. Nothing else really counts at all.
 Ted Hughes, Letters of Ted Hughes
tags: fear, heart, love, regret2239 likesLike
The bond forged between us was not one that could be broken by absence, distance, or time. And no matter how much more special or beautiful or brilliant or perfect than me he might be, he was as irreversibly altered as I was. As I would always belong to him, so would he always be mine.
 Stephenie Meyer, New Moon
tags: bella, edward, love2236 likesLike
Susan Polis Schutz
Love is . . . Being happy for the other person when they are happy, Being sad for the person when they are sad, Being together in good times, And being together in bad times.
LOVE IS THE SOURCE OF STRENGTH.

Love is . . . Being honest with yourself at all times, Being honest with the other person at all times, Telling, listening, respecting the truth, And never pretending.
LOVE IS THE SOURCE OF REALITY.

Love is . . . An understanding so complete that you feel as if you are a part of the other person, Accepting the other person just the way they are, And not trying to change them to be something else.
LOVE IS THE SOURCE OF UNITY.

Love is . . . The freedom to pursue your own desires while sharing your experiences with the other person, The growth of one individual alongside of and together with the growth of another individual.
LOVE IS THE SOURCE OF SUCCESS.

Love is . . . The excitement of planning things together, The excitement of doing things together.
LOVE IS THE SOURCE OF THE FUTURE.
Love is . . . The fury of the storm, The calm in the rainbow.
LOVE IS THE SOURCE OF PASSION.

Love is . . . Giving and taking in a daily situation, Being patient with each other's needs and desires.
LOVE IS THE SOURCE OF SHARING.

Love is . . . Knowing that the other person will always be with you regardless of what happens, Missing the other person when they are away but remaining near in heart at all times.
LOVE IS THE SOURCE OF SECURITY.
LOVE IS . . . THE SOURCE OF LIFE!
 Susan Polis Schutz
tags: love2227 likesLike
Emily Bront
If he loved with all the powers of his puny being, he couldn't love as much in eighty years as I could in a day.
 Emily Bront, Wuthering Heights
tags: ardor, classic, heathcliff, love2223 likesLike
Greg Behrendt
I'm about to make a wild, extreme and severe relationship rule: the word busy is a load of crap and is most often used by assholes. The word "busy" is the relationship Weapon of Mass Destruction. It seems like a good excuse, but in fact in every silo you uncover, all you're going to find is a man who didn't care enough to call. Remember men are never to busy to get what they want.
 Greg Behrendt
tags: behrendt, call, dating, faith, greg, he-s-not-just-into-you, love, marriage, romance, true, true-love, truth2220 likesLike

Love Quotes
Quotes tagged as "love" Showing 331-360 of 77,836
Toni Morrison
You think because he doesn't love you that you are worthless. You think that because he doesn't want you anymore that he is right -- that his judgement and opinion of you are correct. If he throws you out, then you are garbage. You think he belongs to you because you want to belong to him. Don't. It's a bad word, 'belong.' Especially when you put it with somebody you love. Love shouldn't be like that. Did you ever see the way the clouds love a mountain? They circle all around it; sometimes you can't even see the mountain for the clouds. But you know what? You go up top and what do you see? His head. The clouds never cover the head. His head pokes through, beacuse the clouds let him; they don't wrap him up. They let him keep his head up high, free, with nothing to hide him or bind him. You can't own a human being. You can't lose what you don't own. Suppose you did own him. Could you really love somebody who was absolutely nobody without you? You really want somebody like that? Somebody who falls apart when you walk out the door? You don't, do you? And neither does he. You're turning over your whole life to him. Your whole life, girl. And if it means so little to you that you can just give it away, hand it to him, then why should it mean any more to him? He can't value you more than you value yourself.
 Toni Morrison
tags: emotion, love, self-respect, value2499 likesLike
John Henry Newman
I sought to hear the voice of God and climbed the topmost steeple, but God declared: "Go down again - I dwell among the people.
 John Henry Newman
tags: god, inspirational, love2305 likesLike
Elinor Glyn
Romance is the glamour which turns the dust of everyday life into a golden haze. 
 Elinor Glyn
tags: inspiration, love, romance2231 likesLike
Charlotte Bront
I am not an angel,' I asserted; 'and I will not be one till I die: I will be myself. Mr. Rochester, you must neither expect nor exact anything celestial of me - for you will not get it, any more than I shall get it of you: which I do not at all anticipate.
 Charlotte Bront, Jane Eyre
tags: character, empowerment, flaws, freedom, gender, ideal-woman, identity, image, independence, integrity, love, men, realism, romance, self-awareness, self-determination, women2200 likesLike
Neil Gaiman
In a perfect world, you could fuck people without giving them a piece of your heart. And every glittering kiss and every touch of flesh is another shard of heart youll never see again.
 Neil Gaiman, Fragile Things: Short Fictions and Wonders
tags: love, sex2200 likesLike
Fyodor Dostoyevsky
The soul is healed by being with children.
 Fyodor Dostoevsky
tags: children, healing, humility, inspiration, love, openness, society2198 likesLike
Rita Mae Brown
About all you can do in life is be who you are. Some people will love you for you. Most will love you for what you can do for them, and some won't like you at all.
 Rita Mae Brown
tags: be-yourself, individuality, love2197 likesLike
Elizabeth Gilbert
Someday you're gonna look back on this moment of your life as such a sweet time of grieving. You'll see that you were in mourning and your heart was broken, but your life was changing...
 Elizabeth Gilbert
tags: heartbreak, love, mourning2194 likesLike
D.H. Lawrence
For my part, I prefer my heart to be broken. It is so lovely, dawn-kaleidoscopic within the crack.
 D.H. Lawrence
tags: broken-heart, d-h-lawrence, love, pomegranate2190 likesLike
We are not trapped or locked up in these bones. No, no. We are free to change. And love changes us. And if we can love one another, we can break open the sky.
 Walter Mosley, Blue Light
tags: change, growth, love2175 likesLike
Diana Gabaldon
For where all love is, the speaking is unnecessary
 Diana Gabaldon, Outlander
tags: love2168 likesLike
Chuck Palahniuk
Ok. You fuck me, then snub me. You love me, you hate me. You show me a sensitive side, then you turn into a total asshole. Is this a pretty accurate description of our relationship.
 Chuck Palahniuk, Fight Club
tags: love2161 likesLike
Suzanne Collins
Sometimes when I'm alone, I take the pearl from where it lives in my pocket and try to remember the boy with the bread, the strong arms that warded off nightmares on the train, the kisses in the arena.
 Suzanne Collins, Mockingjay
tags: katniss, love, mockingjay, peeta, romance2153 likesLike
E.L. James
You have to kiss a lot of frogs before you find your prince
 E.L. James, Fifty Shades of Grey
tags: love2139 likesLike
William Shakespeare
Don't waste your love on somebody, who doesn't value it.
 William Shakespeare, Romeo and Juliet
tags: love, romeo-and-juliet, values, waste2133 likesLike
Paulo Coelho
When we meet someone and fall in love, we have a sense that the whole universe is on our side. And yet if something goes wrong, there is nothing left! How is it possible for the beauty that was there only minutes before to vanish so quickly? Life moves very fast. It rushes from heaven to hell in a matter of seconds.
 Paulo Coelho, Eleven Minutes
tags: love2132 likesLike
Kate Mosse
We are who we are, because of those we choose to love and because of those who love us.
 Kate Mosse, The Winter Ghosts
tags: love2129 likesLike
Oscar Wilde
Yet each man kills the thing he loves
By each let this be heard
Some do it with a bitter look
Some with a flattering word
The coward does it with a kiss
The brave man with a sword
 Oscar Wilde, The Ballad of Reading Gaol
tags: 1897, betrayal, bravery, courage, love, remorse2112 likesLike
E.E. Cummings
Yours is the light by which my spirit's born: - you are my sun, my moon, and all my stars.
 e. e. cummings
tags: love, moon, stars, sun2107 likesLike
Erich Fromm
Love is a decision, it is a judgment, it is a promise. If love were only a feeling, there would be no basis for the promise to love each other forever. A feeling comes and it may go. How can I judge that it will stay forever, when my act does not involve judgment and decision.
 Erich Fromm, The Art of Loving
tags: decision, feeling, fromm, love2104 likesLike
Nicholas Sparks
When I look in the mirror, I know Im looking at someone who isnt sure she deserves to be loved at all.
 Nicholas Sparks, Dear John
tags: life, love2098 likesLike
Haruki Murakami
If you can love someone with your whole heart, even one person, then there's salvation in life. Even if you can't get together with that person.
 Haruki Murakami, 1Q84
tags: hope, love2098 likesLike
Richard Siken
Youre in a car with a beautiful boy, and he wont tell you that he loves you, but he loves you. And you feel like youve done something terrible, like robbed a liquor store, or swallowed pills, or shoveled yourself a grave in the dirt, and youre tired. Youre in a car with a beautiful boy, and youre trying not to tell him that you love him, and youre trying to choke down the feeling, and youre trembling, but he reaches over and he touches you, like a prayer for which no words exist, and you feel your heart taking root in your body, like youve discovered something you didnt even have a name for.
 richard siken
tags: love2090 likesLike
John Keats
I almost wish we were butterflies and liv'd but three summer days - three such days with you I could fill with more delight than fifty common years could ever contain.
 John Keats, Bright Star: Love Letters and Poems of John Keats to Fanny Brawne
tags: butterflies, days, fanny-brawne, fifty-common-years, letter, love, summer, three2077 likesLike
Markus Zusak
If only she could be so oblivious again, to feel such love without knowing it, mistaking it for laughter. 
 Markus Zusak, The Book Thief
tags: childhood, laughter, love, oblivious2073 likesLike
Martha Gellhorn
I know enough to know that no woman should ever marry a man who hated his mother.
 Martha Gellhorn, Selected Letters
tags: ernest-hemingway, feminism, hate, love, marriage, married-life, matrimony, men, mothers, psychology, relationships, sons, women2065 likesLike
Scott Westerfeld
The human heart is a strange vessel. Love and hatred can exist side by side.
 Scott Westerfield
tags: love2062 likesLike
Charlotte Bront
Do you think, because I am poor, obscure, plain and little, I am soulless and heartless? You think wrong! - I have as much soul as you, - and full as much heart! And if God had gifted me with some beauty and much wealth, I should have made it as hard for you to leave me, as it is now for me to leave you!
 Charlotte Bront, Jane Eyre
tags: charlotte-bronte, heart, heartbreak, jane-eyre, love, misconceptions, obscurity, parting, plainness, poverty, soul2056 likesLike
Nicholas Sparks
Spending time with you showed me what Ive been missing in my life.
 Nicholas Sparks, The Choice
tags: love2055 likesLike
Maggie Stiefvater
It is possible to be in love with you just because of who you are.
 Maggie Stiefvater, Shiver
tags: grace-brisbane, love, sam-roth, shiver2038 likesLike

Humor Quotes
Quotes tagged as "humor" Showing 1-30 of 36,464
Albert Einstein
Two things are infinite: the universe and human stupidity; and I'm not sure about the universe.
 Albert Einstein
tags: attributed-no-source, human-nature, humor, infinity, philosophy, science, stupidity, universe133182 likesLike
Frank Zappa
So many books, so little time.
 Frank Zappa
tags: books, humor129354 likesLike
Mae West
You only live once, but if you do it right, once is enough.
 Mae West
tags: humor, life108970 likesLike
Insanity is doing the same thing, over and over again, but expecting different results.
 Narcotics Anonymous
tags: humor, insanity, life, misattributed-ben-franklin, misattributed-mark-twain, misattributed-to-einstein61532 likesLike
Jane Austen
The person, be it gentleman or lady, who has not pleasure in a good novel, must be intolerably stupid.
 Jane Austen, Northanger Abbey
tags: aliteracy, books, classic, humor48418 likesLike
Groucho Marx
Outside of a dog, a book is man's best friend. Inside of a dog it's too dark to read.
 Groucho Marx, The Essential Groucho: Writings For By And About Groucho Marx
tags: animals, books, dogs, friends, humor37046 likesLike
Steve Martin
A day without sunshine is like, you know, night.
 Steve Martin
tags: humor, obvious, simile34745 likesLike
Mark Twain
Never put off till tomorrow what may be done day after tomorrow just as well.
 Mark Twain
tags: humor, procrastination33769 likesLike
Douglas Adams
I love deadlines. I love the whooshing noise they make as they go by.
 Douglas Adams, The Salmon of Doubt
tags: deadlines, humor, humour, work, writing31220 likesLike
Garrison Keillor
Anyone who thinks sitting in church can make you a Christian must also think that sitting in a garage can make you a car.
 Garrison Keillor
tags: humor, religion29254 likesLike
Robert A. Heinlein
Women and cats will do as they please, and men and dogs should relax and get used to the idea.
 Robert A. Heinlein
tags: cats, humor, women28121 likesLike
Charles M. Schulz
All you need is love. But a little chocolate now and then doesn't hurt.
 Charles M. Schulz
tags: chocolate, food, humor26278 likesLike
Jim Henson
Beauty is in the eye of the beholder and it may be necessary from time to time to give a stupid or misinformed beholder a black eye.
 Jim Henson
tags: humor25940 likesLike
Woody Allen
I'm not afraid of death; I just don't want to be there when it happens.
 Woody Allen
tags: death, fear, humor, life24870 likesLike
Whenever I feel the need to exercise, I lie down until it goes away.
 Paul Terry
tags: exercise, humor, laziness, misattributed-to-hutchins24001 likesLike
Groucho Marx
I find television very educating. Every time somebody turns on the set, I go into the other room and read a book.
 Groucho Marx
tags: books, humor, reading, television22454 likesLike
Douglas Adams
The story so far:
In the beginning the Universe was created.
This has made a lot of people very angry and been widely regarded as a bad move.
 Douglas Adams, The Restaurant at the End of the Universe
tags: humor, scifi22190 likesLike
John Green
Saying 'I notice you're a nerd' is like saying, 'Hey, I notice that you'd rather be intelligent than be stupid, that you'd rather be thoughtful than be vapid, that you believe that there are things that matter more than the arrest record of Lindsay Lohan. Why is that?' In fact, it seems to me that most contemporary insults are pretty lame. Even 'lame' is kind of lame. Saying 'You're lame' is like saying 'You walk with a limp.' Yeah, whatever, so does 50 Cent, and he's done all right for himself.
 John Green
tags: humor, nerdfighters22088 likesLike
Charles Bukowski
Some people never go crazy. What truly horrible lives they must lead.
 Charles Bukowski
tags: humor21102 likesLike
Terry Pratchett
The trouble with having an open mind, of course, is that people will insist on coming along and trying to put things in it.
 Terry Pratchett, Diggers
tags: humor, open-mind, thinking20549 likesLike
Bill Watterson
Reality continues to ruin my life.
 Bill Watterson, The Complete Calvin and Hobbes
tags: calvin-and-hobbes, humor, life20133 likesLike
George Carlin
The reason I talk to myself is because Im the only one whose answers I accept.
 George Carlin
tags: humor, insanity, lies, lying, self-indulgence, truth19033 likesLike
Benjamin Franklin Wade
Go to heaven for the climate and hell for the company.
 Benjamin Franklin Wade
tags: humor, misattributed-mark-twain, philosophy, theology18987 likesLike
I love mankind ... it's people I can't stand!!
I love mankind ... it's people I can't stand!!
 Charles M. Schulz
tags: humor, mankind, people18365 likesLike
W.C. Fields
I am free of all prejudice. I hate everyone equally. 
 W.C. Fields
tags: humor, sinister18208 likesLike
Suzanne Collins
Remember, we're madly in love, so it's all right to kiss me anytime you feel like it.
 Suzanne Collins, The Hunger Games
tags: humor17611 likesLike
Jane Austen
A lady's imagination is very rapid; it jumps from admiration to love, from love to matrimony in a moment.
 Jane Austen, Pride and Prejudice
tags: humor, love, romantic, women16906 likesLike
Lewis Carroll
Its no use going back to yesterday, because I was a different person then.
 Lewis Carroll
tags: alice, humor, inspirational, philosophy-of-life, psychological, yesterday16539 likesLike
Charles J. Sykes
Be nice to nerds. You may end up working for them. We all could.
 Charles J. Sykes, Dumbing Down Our Kids: Why American Children Feel Good About Themselves But Can't Read, Write or Add
tags: humor, misattributed-to-bill-gates, nerd, nerds, work15628 likesLike
J.K. Rowling
Do you remember me telling you we are practicing non-verbal spells, Potter?"
"Yes," said Harry stiffly.
"Yes, sir."
"There's no need to call me "sir" Professor."
The words had escaped him before he knew what he was saying.
 J.K. Rowling, Harry Potter and the Half-Blood Prince
tags: humor, rebellion, sarcasm15275 likesLike

Humor Quotes
Quotes tagged as "humor" Showing 31-60 of 36,464
Cassandra Clare
Jesus!" Luke exclaimed.
"Actually, it's just me," said Simon. "Although I've been told the resemblance is startling.
 Cassandra Clare
tags: humor, jace-wayland, simon-lewis13969 likesLike
Markus Herz
Be careful about reading health books. Some fine day you'll die of a misprint.
 Markus Herz
tags: books, health, humor, misattributed-mark-twain, misprints13737 likesLike
Have you ever noticed how What the hell is always the right decision to make?
 Terry Johnson, Insignificance
tags: humor, misattributed-to-marilyn-monroe, philosophy13534 likesLike
C.E.M. Joad
Creativity is knowing how to hide your sources
 C.E.M. Joad
tags: creativity, humor, misattributed-to-einstein, paraphrased12867 likesLike
Lemony Snicket
Fate is like a strange, unpopular restaurant filled with odd little waiters who bring you things you never asked for and don't always like.
 Lemony Snicket
tags: fate, humor, simile12788 likesLike
Rita Mae Brown
The statistics on sanity are that one out of every four people is suffering from a mental illness. Look at your 3 best friends. If they're ok, then it's you.
 Rita Mae Brown
tags: humor, insanity12573 likesLike
Cassandra Clare
I don't want to be a man," said Jace. "I want to be an angst-ridden teenager who can't confront his own inner demons and takes it out verbally on other people instead."
"Well," said Luke, "you're doing a fantastic job.
 Cassandra Clare, City of Ashes
tags: clary-fray, demons, growing-up, humor, jace-wayland, luke, teenager12435 likesLike
Terry Pratchett
Give a man a fire and he's warm for a day, but set fire to him and he's warm for the rest of his life.
 Terry Pratchett, Jingo
tags: humor, proverb12198 likesLike
Chuck Palahniuk
All God does is watch us and kill us when we get boring. We must never, ever be boring.
 Chuck Palahniuk, Invisible Monsters
tags: god, humor, life11376 likesLike
George V. Higgins
This lifes hard, but its harder if youre stupid.
 George V. Higgins, The Friends of Eddie Coyle
tags: humor, life, misattributed-john-wayne11099 likesLike
Douglas Adams
I refuse to answer that question on the grounds that I don't know the answer
 Douglas Adams
tags: attributed-no-source, humor, misattributed-douglas-adams, wit11084 likesLike
J.K. Rowling
Mr. Moony presents his compliments to Professor Snape, and begs him to keep his abnormally large nose out of other people's business.
Mr. Prongs agrees with Mr. Moony, and would like to add that Professor Snape is an ugly git.
Mr. Padfoot would like to register his astonishment that an idiot like that ever became a professor.
Mr. Wormtail bids Professor Snape good day, and advises him to wash his hair, the slimeball.
 J.K. Rowling, Harry Potter and the Prisoner of Azkaban
tags: harry-potter, humor, james-potter, remus-lupin, sirius-black, snape, wormtail10602 likesLike
J.K. Rowling
Is it true that you shouted at Professor Umbridge?"
"Yes."
"You called her a liar?"
"Yes."
"You told her He Who Must Not Be Named is back?"
"Yes."
"Have a biscuit, Potter.
 J.K. Rowling, Harry Potter and the Order of the Phoenix
tags: biscuit, humor, rebellion10569 likesLike
Albert Einstein
Never memorize something that you can look up.
 Albert Einstein
tags: humor, science10553 likesLike
J.K. Rowling
He can run faster than Severus Snape confronted with shampoo.
 J.K. Rowling, Harry Potter and the Deathly Hallows
tags: humor, shampoo10508 likesLike
Groucho Marx
When you're in jail, a good friend will be trying to bail you out. A best friend will be in the cell next to you saying, 'Damn, that was fun'.
 Groucho Marx
tags: friends, humor, jail9909 likesLike
Terry Pratchett
Some humans would do anything to see if it was possible to do it. If you put a large switch in some cave somewhere, with a sign on it saying 'End-of-the-World Switch. PLEASE DO NOT TOUCH', the paint wouldn't even have time to dry.
 Terry Pratchett, Thief of Time
tags: humor9859 likesLike
Albert Einstein
When you are courting a nice girl an hour seems like a second. When you sit on a red-hot cinder a second seems like an hour. That's relativity.
 Albert Einstein
tags: humor9742 likesLike
Oscar Levant
There's a fine line between genius and insanity. I have erased this line.
 Oscar Levant
tags: genius, humor, insanity9724 likesLike
Thomas Szasz
Two wrongs don't make a right, but they make a good excuse.
 Thomas Szasz
tags: humor, inspirational9602 likesLike
J.K. Rowling
Death's got an Invisibility Cloak?" Harry interrupted again.
"So he can sneak up on people," said Ron. "Sometimes he gets bored of running at them, flapping his arms and shrieking...
 J.K. Rowling, Harry Potter and the Deathly Hallows
tags: death, humor, sarcasm9596 likesLike
Chris Rock
You know the world is going crazy when the best rapper is a white guy, the best golfer is a black guy, the tallest guy in the NBA is Chinese, the Swiss hold the America's Cup, France is accusing the U.S. of arrogance, Germany doesn't want to go to war, and the three most powerful men in America are named "Bush", "Dick", and "Colin." Need I say more?
 Chris Rock
tags: comedy, everyday-life, funny, humor, observational-comedy9393 likesLike
Cassandra Clare
It means 'Shadowhunters: Looking Better in Black Than the Widows of our Enemies Since 1234'.
 Cassandra Clare, City of Bones
tags: humor, jace-wayland, sarcasm9327 likesLike
Mark Twain
Substitute 'damn' every time you're inclined to write 'very;' your editor will delete it and the writing will be just as it should be.
 Mark Twain
tags: humor, writing9325 likesLike
E.B. White
If the world were merely seductive, that would be easy. If it were merely challenging, that would be no problem. But I arise in the morning torn between a desire to improve the world and a desire to enjoy the world. This makes it hard to plan the day.
 E.B. White
tags: activism, humor, life, pleasure8988 likesLike
Billy Sunday
Going to church doesnt make you a Christian any more than going to a garage makes you an automobile.
 Billy Sunday, Billy Sunday, the Man and His Message: With His Own Words Which Have Won Thousands for Christ
tags: automobile, car, funny, humor, religious8975 likesLike
Mark Twain
Reader, suppose you were an idiot. And suppose you were a member of Congress. But I repeat myself.
 Mark Twain
tags: humor, politics8853 likesLike
Rick Riordan
Let us find the dam snack bar," Zoe said. "We should eat while we can."
Grover cracked a smile. "The dam snack bar?"
Zoe blinked. "Yes. What is funny?"
"Nothing," Grover said, trying to keep a straight face. "I could use some dam french fries."
Even Thalia smiled at that. "And I need to use the dam restroom."
...
I started cracking up, and Thalia and Grover joined in, while Zoe just looked at me. "I do not understand."
"I want to use the dam water fountain," Grover said.
"And..." Thalia tried to catch her breath. "I want to buy a dam t-shirt.
 Rick Riordan, The Titan's Curse
tags: humor8847 likesLike
Jane Austen
I do not want people to be very agreeable, as it saves me the trouble of liking them a great deal.
 Jane Austen, Jane Austen's Letters
tags: friends, humor, people8637 likesLike
George Carlin
The planet is fine. The people are fucked.
 George Carlin
tags: funny, humanity, humor8478 likesLike

Humor Quotes
Quotes tagged as "humor" Showing 61-90 of 36,464
Cassandra Clare
Do you remember back at the hotel when you promised that if we lived, youd get dressed up in a nurses outfit and give me a sponge bath?" asked Jace.
"It was Simon who promised you the sponge bath."
"As soon as Im back on my feet, handsome," said Simon.
"I knew we should have left you a rat.
 Cassandra Clare, City of Bones
tags: bath, clary-fray, humor, jace-wayland, simon-lewis8364 likesLike
Jerome K. Jerome
I like work: it fascinates me. I can sit and look at it for hours.
 Jerome K. Jerome
tags: humor, work8058 likesLike
Cassandra Clare
Malachi scowled. "I don't remember the Clave inviting you into the Glass City, Magnus Bane."
"They didn't," Magnus said. "Your wards are down."
"Really?" the Consul's voice dripped sarcasm. "I hadn't noticed."
Magnus looked concerned. "That's terrible. Someone should have told you." He glanced at Luke. "Tell him the wards are down.
 Cassandra Clare, City of Glass
tags: consul, humor, magnus-bane, sarcasm7985 likesLike
Laurence J. Peter
If a cluttered desk is a sign of a cluttered mind, of what, then, is an empty desk a sign?
 Laurence J. Peter
tags: human, humor, misattributed-einstein, philosophy, stupidity7963 likesLike
Laurie Halse Anderson
THE FIRST TEN LIES THEY TELL YOU IN HIGH SCHOOL

1. We are here to help you.
2. You will have time to get to your class before the bell rings.
3. The dress code will be enforced.
4. No smoking is allowed on school grounds.
5. Our football team will win the championship this year.
6. We expect more of you here.
7. Guidance counselors are always available to listen.
8. Your schedule was created with you in mind.
9. Your locker combination is private.
10. These will be the years you look back on fondly.

TEN MORE LIES THEY TELL YOU IN HIGH SCHOOL

1. You will use algebra in your adult lives.
2. Driving to school is a privilege that can be taken away.
3. Students must stay on campus during lunch.
4. The new text books will arrive any day now.
5. Colleges care more about you than your SAT scores.
6. We are enforcing the dress code.
7. We will figure out how to turn off the heat soon.
8. Our bus drivers are highly trained professionals.
9. There is nothing wrong with summer school.
10. We want to hear what you have to say.
 Laurie Halse Anderson, Speak
tags: humor, school7762 likesLike
Stephen King
When his life was ruined, his family killed, his farm destroyed, Job knelt down on the ground and yelled up to the heavens, "Why god? Why me?" and the thundering voice of God answered, There's just something about you that pisses me off.
 Stephen King, Storm of the Century
tags: god, humor, religion7707 likesLike
Douglas Adams
There is a theory which states that if ever anyone discovers exactly what the Universe is for and why it is here, it will instantly disappear and be replaced by something even more bizarre and inexplicable.

There is another theory which states that this has already happened.
 Douglas Adams, The Restaurant at the End of the Universe
tags: humor7612 likesLike
Bertrand Russell
There are two motives for reading a book; one, that you enjoy it; the other, that you can boast about it.
 Bertrand Russell
tags: books, humor7572 likesLike
Cassandra Clare
Well, Im not kissing the mundane," said Jace. "Id rather stay down here and rot."
"Forever?" said Simon. "Forevers an awfully long time."
Jace raised his eyebrows. "I knew it," he said. "You want to kiss me, dont you?
 Cassandra Clare, City of Ashes
tags: humor, jace-wayland, simon-lewis7421 likesLike
Mark Twain
I did not attend his funeral, but I sent a nice letter saying I approved of it.
 Mark Twain
tags: classic-insult, funeral, funny, humor7410 likesLike
Henry Ward Beecher
Where is human nature so weak as in the bookstore?
 Henry Ward Beecherr
tags: books, humor7406 likesLike
Friedrich Nietzsche
It is hard enough to remember my opinions, without also remembering my reasons for them!
 Friedrich Nietzsche
tags: humor, philosophy7305 likesLike
W.C. Fields
If at first you don't succeed, try, try again. Then quit. No use being a damn fool about it.
 W.C. Fields
tags: humor, success7246 likesLike
John Green
What the hell is that?" I laughed.
"It's my fox hat."
"Your fox hat?"
"Yeah, Pudge. My fox hat."
"Why are you wearing your fox hat?" I asked.
"Because no one can catch the motherfucking fox.
 John Green, Looking for Alaska
tags: funny, humor7192 likesLike
Mae West
I generally avoid temptation unless I can't resist it.
 Mae West
tags: humor, temptation6990 likesLike
Isaac Asimov
Never let your sense of morals prevent you from doing what is right.
 Isaac Asimov, Foundation
tags: humor, inspirational, philosophy, wisdom6835 likesLike
Roald Dahl
So please, oh please, we beg, we pray,
Go throw your TV set away,
And in its place you can install
A lovely bookshelf on the wall.
Then fill the shelves with lots of books.
 Roald Dahl, Charlie and the Chocolate Factory
tags: books, humor, television6824 likesLike
Charles M. Schulz
Happiness is a warm puppy.
 Charles M. Schulz
tags: animals, dogs, happiness, humor, puppies6763 likesLike
Maya Angelou
I love to see a young girl go out and grab the world by the lapels. Life's a bitch. You've got to go out and kick ass.
 maya angelou
tags: humor, inspirational, life6625 likesLike
Mark Twain
I was gratified to be able to answer promptly, and I did. I said I didnt know.
 Mark Twain
tags: humor, knowledge6605 likesLike
Woody Allen
I don't know the question, but sex is definitely the answer.
 Woody Allen
tags: humor, life, sex6532 likesLike
Dr. Seuss
Fantasy is a necessary ingredient in living, it's a way of looking at life through the wrong end of a telescope.
 Dr. Seuss
tags: fantasy, humor6477 likesLike
George Carlin
Religion has actually convinced people that there's an invisible man living in the sky who watches everything you do, every minute of every day. And the invisible man has a special list of ten things he does not want you to do. And if you do any of these ten things, he has a special place, full of fire and smoke and burning and torture and anguish, where he will send you to live and suffer and burn and choke and scream and cry forever and ever 'til the end of time!

But He loves you. He loves you, and He needs money! He always needs money! He's all-powerful, all-perfect, all-knowing, and all-wise, somehow just can't handle money!
 George Carlin
tags: atheism, humor, life, religion6341 likesLike
Cassandra Clare
That does it," said Jace. "I'm going to get you a dictionary for Christmas this year."
"Why?" Isabelle said.
"So you can look up 'fun.' I'm not sure you know what it means.
 Cassandra Clare, City of Ashes
tags: dictionary, fun, humor, isabelle-lightwood, jace-wayland6312 likesLike
Edgar Allan Poe
I have great faith in fools - self-confidence my friends will call it.
 Edgar Allan Poe, Marginalia
tags: faith, fool, humor, self-confidence, self-irony6243 likesLike
Terry Pratchett
It is said that your life flashes before your eyes just before you die. That is true, it's called Life.
 Terry Pratchett, The Last Continent
tags: death, humor, life6241 likesLike
J.K. Rowling
Percy wouldn't notice a joke if it danced naked in front of him wearing one of Dobby's hats.
 J.K. Rowling, Harry Potter and the Goblet of Fire
tags: humor6202 likesLike
Time flies like an arrow; fruit flies like a banana.
 Anthony G. Oettinger
tags: humor, misattributed-to-groucho-marx, time6123 likesLike
Oscar Wilde
I think God, in creating man, somewhat overestimated his ability.
 Oscar Wilde
tags: creation, god, humor, man5959 likesLike
J.K. Rowling
You haven't got a letter on yours," George observed. "I suppose she thinks you don't forget your name. But we're not stupid-we know we're called Gred and Forge.
 J.K. Rowling, Harry Potter and the Sorcerer's Stone
tags: humor5814 likesLike

Humor Quotes
Quotes tagged as "humor" Showing 121-150 of 36,464
Mark Twain
What would men be without women? Scarce, sir...mighty scarce.
 Mark Twain
tags: humor, men, women4558 likesLike
J.K. Rowling
Holey? You have the the whole world of ear-related humor before you, you go for holey?
 J.K. Rowling, Harry Potter and the Deathly Hallows
tags: humor4506 likesLike
J.K. Rowling
Now, you two  this year, you behave yourselves. If I get one more owl telling me you've  you've blown up a toilet or "
"Blown up a toilet? We've never blown up a toilet."
"Great idea though, thanks, Mum.
 J.K. Rowling, Harry Potter and the Sorcerer's Stone
tags: fred-weasley, george-weasley, humor, molly-weasley, toilet4501 likesLike
Cassandra Clare
Mom. I have something to tell you. Im undead. Now, I know you may have some preconceived notions about the undead. I know you may not be comfortable with the idea of me being undead. But Im here to tell you that undead are just like you and me  well, okay. Possibly more like me than you.
 Cassandra Clare, City of Ashes
tags: city-of-ashes, humor, mortal-instruments, simon, vampire4485 likesLike
Douglas Adams
Don't Panic.
 Douglas Adams, The Hitchhiker's Guide to the Galaxy
tags: h2g2, hitchhiker-s-guide, humor, panic4477 likesLike
Cassandra Clare
Out of the corner of her eye she thought she saw Jace shoot her a look of white rage - but when she glanced at him, he looked as he always did: easy, confident, slightly bored.
"In future, Clarissa," he said, "it might be wise to mention that you already have a man in your bed, to avoid such tedious situations."
"You invited him into bed?" Simon demanded, looking shaken.
"Ridiculous, isn't it?" said Jace. "We would never have all fit."
"I didn't invite him into bed," Clary snapped. "We were just kissing."
"Just kissing?" Jace's tone mocked her with its false hurt. "How swiftly you dismiss our love.
 Cassandra Clare, City of Bones
tags: awkward, humor4413 likesLike
Winston S. Churchill
History will be kind to me for I intend to write it.
 Winston S. Churchill
tags: history, humor, writing4370 likesLike
Tina Fey
Do your thing and don't care if they like it.
 Tina Fey, Bossypants
tags: bossypants, humor, self-love, tina-fey4183 likesLike
Dr. Seuss
So be sure when you step, Step with care and great tact. And remember that life's A Great Balancing Act. And will you succeed? Yes! You will, indeed! (98 and  percent guaranteed) Kid, you'll move mountains.
 Dr. Seuss, Oh, The Places You'll Go!
tags: humor, inspirational, success4167 likesLike
Miguel de Cervantes Saavedra
Finally, from so little sleeping and so much reading, his brain dried up and he went completely out of his mind.
 Miguel de Cervantes Saavedra, Don Quixote
tags: books, humor, reading4145 likesLike
Arthur Conan Doyle
It is a great thing to start life with a small number of really good books which are your very own.
 Arthur Conan Doyle
tags: books, humor4113 likesLike
J.K. Rowling
Oh well... I'd just been thinking, if you had died, you'd have been welcome to share my toilet.
 J.K. Rowling, Harry Potter and the Chamber of Secrets
tags: flirting, humor4091 likesLike
J.R.R. Tolkien
Do you wish me a good morning, or mean that it is a good morning whether I want it or not; or that you feel good this morning; or that it is a morning to be good on?
 J.R.R. Tolkien, The Hobbit, or There and Back Again
tags: humor, semantics, suspicion4081 likesLike
Cassandra Clare
Isabelle drifted over, Jace a pace behind her. She was wearing a long black dress with boots and an even longer cutaway coat of soft green velvet, the color of moss. "I can't believe you did it!" she exclaimed. "How did you get Magnus to let Jace leave?"
"Traded him for Alec," Clary said.
Isabelle looked mildly alarmed. "Not permanently?"
"No," said Jace. "Just for a few hours. Unless I don't come back," he added thoughtfully. "In which case, maybe he does get to keep Alec. Think of it as a lease with an option to buy."
Isabelle looked dubious. "Mom and Dad won't be pleased if they find out."
"That you freed a possible criminal by trading away your brother to a warlock who looks like a gay Sonic the Hedgehog and dresses like the Child Catcher from Chitty Chitty Bang Bang?" Simon inquired. "No, probably not.
 Cassandra Clare, City of Ashes
tags: alec-lightwood, clary-fray, humor, isabelle-lightwood, jace-wayland, simon-lewis4077 likesLike
George Carlin
Fighting for peace is like screwing for virginity.
 George Carlin
tags: fighting, humor, misattributed-george-carlin, peace, sex4076 likesLike
Mark Twain
When I was a boy of 14, my father was so ignorant I could hardly stand to have the old man around. But when I got to be 21, I was astonished at how much the old man had learned in seven years.
 Mark Twain
tags: arrogance, humor, ignorance3982 likesLike
J.K. Rowling
Yeah, Quirrell was a great teacher. There was just that minor drawback of him having Lord Voldemort sticking out of the back of his head!
 J.K. Rowling, Harry Potter and the Order of the Phoenix
tags: humor3979 likesLike
Becca Fitzpatrick
Say 'provoking' again. Your mouth looks provocative when you do.
 Becca Fitzpatrick, Hush, Hush
tags: fallen-anger, humor, nephlim, romance3979 likesLike
Scott Adams
I love you like a fat kid loves cake!
 Scott Adams
tags: food, humor, love3950 likesLike
Terry Pratchett
Time is a drug. Too much of it kills you.
 Terry Pratchett, Small Gods
tags: humor, science3926 likesLike
J.R. Ward
Welcome to the wonderful world of jealousy, he thought. For the price of admission, you get a splitting headache, a nearly irresistable urge to commit murder, and an inferiority complex. Yippee.
 J.R. Ward, Dark Lover
tags: humor, jealousy, love3902 likesLike
Suzanne Collins
You here to finish me off, Sweetheart?
 Suzanne Collins, The Hunger Games
tags: humor, hunger-games, katniss, mellark, peeta, romance3867 likesLike
Cassandra Clare
The meek may inherit the earth, but at the moment it belongs to the conceited. Like me.
 Cassandra Clare, City of Bones
tags: city-of-bones, humor, jace-wayland, quotes3845 likesLike
Arthur C. Clarke
I'm sure the universe is full of intelligent life. It's just been too intelligent to come here.
 Arthur C. Clarke
tags: extraterrestrials, humor, intelligent-life, life, science, universe3786 likesLike
George Carlin
Have you ever noticed that anybody driving slower than you is an idiot, and anyone going faster than you is a maniac?
 George Carlin
tags: humor3783 likesLike
Mo Willems
If you ever find yourself in the wrong story, leave.
 Mo Willems, Goldilocks and the Three Dinosaurs
tags: fairy-tales, humor, humorous, philosophy, psychology3776 likesLike
Some people say, Never let them see you cry. I say, if youre so mad
Some people say, Never let them see you cry. I say, if youre so mad you could just cry, then cry. It terrifies everyone.
 Tina Fey, Bossypants
tags: humor3762 likesLike
J.K. Rowling
Why were you lurking under our window?"
"Yes - yes, good point, Petunia! What were you doing under our windows, boy?"
"Listening to the news," said Harry in a resigned voice.
His aunt and uncle exchanged looks of outrage.
"Listening to the news! Again?"
"Well, it changes every day, you see," said Harry.
 J.K. Rowling, Harry Potter and the Order of the Phoenix
tags: dursley, harry-potter, humor, news, sarcasm3745 likesLike
I'm not going to wear a red dress," she said.
"It would look stunning, My Lady," she called.
She spoke to the bubbles gathered on the surface of the water. "If there's anyone I wish to stun at dinner, I'll hit him in the face.
 Kristin Cashore, Graceling
tags: humor3706 likesLike
J.K. Rowling
Of all the trees we could've hit, we had to get one that hits back.
 J.K. Rowling, Harry Potter and the Chamber of Secrets
tags: humor, trees3630 likesLike

Humor Quotes
Quotes tagged as "humor" Showing 151-180 of 36,464
Rick Riordan
Don't feel bad, I'm usually about to die.
 Rick Riordan, The Battle of the Labyrinth
tags: death, greek, humor, mythology, percy-jackson, sorry3672 likesLike
Rick Riordan
The real story of the Fleece: there were these two children of Zeus, Cadmus and Europa, okay? They were about to get offered up as human sacrifices, when they prayed to Zeus to save them. So Zeus sent this magical flying ram with golden wool, which picked them up in Greece and carried them all the way to Colchis in Asia Minor. Well, actually it carried Cadmus. Europa fell off and died along the way, but that's not important."
"It was probably important to her.
 Rick Riordan, The Sea of Monsters
tags: annabeth-chase, gold, humor, percy-jackson3638 likesLike
George Carlin
That's why they call it the American Dream, because you have to be asleep to believe it.
 George Carlin
tags: america, dream, funny, humor, wealth3629 likesLike
Bill Watterson
Sometimes when I'm talking, my words can't keep up with my thoughts. I wonder why we think faster than we speak. Probably so we can think twice.
 Bill Watterson
tags: calvin-and-hobbes, humor3612 likesLike
Douglas Adams
Time is an illusion. Lunchtime doubly so.
 Douglas Adams, The Hitchhiker's Guide to the Galaxy
tags: humor, philosophy, science-fiction3609 likesLike
Voltaire
It is forbidden to kill; therefore all murderers are punished unless they kill in large numbers and to the sound of trumpets.
 Voltaire
tags: double-standards, ethics, governments, humor, irony, killing, law, mankind, morality, murder, nationalism, nations, war3606 likesLike
Groucho Marx
From the moment I picked up your book until I put it down, I was convulsed with laughter. Some day I intend reading it.
 Groucho Marx
tags: books, humor, reading3597 likesLike
J.K. Rowling
He was my mum and dad's best friend. He's a convicted murderer, but he's broken out of wizard prison and he's on the run. He likes to keep in touch with me, though...keep up with my news...check if I'm happy...
 J.K. Rowling, Harry Potter and the Prisoner of Azkaban
tags: humor3579 likesLike
Will Rogers
Even if you are on the right track, youll get run over if you just sit there.
 Will Rogers
tags: enterprise, humor, inertia, inspirational3568 likesLike
Jay McInerney
The capacity for friendship is God's way of apologizing for our families.
 Jay McInerney, The Last of the Savages
tags: family, friendship, humor3546 likesLike
Madonna
I'm tough, I'm ambitious, and I know exactly what I want. If that makes me a bitch, okay.
 Madonna
tags: feminism, humor, women3537 likesLike
Tamora Pierce
Every now and then I like to do as I'm told, just to confuse people.
 Tamora Pierce, Melting Stones
tags: humor, obedience3526 likesLike
Cassandra Clare
What are all these?" Clary asked.
"Vials of holy water, blessed knives, steel and silver blades," Jace said, piling the weapons on the floor beside him, "electrum wire - not much use at the moment but it's always good to have spares - silver bullets, charms of protetion, crucifixes, stars of David-"
"Jesus," said Clary
"I doubt he'd fit."
"Jace." Clary was appalled.
 Cassandra Clare, City of Bones
tags: clary-fray, humor, irony, jace-wayland, jesus3508 likesLike
Dr. Seuss
Today was good. Today was fun. Tomorrow is another one.
 Dr. Seuss
tags: humor, rythmic, thoughtful3493 likesLike
Becca Fitzpatrick
You possess other people's...bodies."

He accepted that statement with a nod.

"Do you want to possess my body?"

"I want to do a lot of things to your body, but that's not one of them.
 Becca Fitzpatrick, Hush, Hush
tags: humor, nora, patch3492 likesLike
Dorothy Parker
Beauty is only skin deep, but ugly goes clean to the bone.
 Dorothy Parker
tags: beauty, classic-insult, humor, ugly3491 likesLike
Suzanne Collins
Yes, frosting. The final defense of the dying.
 Suzanne Collins, The Hunger Games
tags: humor3470 likesLike
Cassandra Clare
So when the moon's only partly full, you only feel a little wolfy?"
"You could say that."
"Well, you can go ahead and hang your head out the car window if you feel like it."
"I'm a werewolf, not a golden retriever.
 Cassandra Clare
tags: humor3443 likesLike
Douglas Adams
Would it save you a lot of time if I just gave up and went mad now?
 Douglas Adams, The Hitchhiker's Guide to the Galaxy
tags: british, humor, science-fiction, social-commentary, thumb, towel3429 likesLike
George Carlin
May the forces of evil become confused on the way to your house.
 George Carlin
tags: benediction, evil, goodwill, humor, inspirational, wishes3418 likesLike
Bette Midler
The worst part of success is trying to find someone who is happy for you.
 Bette Midler
tags: friendship, happiness, humor, inspirational, jealousy, success3410 likesLike
Cassandra Clare
Your friend's poetry is terrible," he said.
Clary blinked, caught momentarily off guard. "What?"
"I said his poetry was terrible. It sounds like he ate a dictionary and started vomiting up words at random.
 Cassandra Clare, City of Bones
tags: humor3380 likesLike
Cassandra Clare
I'll just have them change the entry in the demonology textbook from 'almost extinct' to 'not extinct enough for Alec. He prefers his monsters really, really extinct.' Will that make you happy?
 Cassandra Clare, City of Ashes
tags: humor3372 likesLike
Jeaniene Frost
I'm saying that I'm a moody, insecure, narrow-minded, jealous, borderline homicidal bitch, and I want you to promise me that you're okay with that, because it's who I am, and you're what I need.
 Jeaniene Frost, Halfway to the Grave
tags: humor, love3363 likesLike
Neil Gaiman
Most books on witchcraft will tell you that witches work naked. This is because most books on witchcraft were written by men.
 Neil Gaiman
tags: humor, men, witchcraft, witches, women3338 likesLike
Rick Riordan
In a way, it's nice to know that there are Greek gods out there, because you have somebody to blame when things go wrong. For instance, when you're walking away from a bus that's just been attacked by monster hags and blown up by lightning, and it's raining on top of everything else, most people might think that's just really bad luck; when you're a half-blood, you understand that some devine force is really trying to mess up your day.
 Rick Riordan, The Titan's Curse
tags: books, humor, olympians3324 likesLike
Terry Pratchett
Wisdom comes from experience. Experience is often a result of lack of wisdom.
 Terry Pratchett
tags: humor, life3286 likesLike
Cassandra Clare
Must you go? I was rather hoping you'd stay and be a ministering angel, but if you must go, you must."

"I'll stay," Will said a bit crossly, and threw himself down in the armchair Tessa had just vacated. "I can minister angelically."

"None too convincingly. And you're not as pretty to look at as Tessa is," Jem said, closing his eyes as he leaned back against the pillow.

"How rude. Many who have gazed upon me have compared the experience to gazing at the radiance of the sun."

Jem still had his eyes closed. "If they mean it gives you a headache, they aren't wrong.
 Cassandra Clare, Clockwork Angel
tags: friends, humor, radiance3250 likesLike
Jennifer L. Armentrout
Beautiful face. Beautiful body. Horrible attitude. It was the holy trinity of hot boys.
 Jennifer L. Armentrout, Obsidian
tags: boys, hot, humor3229 likesLike
Charles M. Schulz
What's the good of living if you don't try a few things?
 Charles M. Schulz
tags: cartoonist, humor, inspirational3228 likesLike

Humor Quotes
Quotes tagged as "humor" Showing 181-210 of 36,464
Dr. Seuss
From there to here, from here to there, funny things are everywhere!
 Dr. Seuss, One Fish, Two Fish, Red Fish, Blue Fish
tags: humor3222 likesLike
Christopher Paolini
Because you can't argue with all the fools in the world. It's easier to let them have their way, then trick them when they're not paying attention.
 Christopher Paolini
tags: common-sense, humor, smart3201 likesLike
Terry Pratchett
In the beginning there was nothing, which exploded.
 Terry Pratchett, Lords and Ladies
tags: humor, metaphysics, physics, science3193 likesLike
Rick Riordan
Dreams like a podcast,
Downloading truth in my ears.
They tell me cool stuff."
"Apollo?" I guess, because I figured nobody else could make a haiku that bad.
He put his finger to his lips. "I'm incognito. Call me Fred."
"A god named Fred?
 Rick Riordan
tags: apollo, fred, haiku, humor, percy-jackson, poem3186 likesLike
Eoin Colfer
Confidence is ignorance. If you're feeling cocky, it's because there's something you don't know.
 Eoin Colfer, Artemis Fowl
tags: confidence, humor, ignorance, knowledge3182 likesLike
Cassandra Clare
I thought I'd lie on the floor and writhe in pain for a while," he grunted, "It relaxes me."
"It does? Oh - you're being sarcastic. That's a good sign probably.
 Cassandra Clare, City of Ashes
tags: funny, humor3177 likesLike
Cassandra Clare
It's not gray," Clary felt compelled to point out. "It's green."
"If there was such a thing as terminal literalism, you'd have died in childhood," said Jace.
 Cassandra Clare, City of Bones
tags: clary, gray-book, humor, jace3170 likesLike
Dorothy Parker
If you want to know what God thinks of money, just look at the people he gave it to.
 Dorothy Parker
tags: god, humor, money3151 likesLike
Cassandra Clare
I don't want tea," said Clary, with muffled force. "I want to find my mother. And then I want to find out who took her in the first place, and I want to kill them."
"Unfortunately," said Hodge, "we're all out of bitter revenge at the moment, so it's either tea or nothing.
 Cassandra Clare, City of Bones
tags: clary-fray, hodge, humor, revenge, sarcasm, tea3142 likesLike
Mae West
I wrote the story myself. It's about a girl who lost her reputation and never missed it.
 Mae West
tags: humor3120 likesLike
Cassandra Clare
You're an idiot."
"I've never claimed to be otherwise.
 Cassandra Clare, City of Bones
tags: humor, idiocy3112 likesLike
Oscar Wilde
There is only one thing in the world worse than being talked about, and that is not being talked about.
 Oscar Wilde, The Picture of Dorian Gray
tags: humor3102 likesLike
Orson Welles
Ask not what you can do for your country. Ask whats for lunch.
 Orson Welles
tags: food, humor3087 likesLike
Cassandra Clare
A diary with no drawings of me in it? Where are the torrid fantasies? The romance covers?
 Cassandra Clare, City of Bones
tags: clary-fray, diary, humor, jace-wayland, sarcasm3083 likesLike
Dr. Seuss
I meant what I said and I said what I meant. An elephant's faithful one-hundred percent!
 Dr. Seuss, Horton Hatches the Egg
tags: dr-seuss, humor, inspirational, musical3071 likesLike
George Carlin
Never underestimate the power of stupid people in large groups.
 George Carlin
tags: attributed-no-source, human-nature, humor, misattributed-george-carlin, stupidity3055 likesLike
Karen Marie Moning
I love books, by the way, way more than movies. Movies tell you what to think. A good book lets you choose a few thoughts for yourself. Movies show you the pink house. A good book tells you there's a pink house and lets you paint some of the finishing touches, maybe choose the roof style,park your own car out front. My imagination has always topped anything a movie could come up with. Case in point, those darned Harry Potter movies. That was so not what that part-Veela-chick, Fleur Delacour, looked like.
 Karen Marie Moning, Darkfever
tags: books, humor, reading3047 likesLike
Lemony Snicket
Love can change a person the way a parent can change a baby- awkwardly, and often with a great deal of mess.
 Lemony Snicket, Horseradish
tags: babies, change, humor, love, parents3045 likesLike
George Bernard Shaw
Animals are my friends...and I don't eat my friends.
 George Bernard Shaw
tags: animals, attributed-no-source, friends, humor, vegetarianism3044 likesLike
Terry Pratchett
DON'T THINK OF IT AS DYING, said Death. JUST THINK OF IT AS LEAVING EARLY TO AVOID THE RUSH.
 Terry Pratchett, Good Omens: The Nice and Accurate Prophecies of Agnes Nutter, Witch
tags: death, humor3037 likesLike
Suzanne Collins
I'm going to wake Peeta," I say.
"No, wait," says Finnick. "Let's do it together. Put our faces right in front of his."
Well, there's so little opportunity for fun left in my life, I agree. We position ourselves on either side of Peeta, lean over until our faces are inches frim his nose, and give him a shake. "Peeta. Peeta, wake up," I say in a soft, singsong voice.
His eyelids flutter open and then he jumps like we've stabbed him. "Aa!"
Finnick and I fall back in the sand, laughing our heads off. Every time we try to stop, we look at Peeta's attempt to maintain a disdainful expression and it sets us off again.
 Suzanne Collins, Catching Fire
tags: funny, humor, prank3022 likesLike
Nikolai Gogol
The longer and more carefully we look at a funny story, the sadder it becomes.
 Nikolai V. Gogol
tags: humor, sadness2974 likesLike
Robert Frost
Forgive, O Lord, my little jokes on Thee
And I'll forgive Thy great big one on me.
 Robert Frost
tags: humor, poetry, religion2969 likesLike
Oscar Wilde
I have the simplest tastes. I am always satisfied with the best.
 Oscar Wilde
tags: humor, taste2966 likesLike
J.K. Rowling
Ginny!" said Mr. Weasley, flabbergasted. "Haven't I taught you anything? What have I always told you? Never trust anything that can think for itself if you can't see where it keeps its brain?
 J.K. Rowling, Harry Potter and the Chamber of Secrets
tags: humor, trust2937 likesLike
Cassandra Clare
Jace shook his blond head in exasperation.
"You had to make a crazy jail friend, didn't you? You couldn't just count ceiling tiles or tame a pet mouse like normal prisoners do?
 Cassandra Clare, City of Glass
tags: humor, jace2916 likesLike
Phyllis Diller
A smile is a curve that sets everything straight.
 Phyllis Diller
tags: humor2866 likesLike
Cassandra Clare
My rapier wit hides my inner pain.
 Cassandra Clare
tags: humor, jace-wayland, the-mortal-instruments, tmi2847 likesLike
Steve Martin
Some people have a way with words, and other people...oh, uh, not have way.
 Steve Martin
tags: humor, words2839 likesLike
John Green
Headline?" he asked.
"'Swing Set Needs Home,'" I said.
"'Desperately Lonely Swing Set Needs Loving Home,'" he said.
"'Lonely, Vaguely Pedophilic Swing Set Seeks the Butts of Children,'" I said.
 John Green, The Fault in Our Stars
tags: funny, humor, humour, internet, john-green, pedophile, pedophilia, tfios, the-fault-in-our-stars2834 likesLike

Truth Quotes
Quotes tagged as "truth" Showing 1-30 of 18,248
I'm selfish, impatient and a little insecure. I make mistakes, I am out of control
I'm selfish, impatient and a little insecure. I make mistakes, I am out of control and at times hard to handle. But if you can't handle me at my worst, then you sure as hell don't deserve me at my best.
 Marilyn Monroe
tags: attributed-no-source, best, life, love, mistakes, out-of-control, truth, worst151752 likesLike
Mark Twain
If you tell the truth, you don't have to remember anything.
 Mark Twain
tags: lies, lying, memory, truth84863 likesLike
George Carlin
The reason I talk to myself is because Im the only one whose answers I accept.
 George Carlin
tags: humor, insanity, lies, lying, self-indulgence, truth19033 likesLike
When someone loves you, the way they talk about you is different. You feel safe and comfortable.
 Jess C. Scott, The Intern
tags: desire, emotion, friendship, honesty, imagination, individuality, life, love, passion, reality, relationships, romance, truth, wisdom, wise-words18888 likesLike
J.K. Rowling
The truth." Dumbledore sighed. "It is a beautiful and terrible thing, and should therefore be treated with great caution.
 J.K. Rowling, Harry Potter and the Sorcerer's Stone
tags: truth16279 likesLike
Oscar Wilde
The truth is rarely pure and never simple.
 Oscar Wilde, The Importance of Being Earnest
tags: truth16098 likesLike
Mark Twain
A lie can travel half way around the world while the truth is putting on its shoes.
 Mark Twain
tags: misattributed-mark-twain, truth15644 likesLike
Mark Twain
Never tell the truth to people who are not worthy of it.
 Mark Twain
tags: truth15549 likesLike
George Orwell
Perhaps one did not want to be loved so much as to be understood.
 George Orwell, 1984
tags: truth13607 likesLike
The truth will set you free, but first it will piss you off.
 Joe Klaas, Twelve Steps to Happiness
tags: anger, freedom, misattributed-gloria-steinem, truth12918 likesLike
Mahatma Gandhi
When I despair, I remember that all through history the way of truth and love have always won. There have been tyrants and murderers, and for a time, they can seem invincible, but in the end, they always fall. Think of it--always.
 Mahatma Gandhi
tags: despair, evil, goodness, inspirational, love, sadness, truth, victory11621 likesLike
I am not pretty. I am not beautiful. I am as radiant as the sun.
I am not pretty. I am not beautiful. I am as radiant as the sun.
 Suzanne Collins, The Hunger Games
tags: truth11604 likesLike
Aldous Huxley
Facts do not cease to exist because they are ignored.
 Aldous Huxley, Complete Essays 2, 1926-29
tags: fact, ignorance, truth9859 likesLike
Fyodor Dostoyevsky
Above all, don't lie to yourself. The man who lies to himself and listens to his own lie comes to a point that he cannot distinguish the truth within him, or around him, and so loses all respect for himself and for others. And having no respect he ceases to love.
 Fyodor Dostoevsky, The Brothers Karamazov
tags: lies, love, respect, self-deception, truth8927 likesLike
John Lennon
I believe in everything until it's disproved. So I believe in fairies, the myths, dragons. It all exists, even if it's in your mind. Who's to say that dreams and nightmares aren't as real as the here and now?
 John Lennon
tags: beatles, dragons, dreamers, dreaming, dreams, fairies, faith, mythology, nightmares, reality, truth8373 likesLike
George Orwell
In a time of deceit telling the truth is a revolutionary act.
 George Orwell
tags: truth7583 likesLike
Oscar Wilde
A thing is not necessarily true because a man dies for it.
 Oscar Wilde
tags: belief, death, ideals, martyr, truth7419 likesLike
George Carlin
Here's all you have to know about men and women: women are crazy, men are stupid. And the main reason women are crazy is that men are stupid.
 George Carlin, When Will Jesus Bring The Pork Chops?
tags: crazy, men, stupid, truth, women7391 likesLike
Socrates
The unexamined life is not worth living.
 Socrates
tags: inspiration, truth, wisdom6572 likesLike
Oscar Wilde
Man is least himself when he talks in his own person. Give him a mask, and he will tell you the truth.
 Oscar Wilde
tags: truth6567 likesLike
Winston S. Churchill
Men occasionally stumble over the truth, but most of them pick themselves up and hurry off as if nothing had happened.
 Winston S. Churchill
tags: truth6498 likesLike
Books are mirrors: you only see in them what you already have inside you.
 Carlos Ruiz Zafn, The Shadow of the Wind
tags: books, reading, truth6440 likesLike
William Faulkner
Never be afraid to raise your voice for honesty and truth and compassion against injustice and lying and greed. If people all over the world...would do this, it would change the earth.
 William Faulkner
tags: advocacy, dissent, protest, truth, truth-telling6040 likesLike
S.E. Hinton
I lie to myself all the time. But I never believe me.
 S.E. Hinton, The Outsiders
tags: lies, lying, self-deception, truth6025 likesLike
Mark Twain
Truth is stranger than fiction, but it is because Fiction is obliged to stick to possibilities; Truth isn't.
 Mark Twain, Following the Equator: A Journey Around the World
tags: books, truth5747 likesLike
Flannery O'Connor
The truth does not change according to our ability to stomach it.
 Flannery O'Connor
tags: truth5330 likesLike
Steve Maraboli
The truth is, unless you let go, unless you forgive yourself, unless you forgive the situation, unless you realize that the situation is over, you cannot move forward.
 Steve Maraboli, Unapologetically You: Reflections on Life and the Human Experience
tags: forgiveness, inspirational, letting-go, life, motivational, moving-forward, truth5070 likesLike
Stephanie Klein
Tell the truth, or someone will tell it for you.
 Stephanie Klein, Straight Up and Dirty
tags: humor, life, memoir, truth5020 likesLike
Pablo Picasso
Art is the lie that enables us to realize the truth.
 Pablo Picasso
tags: art, truth4900 likesLike
The things you do for yourself are gone when you are gone, but the things you do for others remain as your legacy.
 Kalu Ndukwe Kalu
tags: hope, inspiration, inspirational, life, truth4890 likesLike

Truth Quotes
Quotes tagged as "truth" Showing 31-60 of 18,248
Henry David Thoreau
Rather than love, than money, than fame, give me truth.
 Henry David Thoreau, Walden
tags: truth, values4866 likesLike
Ernest Hemingway
The best way to find out if you can trust somebody is to trust them.
 Ernest Hemingway
tags: trust, truth4819 likesLike
Jim Morrison
The most important kind of freedom is to be what you really are. You trade in your reality for a role. You trade in your sense for an act. You give up your ability to feel, and in exchange, put on a mask. There can't be any large-scale revolution until there's a personal revolution, on an individual level. It's got to happen inside first.
 Jim MORRISON
tags: freedom, individuality, inspirational, mask, personality, revolution, truth4706 likesLike
John Lennon
The more I see, the less I know for sure.
 John Lennon
tags: beatles, life, perception, truth4595 likesLike
Gabriel Garca Mrquez
It's enough for me to be sure that you and I exist at this moment.
 Gabriel Garca Mrquez, One Hundred Years of Solitude
tags: existence, truth4453 likesLike
Friedrich Nietzsche
There are no facts, only interpretations.
 Friedrich Nietzsche
tags: perspective, truth4383 likesLike
Be mindful. Be grateful. Be positive. Be true. Be kind.
 Roy T. Bennett, The Light in the Heart
tags: gratitude, inspiration, inspirational, inspirational-quotes, kindness, life, life-and-living, life-quotes, living-life, mindful, mindfulness, optimism, optimistic, positive, positive-affirmation, positive-life, positive-thinking, truth4366 likesLike
Do what is right, not what is easy nor what is popular.
 Roy T. Bennett, The Light in the Heart
tags: act, action, do, doing, inspiration, inspirational, inspirational-attitude, inspirational-life, inspirational-quotes, inspire, inspiring, life, life-and-living, life-lessons, life-quotes, living, motivation, motivational, optimism, optimistic, positive, positive-affirmation, positive-life, positive-thinking, right, truth, what-is-easy, what-is-popular, what-is-right4314 likesLike
Benjamin Disraeli
There are three types of lies -- lies, damn lies, and statistics.
 Benjamin Disraeli
tags: attributed-no-source, lies, lying, misattributed-mark-twain, statistics, truth3924 likesLike
Ernest Hemingway
All you have to do is write one true sentence. Write the truest sentence that you know.
 Ernest Hemingway
tags: truth, writing, writing-advice3878 likesLike
Sarah Dessen
So you're always honest," I said.
"Aren't you?"
"No," I told him. "I'm not."
"Well, that's good to know, I guess."
"I'm not saying I'm a liar," I told him. He raised his eyebrows. "That's not how I meant it, anyways."
"How'd you mean it, then?"
"I just...I don't always say what I feel."
"Why not?"
"Because the truth sometimes hurts," I said.
"Yeah," he said. "So do lies, though.
 Sarah Dessen, Just Listen
tags: lies, truth3857 likesLike
George Bernard Shaw
If you want to tell people the truth, make them laugh, otherwise they'll kill you.
 George Bernard Shaw
tags: kill, laughter, misattributed-oscar-wilde, truth3764 likesLike
Thomas Merton
The beginning of love is the will to let those we love be perfectly themselves, the resolution not to twist them to fit our own image. If in loving them we do not love what they are, but only their potential likeness to ourselves, then we do not love them: we only love the reflection of ourselves we find in them
 Thomas Merton, No Man Is an Island
tags: friendship, love, self-discovery, trust, truth3732 likesLike
Virginia Woolf
If you do not tell the truth about yourself you cannot tell it about other people.
 Virginia Woolf
tags: honesty, lies, stories, truth3713 likesLike
Eckhart Tolle
The past has no power over the present moment.
 Eckhart Tolle
tags: education, inspirational, life, philosophy, truth, wisdom3623 likesLike
William Blake
A truth that's told with bad intent
Beats all the lies you can invent.
 William Blake, Auguries of Innocence
tags: lies, logic, philosophy, religion, truth3328 likesLike
Franois de La Rochefoucauld
No persons are more frequently wrong, than those who will not admit they are wrong.
 Franois de La Rochefoucauld
tags: cynical, life, truth3202 likesLike
Robert Orben
Illegal aliens have always been a problem in the United States. Ask any Indian.
 Robert Orben
tags: humour, politics, truth3184 likesLike
C.S. Lewis
I have learned now that while those who speak about one's miseries usually hurt, those who keep silence hurt more.
 C. S. Lewis
tags: hurt, lewis, misery, sad, truth3163 likesLike
Michelle Hodkin
Thinking something does not make it true. Wanting something does not make it real.
 Michelle Hodkin, The Unbecoming of Mara Dyer
tags: inspirational-quotes, mara-dyer, reality, truth2942 likesLike
Edward Abbey
Better a cruel truth than a comfortable delusion.
 Edward Abbey
tags: truth2830 likesLike
Marcus Aurelius
Everything we hear is an opinion, not a fact. Everything we see is a perspective, not the truth.
 Marcus Aurelius , Meditations
tags: truth2732 likesLike
David Foster Wallace
The truth will set you free. But not until it is finished with you.
 David Foster Wallace, Infinite Jest
tags: freedom, truth2692 likesLike
Elizabeth Gilbert
To be fully seen by somebody, then, and be loved anyhow - this is a human offering that can border on miraculous.
 Elizabeth Gilbert, Committed: A Skeptic Makes Peace with Marriage
tags: acceptance, being-loved, love, marriage, relationships, truth2683 likesLike
Ernest Hemingway
All good books are alike in that they are truer than if they had really happened and after you are finished reading one you will feel that all that happened to you and afterwards it all belongs to you: the good and the bad, the ecstasy, the remorse and sorrow, the people and the places and how the weather was. If you can get so that you can give that to people, then you are a writer.
 Ernest Hemingway
tags: authors, good-books, truth, writers2637 likesLike
Jack Kerouac
The only truth is music.
 Jack Kerouac
tags: music, truth2632 likesLike
Most men would rather deny a hard truth than face it.
 George R.R. Martin, A Game of Thrones
tags: denial, honesty, truth2546 likesLike
Markus Zusak
Usually we walk around constantly believing ourselves. "I'm okay" we say. "I'm alright". But sometimes the truth arrives on you and you can't get it off. That's when you realize that sometimes it isn't even an answer--it's a question. Even now, I wonder how much of my life is convinced.
 Markus Zusak, The Book Thief
tags: truth2513 likesLike
George Washington
It is better to offer no excuse than a bad one.
 George Washington
tags: confession, excuses, honesty, lies, lying, truth2365 likesLike
Tim O'Brien
That's what fiction is for. It's for getting at the truth when the truth isn't sufficient for the truth.
 Tim O'Brien
tags: fiction, on-fiction, stories, truth, writing2317 likesLike

Truth Quotes
Quotes tagged as "truth" Showing 61-90 of 18,248
Hayley Williams
Sometimes it takes a good fall to really know where you stand
 Hayley Williams
tags: falling, knowing, lesson-on-living, life, paramore, singer, stand, success, truth, understanding2381 likesLike
Lemony Snicket
It is difficult, when faced with a situation you cannot control, to admit you can do nothing.
 Lemony Snicket, Horseradish
tags: truth2276 likesLike
Kahlil Gibran
When you are sorrowful look again in your heart, and you shall see that in truth you are weeping for that which has been your delight.
 Kahlil Gibran
tags: delight, heart, sorrow, truth, weeping2221 likesLike
Greg Behrendt
I'm about to make a wild, extreme and severe relationship rule: the word busy is a load of crap and is most often used by assholes. The word "busy" is the relationship Weapon of Mass Destruction. It seems like a good excuse, but in fact in every silo you uncover, all you're going to find is a man who didn't care enough to call. Remember men are never to busy to get what they want.
 Greg Behrendt
tags: behrendt, call, dating, faith, greg, he-s-not-just-into-you, love, marriage, romance, true, true-love, truth2220 likesLike
Lemony Snicket
There are times to stay put, and what you want will come to you, and there are times to go out into the world and find such a thing for yourself.
 Lemony Snicket, Horseradish
tags: life, patience, perseverance, seeking, truth2177 likesLike
Terry Pratchett
All right," said Susan. "I'm not stupid. You're saying humans need... fantasies to make life bearable."

REALLY? AS IF IT WAS SOME KIND OF PINK PILL? NO. HUMANS NEED FANTASY TO BE HUMAN. TO BE THE PLACE WHERE THE FALLING ANGEL MEETS THE RISING APE.

"Tooth fairies? Hogfathers? Little"

YES. AS PRACTICE. YOU HAVE TO START OUT LEARNING TO BELIEVE THE LITTLE LIES.

"So we can believe the big ones?"

YES. JUSTICE. MERCY. DUTY. THAT SORT OF THING.

"They're not the same at all!"

YOU THINK SO? THEN TAKE THE UNIVERSE AND GRIND IT DOWN TO THE FINEST POWDER AND SIEVE IT THROUGH THE FINEST SIEVE AND THEN SHOW ME ONE ATOM OF JUSTICE, ONE MOLECULE OF MERCY. AND YETDeath waved a hand. AND YET YOU ACT AS IF THERE IS SOME IDEAL ORDER IN THE WORLD, AS IF THERE IS SOME...SOME RIGHTNESS IN THE UNIVERSE BY WHICH IT MAY BE JUDGED.

"Yes, but people have got to believe that, or what's the point"

MY POINT EXACTLY.
 Terry Pratchett, Hogfather
tags: belief, justice, lies, mercy, truth2153 likesLike
People often claim to hunger for truth, but seldom like the taste when it's served up.
 George R.R. Martin, A Clash of Kings
tags: human-nature, people, truth2150 likesLike
Nadine Gordimer
The truth isn't always beauty, but the hunger for it is.
 Nadine Gordimer
tags: truth2107 likesLike
Malcolm X
I'm for truth, no matter who tells it. I'm for justice, no matter who it is for or against. I'm a human being, first and foremost, and as such I'm for whoever and whatever benefits humanity as a whole.
 Malcolm X
tags: activism, truth2102 likesLike
Ayn Rand
People think that a liar gains a victory over his victim. What Ive learned is that a lie is an act of self-abdication, because one surrenders ones reality to the person to whom one lies, making that person ones master, condemning oneself from then on to faking the sort of reality that persons view requires to be fakedThe man who lies to the world, is the worlds slave from then onThere are no white lies, there is only the blackest of destruction, and a white lie is the blackest of all.
 Ayn Rand, Atlas Shrugged
tags: lying, rearden, slave, truth, victim2067 likesLike
Katherine Boo
Much of what was said did not matter, and that much of what mattered could not be said.
 Katherine Boo, Behind the Beautiful Forevers: Life, Death, and Hope in a Mumbai Undercity
tags: truth2054 likesLike
Lao Tzu
The truth is not always beautiful, nor beautiful words the truth.
 Lao Tzu, Tao Te Ching
tags: apothegm, beauty, truth1977 likesLike
Oscar Wilde
We live in an age when unnecessary things are our only necessities.
 Oscar Wilde
tags: epigram, paradox, truth, wisdom1961 likesLike
Cassandra Clare
Men may be stronger, but it is women who endure.
 Cassandra Clare, Clockwork Princess
tags: tessa-gray, truth1871 likesLike
Sophie Kinsella
Theres no such thing as ruining your life. Lifes a pretty resilient thing, it turns out.
 Sophie Kinsella, The Undomestic Goddess
tags: life, resilience, ruins, truth1811 likesLike
Anne Lamott
You can safely assume you've created God in your own image when it turns out that God hates all the same people you do.
 Anne Lamott
tags: christianity, fundamentalism, god, humor, idolatry, misattributed-to-anne-lamott, spirituality, truth1770 likesLike
Friedrich Nietzsche
A thinker sees his own actions as experiments and questions--as attempts to find out something. Success and failure are for him answers above all.
 Friedrich Nietzsche
tags: failure, intelligence, science, scientific-process, success, truth1704 likesLike
C.S. Lewis
If you look for truth, you may find comfort in the end; if you look for comfort you will not get either comfort or truth only soft soap and wishful thinking to begin, and in the end, despair.
 C.S. Lewis
tags: truth1651 likesLike
Lemony Snicket
Just because you don't understand it doesn't mean it isn't so.
 Lemony Snicket, The Blank Book
tags: truth, understanding1627 likesLike
C. JoyBell C.
I think that we are like stars. Something happens to burst us open; but when we burst open and think we are dying; were actually turning into a supernova. And then when we look at ourselves again, we see that were suddenly more beautiful than we ever were before!
 C. JoyBell C.
tags: human, humanity, inspirational, inspirational-life, inspirational-quotes, inspiring, life, life-and-living, living, people, self-awareness, stars, strength, supernova, truth1611 likesLike
Sren Kierkegaard
There are two ways to be fooled. One is to believe what isn't true; the other is to refuse to believe what is true.
 Soren Kierkegaard
tags: blindness, fools, self-deception, truth, willful-blindness, willful-ignorance1598 likesLike
T.S. Eliot
Sometimes things become possible if we want them bad enough.
 T.S. Eliot
tags: memories, truth, wishes1566 likesLike
Carl Sagan
For me, it is far better to grasp the Universe as it really is than to persist in delusion, however satisfying and reassuring.
 Carl Sagan, The Demon-Haunted World: Science as a Candle in the Dark
tags: cosmology, delusion, knowledge, religion, science, truth, understanding1546 likesLike
Cassandra Clare
Something inside Clary cracked and broke, and words came pouring out. 'What do you want me to tell you? The truth? The truth is that I love Simon like I should love you, and I wish he was my brother and you weren't, but I can't do anything about that and neither can you!
 Cassandra Clare , City of Ashes
tags: city-of-ashes, clary-fray, jace-wayland, truth1523 likesLike
Those sweet lips. My, oh my, I could kiss those lips all night long.

Good things come to those who wait.
 Jess C. Scott, The Intern
tags: desire, funny, honesty, humor, humour, love, lust, passion, relationships, romance, sex, truth, wisdom, young, young-adult, young-adults, youth1476 likesLike
John Green
Nothing ever happens like you imagine it will
 John Green, Paper Towns
tags: life, love, margo-roth-spiegelman, truth1473 likesLike
Walt Whitman
Whatever satisfies the soul is truth.
 Walt Whitman
tags: soul, truth1471 likesLike
Wallace Stevens
Perhaps the truth depends on a walk around the lake.
 Wallace Stevens
tags: poetry, truth1412 likesLike
Maya Angelou
There's a world of difference between truth and facts. Facts can obscure truth.
 Maya Angelou
tags: truth1407 likesLike
J.D. Salinger
Im just sick of ego, ego, ego. My own and everybody elses. Im sick of everybody that wants to get somewhere, do something distinguished and all, be somebody interesting. Its disgusting.
 J.D. Salinger, Franny and Zooey
tags: truth1397 likesLike

Truth Quotes
Quotes tagged as "truth" Showing 91-120 of 18,248
Kurt Vonnegut Jr.
1492. As children we were taught to memorize this year with pride and joy as the year people began living full and imaginative lives on the continent of North America. Actually, people had been living full and imaginative lives on the continent of North America for hundreds of years before that. 1492 was simply the year sea pirates began to rob, cheat, and kill them.
 Kurt Vonnegut
tags: humor, truth1445 likesLike
Mahatma Gandhi
Truth never damages a cause that is just.
 Mahatma Gandhi
tags: honesty, justice, secrecy, transparency, truth, truth-telling1413 likesLike
Charles Bukowski
Life's as kind as you let it be.
 Charles Bukowski, Hot Water Music
tags: life, truth1365 likesLike
Nisargadatta Maharaj
It is always the false that makes you suffer, the false desires and fears, the false values and ideas, the false relationships between people. Abandon the false and you are free of pain; truth makes happy, truth liberates.
 Sri Nisargadatta Maharaj
tags: inspirational, spiritual, truth1362 likesLike
Jessamyn West
Fiction reveals truth that reality obscures.
 Jessamyn West
tags: books, on-fiction, reality, truth1341 likesLike
Leo Tolstoy
Wrong does not cease to be wrong because the majority share in it.
 Leo Tolstoy, A Confession
tags: conscience, majority, right-and-wrong, truth, wrong1317 likesLike
Sren Kierkegaard
The most common form of despair is not being who you are.
 Sren Kierkegaard
tags: self-betrayal, truth1313 likesLike
Voltaire
Love truth, but pardon error.
 Voltaire
tags: truth1305 likesLike
George Orwell
Being in a minority, even in a minority of one, did not make you mad. There was truth and there was untruth, and if you clung to the truth even against the whole world, you were not mad.
 George Orwell, 1984
tags: truth1292 likesLike
Carl Sagan
Who is more humble? The scientist who looks at the universe with an open mind and accepts whatever the universe has to teach us, or somebody who says everything in this book must be considered the literal truth and never mind the fallibility of all the human beings involved?
 Carl Sagan
tags: agnosticism, humility, science, skepticism, truth1280 likesLike
I envy people that know love. That have someone who takes them as they are.
 Jess C Scott, The Devilin Fey
tags: dark, dark-divine, dark-humor, dark-lover, darkness, desire, emotion, emotional, emotional-plague, emotionally-scared, emotions, envy, gothic, gothic-fiction, gothic-romance, incubus, life, love, lust, paranormal, paranormal-fiction, paranormal-romance, passion, self, succubus, supernatural, supernaturalism, truth, urban-fantasy1260 likesLike
Gautama Buddha
Three things can not hide for long: the Moon, the Sun and the Truth.
 Gautama Buddha
tags: truth1248 likesLike
Sylvia Plath
But when it came right down to it, the skin of my wrist looked so white and defensless that I couldn't do it. It was as if what I wanted to kill wasn't in that skin or the thin blue pulse that jumped under my thumb, but somewhere else, deeper, more secret, and a whole lot harder to get.
 Sylvia Plath, The Bell Jar
tags: life, relatable, truth1222 likesLike
Friends are the family you choose (~ Nin/Ithilnin, Elven rogue).
 Jess C Scott, The Other Side of Life
tags: cyberpunk, elven, elves, family, friends, friendship, human-behavior, human-nature, humanity, humankind, humans, inside-ourselves, insight, insightful, life, life-lessons, love, meaning, meaning-of-life, nq-mobile-omar-khan, omar-khan-nq-mobile, reflection, reflective, social-commentary, social-issues, social-science, society, truth, urban-fantasy, urban-fantasy-series, ya-urban-fantasy, young-adult, young-adult-fiction, young-adult-literature, young-adult-novels, young-adult-series1219 likesLike
Terry Goodkind
If the road is easy, you're likely going the wrong way.
 Terry Goodkind
tags: adversity, sword, truth1212 likesLike
Joss Whedon
Equality is not a concept. It's not something we should be striving for. It's a necessity. Equality is like gravity. We need it to stand on this earth as men and women, and the misogyny that is in every culture is not a true part of the human condition. It is life out of balance, and that imbalance is sucking something out of the soul of every man and woman who's confronted with it. We need equality. Kinda now.
 Joss Whedon
tags: equality, fairness, feminism, freedom-of-choice, inspirational, truth1211 likesLike
George Orwell
The essence of being human is that one does not seek perfection.
 George Orwell, In Front of Your Nose: 1945-1950
tags: humanity, truth, wisdom1181 likesLike
John Steinbeck
There's more beauty in truth, even if it is dreadful beauty.
 John Steinbeck, East of Eden
tags: truth1161 likesLike
Ally Carter
It is an occupational hazard that anyone who has spent her life learning how to lie eventually becomes bad at telling the truth.
 Ally Carter, Heist Society
tags: lies, truth1160 likesLike
Dorothy L. Sayers
Facts are like cows. If you look them in the face long enough, they generally run away.
 Dorothy L. Sayers
tags: facts, truth1153 likesLike
Yevgeny Yevtushenko
When truth is replaced by silence,the silence is a lie.
 Yevgeny Yevtushenko
tags: censorship, lies, lying, silence, truth1131 likesLike
Oscar Wilde
One should never trust a woman who tells one her real age. A woman who would tell one that would tell one anything.
 Oscar Wilde
tags: age, discretion, secret, trust, truth, woman1129 likesLike
Greg Behrendt
Here's something else to think about: calling when you say you're going to is the very first brick in the house you are building of love and trust. If he can't lay this one stupid brick down, you ain't never gonna have a house baby, and it's cold outside.
 Greg Behrendt, He's Just Not That Into You: The No-Excuses Truth to Understanding Guys
tags: behrendt, dating, greg, he-s-not-just-into-you, love, marriage, romance, truth1127 likesLike
C.S. Lewis
You never know how much you really believe anything until its truth or falsehood becomes a matter of life and death to you.
 C.S. Lewis
tags: belief, life-and-death, truth1086 likesLike
Things come apart so easily when they have been held together with lies.
 Dorothy Allison, Bastard Out of Carolina
tags: lies, lying, truth1085 likesLike
Karen Marie Moning
Words can be twisted into any shape. Promises can be made to lull the heart and seduce the soul. In the final analysis, words mean nothing. They are labels we give things in an effort to wrap our puny little brains around their underlying natures, when ninety-nine percent of the time the totality of the reality is an entirely different beast. The wisest man is the silent one. Examine his actions. Judge him by them.
 Karen Marie Moning
tags: actions, labels, promises, reality, silence, soul, truth, words1082 likesLike
Andr Gide
Believe those who are seeking the truth. Doubt those who find it.
 Andre Gide
tags: truth1070 likesLike
Ray Bradbury
But you can't make people listen. They have to come round in their own time, wondering what happened and why the world blew up around them. It can't last.
 Ray Bradbury, Fahrenheit 451
tags: lies, lying, truth, willful-ignorance1065 likesLike
John Green
One swing set, well worn but structurally sound, seeks new home. Make memories with your kid or kids so that someday he or she or they will look into the backyard and feel the ache of sentimentality as desperately as I did this afternoon. It's all fragile and fleeting, dear reader, but with this swing set, your child(ren) will be introduced to the ups and downs of human life gently and safely, and may also learn the most important lesson of all: No matter how hard you kick, no matter how high you get, you can't go all the way around.
 John Green, The Fault in Our Stars
tags: life, truth1031 likesLike
James Joyce
History, Stephen said, is a nightmare from which I am trying to awake.
 James Joyce, Ulysses
tags: history, truth1027 likesLike

Truth Quotes
Quotes tagged as "truth" Showing 121-150 of 18,248
Henri J.M. Nouwen
Over the years, I have come to realize that the greatest trap in our life is not success, popularity, or power, but self-rejection. Success, popularity, and power can indeed present a great temptation, but their seductive quality often comes from the way they are part of the much larger temptation to self-rejection. When we have come to believe in the voices that call us worthless and unlovable, then success, popularity, and power are easily perceived as attractive solutions. The real trap, however, is self-rejection. As soon as someone accuses me or criticizes me, as soon as I am rejected, left alone, or abandoned, I find myself thinking, "Well, that proves once again that I am a nobody." ... [My dark side says,] I am no good... I deserve to be pushed aside, forgotten, rejected, and abandoned. Self-rejection is the greatest enemy of the spiritual life because it contradicts the sacred voice that calls us the "Beloved." Being the Beloved constitutes the core truth of our existence.
 Henri J.M. Nouwen
tags: beloved, christianity, faith, feelings, identity, rejection, self, spiritual-life, spiritual-warfare, success, temptation, truth1099 likesLike
Greg Behrendt
Lets start with this statistic: You are delicious. Be brave, my sweet. I know you can get lonely. I know you can crave companionship and sex and love so badly that it physically hurts. But I truly believe that the only way you can find out that theres something better out there is to first believe theres something better out there. What other choice is there?
 Greg Behrendt, He's Just Not That Into You
tags: call, dating, dating-advice, guys, love, marriage, romance, truth1058 likesLike
Sarah J. Maas
The best lies were always mixed with truth.
 Sarah J. Maas, Crown of Midnight
tags: lie, truth1053 likesLike
Margaret Atwood
The only way you can write the truth is to assume that what you set down will never be read. Not by any other person, and not even by yourself at some later date. Otherwise you begin excusing yourself. You must see the writing as emerging like a long scroll of ink from the index finger of your right hand; you must see your left hand erasing it.
 Margaret Atwood, The Blind Assassin
tags: truth, writing1033 likesLike
Jodi Picoult
The truth doesn't always set you free; people prefer to believe prettier, neatley wrapped lies
 Jodi Picoult, Keeping Faith
tags: truth1032 likesLike
Delia Ephron
Wanting to be liked can get in the way of truth.
 Delia Ephron, Sister Mother Husband Dog: Etc.
tags: truth1023 likesLike
Live your truth. Express your love. Share your enthusiasm. Take action towards your dreams. Walk
Live your truth. Express your love. Share your enthusiasm. Take action towards your dreams. Walk your talk. Dance and sing to your music. Embrace your blessings. Make today worth remembering.
 Steve Maraboli, Unapologetically You: Reflections on Life and the Human Experience
tags: action, blessings, carpe-diem, dance, enthusiasm, express, inspiration, live, love, motivation, music, share, sing, talk, truth, walk1021 likesLike
Melina Marchetta
I can't believe I said it out loud. The truth doesn't set you free, you know. It makes you feel awkward and embarrassed and defenseless and red in the face and horrified and petrified and vulnerable. But free? I don't feel free. I feel like shit.
 Melina Marchetta, Saving Francesca
tags: truth996 likesLike
Abraham Lincoln
I am not bound to win, but I am bound to be true. I am not bound to
succeed, but I am bound to live up to what light I have.
 Abraham Lincoln
tags: honesty, honor, integrity, moral-courage, obligation, truth993 likesLike
Jane Austen
Seldom, very seldom, does complete truth belong to any human disclosure; seldom can it happen that something is not a little disguised or a little mistaken.
 Jane Austen, Emma
tags: deception, honesty, relationships, truth991 likesLike
Marcus Aurelius
If someone is able to show me that what I think or do is not right, I will happily change, for I seek the truth, by which no one was ever truly harmed. It is the person who continues in his self-deception and ignorance who is harmed.
 Marcus Aurelius, Meditations
tags: open-mindedness, prejudice, truth979 likesLike
A fit, healthy bodythat is the best fashion statement
 Jess C Scott
tags: beauty, body, body-image, culture, dance, dancer, desire, fashion, fitness, food, food-for-thought, friendship, funny, girl, health, healthy, hip-hop, honesty, humor, humour, imagination, individuality, life, love, lust-for-life, music, novel, passion, reality, relationships, self, sex, truth, wisdom, young, young-adult, young-adult-fiction, young-adult-literature, young-adult-novels, young-adults, youth977 likesLike
Laurie Halse Anderson
I have survived. I am here. Confused, screwed up, but here. So, how can I find my way? Is there a chain saw of the soul, an ax I can take to my memories or fears?
 Laurie Halse Anderson, Speak
tags: honesty, melinda, truth964 likesLike
Walter Scott
Oh, what a tangled web we weave...when first we practice to deceive.
 Walter Scott, Marmion
tags: deception, honesty, inspirational, lies, truth960 likesLike
Georges Bataille
I believe that truth has only one face: that of a violent contradiction.
 Georges Bataille, Violent Silence: Celebrating Georges Bataille
tags: contradiction, truth951 likesLike
Mark Twain
The Bible has noble poetry in it... and some good morals and a wealth of obscenity, and upwards of a thousand lies.
 Mark Twain
tags: agnosticism, atheism, bible, christianity, mythology, truth929 likesLike
Criss Jami
Never hide things from hardcore thinkers. They get more aggravated, more provoked by confusion than the most painful truths.
 Criss Jami
tags: aggravation, concealment, confusion, contemplation, dishonesty, hardcore, honesty, lie, lying, never, pain, provoke, secrecy, secrets, thinkers, thought, torture, truth916 likesLike
Leo Tolstoy
Boredom: the desire for desires.
 Leo Tolstoy
tags: truth910 likesLike
Charlie Chaplin
A man's true character comes out when he's drunk.
 Charlie Chaplin
tags: character, drunk, humor, people, truth909 likesLike
John Keats
I am certain of nothing but the holiness of the Heart's affections and the truth of the Imagination.
 John Keats
tags: imagination, love, truth905 likesLike
Douglas Adams
Anyone who is capable of getting themselves made President should on no account be allowed to do the job.
 Douglas Adams, The Hitchhiker's Guide to the Galaxy
tags: politics, presidency, truth, wishful-thinking902 likesLike
Albert Camus
Seeking what is true is not seeking what is desirable.
 Albert Camus, The Myth of Sisyphus and Other Essays
tags: absurd, existentialism, honesty, seeking, truth902 likesLike
Hunter S. Thompson
I have a theory that the truth is never told during the nine-to-five hours.
 Hunter S. Thompson
tags: journalist, truth900 likesLike
Henry David Thoreau
Our truest life is when we are in dreams awake.
 Henry David Thoreau
tags: dreams, truth898 likesLike
Albert Camus
Man is always prey to his truths. Once he has admitted them, he cannot free himself from them.
 Albert Camus, The Myth of Sisyphus and Other Essays
tags: philosophy, truth867 likesLike
I felt like an animal, and animals dont know sin, do they?
 Jess C. Scott, Wicked Lovely
tags: body, cool, desire, erotic, erotica, funny, girl, honesty, humor, humour, incest, love, lust, passion, relationships, romance, sex, sexuality, sister, taboo, truth, wisdom866 likesLike
June Ahern
How hurtful it can be to deny one's true self and live a life of lies just to appease others.
 June Ahern
tags: life-lessons, psychology, spirituality, truth856 likesLike
Therefore do not worry about tomorrow, for tomorrow will worry about its own things. Sufficient for the day is its own trouble. Matthew 6:34
 Anonymous, Holy Bible: King James Version
tags: carpe-diem, scripture, spiritual, truth851 likesLike
Veronica Roth
You dont believe things because they make your life better, you believe them because theyre true.
 Veronica Roth, Allegiant
tags: belief, truth850 likesLike
Leo Tolstoy
There is no greatness where there is not simplicity, goodness, and truth.
 Leo Tolstoy, War and Peace
tags: goodness, simplicity, truth836 likesLike

Truth Quotes
Quotes tagged as "truth" Showing 151-180 of 18,248
Audre Lorde
I was going to die, sooner or later, whether or not I had even spoken myself. My silences had not protected me. Your silences will not protect you.... What are the words you do not yet have? What are the tyrannies you swallow day by day and attempt to make your own, until you will sicken and die of them, still in silence? We have been socialized to respect fear more than our own need for language."

I began to ask each time: "What's the worst that could happen to me if I tell this truth?" Unlike women in other countries, our breaking silence is unlikely to have us jailed, "disappeared" or run off the road at night. Our speaking out will irritate some people, get us called bitchy or hypersensitive and disrupt some dinner parties. And then our speaking out will permit other women to speak, until laws are changed and lives are saved and the world is altered forever.

Next time, ask: What's the worst that will happen? Then push yourself a little further than you dare. Once you start to speak, people will yell at you. They will interrupt you, put you down and suggest it's personal. And the world won't end.

And the speaking will get easier and easier. And you will find you have fallen in love with your own vision, which you may never have realized you had. And you will lose some friends and lovers, and realize you don't miss them. And new ones will find you and cherish you. And you will still flirt and paint your nails, dress up and party, because, as I think Emma Goldman said, "If I can't dance, I don't want to be part of your revolution." And at last you'll know with surpassing certainty that only one thing is more frightening than speaking your truth. And that is not speaking.
 Audre Lorde
tags: feminism, revolution, silence, speaking-out, truth908 likesLike
William Wilberforce
You may choose to look the other way but you can never say again that you did not know.
 William Wilberforce
tags: abolition, accomplish, christian, great-britain, heard, hope, inspirational, love, peace, slavery, truth, try876 likesLike
Stefan Molyneux
There is nothing that is going to make people hate you more, and love you more, than telling the truth.
 Stefan Molyneux
tags: freedomain-radio, love, stefan-molyneux, truth869 likesLike
Michel de Montaigne
I quote others only in order the better to express myself.
 Michel de Montaigne, The Complete Essays
tags: expression, humor, irony, quoting, truth846 likesLike
W. Somerset Maugham
It is an illusion that youth is happy, an illusion of those who have lost it; but the young know they are wretched for they are full of the truthless ideal which have been instilled into them, and each time they come in contact with the real, they are bruised and wounded. It looks as if they were victims of a conspiracy; for the books they read, ideal by the necessity of selection, and the conversation of their elders, who look back upon the past through a rosy haze of forgetfulness, prepare them for an unreal life. They must discover for themselves that all they have read and all they have been told are lies, lies, lies; and each discovery is another nail driven into the body on the cross of life.
 W. Somerset Maugham, Of Human Bondage
tags: happiness, ideals, nostalgia, real, truth, youth832 likesLike
Alice Sebold
Nothing is ever certain.
 Alice Sebold, The Lovely Bones
tags: absolutes, cruel, death, lies, phrases, sad, truth813 likesLike
Leo Tolstoy
Muhammad has always been standing higher than the Christianity. He does not consider god as a human being and never makes himself equal to God. Muslims worship nothing except God and Muhammad is his Messenger. There is no any mystery and secret in it.
 Leo Tolstoy
tags: islam, muhammad, truth805 likesLike
William Shakespeare
What's done cannot be undone.
 William Shakespeare , Macbeth
tags: facing-facts, faits-accomplis, truth788 likesLike
Pema Chdrn
The most fundamental aggression to ourselves, the most fundamental harm we can do to ourselves, is to remain ignorant by not having the courage and the respect to look at ourselves honestly and gently.
 Pema Chdrn, When Things Fall Apart: Heart Advice for Difficult Times
tags: courage, mindfulness, pain, self-assessment, self-awareness, truth774 likesLike
Sara Gruen
With a secret like that, at some point the secret itself becomes irrelevant. The fact that you kept it does not.
 Sara Gruen, Water for Elephants
tags: secrets, truth768 likesLike
A.W. Tozer
What comes into our minds when we think about God is the most important thing about us.
 A.W. Tozer
tags: god, importance, important, minds, religion, the-truth, truth753 likesLike
Doris Lessing
There is no doubt fiction makes a better job of the truth.
 Doris May Lessing, Under My Skin: Volume One of My Autobiography, to 1949
tags: fiction, on-fiction, storytelling, truth, truth-telling742 likesLike
Czesaw Miosz
In a room where
people unanimously maintain
a conspiracy of silence,
one word of truth
sounds like a pistol shot.
 Czesaw Miosz
tags: democracy, dissent, heroes, honesty, integrity, truth, truth-telling, virtue738 likesLike
Jason Mraz
Youre not obligated to win. Youre obligated to keep trying. To the best you can do everyday.
 Jason Mraz
tags: failure, inspirational, life, success, truth, winning737 likesLike
Tim O'Brien
A thing may happen and be a total lie; another thing may not happen and be truer than the truth.
 Tim O'Brien, The Things They Carried
tags: lies, truth, war710 likesLike
Sue Monk Kidd
Knowing can be a curse on a person's life. I'd traded in a pack of lies for a pack of truth, and I didn't know which one was heavier. Which one took the most strength to carry around? It was a ridiculous question, though, because once you know the truth, you can't ever go back and pick up your suitcase of lies. Heavier or not, the truth is yours now.
 Sue Monk Kidd, The Secret Life of Bees
tags: lies, truth710 likesLike
Robin Hobb
When you cut pieces out of the truth to avoid looking like a fool you end up looking like a moron instead.
 Robin Hobb, Assassin's Apprentice
tags: truth685 likesLike
Banksy
Art should comfort the disturbed and disturb the comfortable.
 Banksy
tags: art, truth684 likesLike
C.G. Jung
Mistakes are, after all, the foundations of truth, and if a man does not know what a thing is, it is at least an increase in knowledge if he knows what it is not. 
 Carl G. Jung
tags: life, mistakes, psychology, truth680 likesLike
Ayn Rand
The truth is not for all men but only for those who seek it.
 Ayn Rand
tags: truth669 likesLike
Voltaire
Cherish those who seek the truth but beware of those who find it.
 Voltaire
tags: denial, fear, reality, truth, truth-hurts, truth-quotes, truths665 likesLike
Jos N. Harris
There is beauty in truth, even if it's painful. Those who lie, twist life so that it looks tasty to the lazy, brilliant to the ignorant, and powerful to the weak. But lies only strengthen our defects. They don't teach anything, help anything, fix anything or cure anything. Nor do they develop one's character, one's mind, one's heart or one's soul.
 Jos N. Harris
tags: liars, lies, lying, truth660 likesLike
John Lennon
Nothing is real.
 John Lennon, Beatles Lyrics
tags: beatles, reality, truth651 likesLike
V-Dayif you need this one day in a year to show everyone else you truly care for your loved one I think its quite stupid. I hate this commercialism. Its all artificial, and has nothing to do with real love.
 Jess C Scott, EyeLeash: A Blog Novel
tags: body, books, cool, culture, desire, emotion, friendship, funny, girl, honesty, humor, humour, imagination, individuality, life, love, music, novel, passion, reality, relationships, romance, self, sex, technology, truth, wisdom, young, youth649 likesLike
Niels Bohr
The opposite of a correct statement is a false statement. But the opposite of a profound truth may well be another profound truth.
 Niels Bohr
tags: paradoxes, science, truth632 likesLike
Isaac Newton
I do not know what I may appear to the world, but to myself I seem to have been only like a boy playing on the sea-shore, and diverting myself in now and then finding a smoother pebble or a prettier shell than ordinary, whilst the great ocean of truth lay all undiscovered before me.
 Isaac Newton
tags: science, truth629 likesLike
Leila Sales
Sometimes people think they know you. They know a few facts about you, and they piece you together in a way that makes sense to them. And if you don't know yourself very well, you might even believe that they are right. But the truth is, that isn't you. That isn't you at all.
 Leila Sales, This Song Will Save Your Life
tags: truth624 likesLike
C. JoyBell C.
For everything in this journey of life we are on, there is a right wing and a left wing: for the wing of love there is anger; for the wing of destiny there is fear; for the wing of pain there is healing; for the wing of hurt there is forgiveness; for the wing of pride there is humility; for the wing of giving there is taking; for the wing of tears there is joy; for the wing of rejection there is acceptance; for the wing of judgment there is grace; for the wing of honor there is shame; for the wing of letting go there is the wing of keeping. We can only fly with two wings and two wings can only stay in the air if there is a balance. Two beautiful wings is perfection. There is a generation of people who idealize perfection as the existence of only one of these wings every time. But I see that a bird with one wing is imperfect. An angel with one wing is imperfect. A butterfly with one wing is dead. So this generation of people strive to always cut off the other wing in the hopes of embodying their ideal of perfection, and in doing so, have created a crippled race.
 C. JoyBell C.
tags: ancient, flight, flying, human-race, humanity, imperfection, inspirational, inspirational-life, inspirational-quotes, inspiring, journey, life, life-and-living, life-s-journey, living, living-life, people, perfect, perfection, the-journey, truth, two-wings, wings, wisdom, wisdom-quotes624 likesLike
Jason Mraz
Ive come to the conclusion that people who wear headphones while they walk, are much happier, more confident, and more beautiful individuals than someone making the solitary drudge to work without acknowledging their own interests and power.
 Jason Mraz
tags: confidence, inspirational, life, music, power, spiritual, truth, work614 likesLike
John Waters
You should never read just for "enjoyment." Read to make yourself smarter! Less judgmental. More apt to understand your friends' insane behavior, or better yet, your own. Pick "hard books." Ones you have to concentrate on while reading. And for god's sake, don't let me ever hear you say, "I can't read fiction. I only have time for the truth." Fiction is the truth, fool! Ever hear of "literature"? That means fiction, too, stupid.
 John Waters, Role Models
tags: fiction, literature, on-fiction, reading, truth611 likesLike

Religion Quotes
Quotes tagged as "religion" Showing 1-30 of 11,582
Garrison Keillor
Anyone who thinks sitting in church can make you a Christian must also think that sitting in a garage can make you a car.
 Garrison Keillor
tags: humor, religion29254 likesLike
C.S. Lewis
I believe in Christianity as I believe that the sun has risen: not only because I see it, but because by it I see everything else.
 C.S. Lewis
tags: christianity, faith, religion, sun15906 likesLike
C.S. Lewis
The Christian does not think God will love us because we are good, but that God will make us good because He loves us.
 C.S. Lewis
tags: christianity, god, religion10531 likesLike
Albert Einstein
Science without religion is lame, religion without science is blind.
 Albert Einstein
tags: religion, science8960 likesLike
Charles Bukowski
For those who believe in God, most of the big questions are answered. But for those of us who can't readily accept the God formula, the big answers don't remain stone-written. We adjust to new conditions and discoveries. We are pliable. Love need not be a command nor faith a dictum. I am my own god. We are here to unlearn the teachings of the church, state, and our educational system. We are here to drink beer. We are here to kill war. We are here to laugh at the odds and live our lives so well that Death will tremble to take us.
 Charles Bukowski
tags: atheism, religion8372 likesLike
Stephen King
When his life was ruined, his family killed, his farm destroyed, Job knelt down on the ground and yelled up to the heavens, "Why god? Why me?" and the thundering voice of God answered, There's just something about you that pisses me off.
 Stephen King, Storm of the Century
tags: god, humor, religion7707 likesLike
John Milton
The mind is its own place, and in itself can make a heaven of hell, a hell of heaven..
 John Milton, Paradise Lost
tags: inspirational, religion7581 likesLike
George Carlin
Religion has actually convinced people that there's an invisible man living in the sky who watches everything you do, every minute of every day. And the invisible man has a special list of ten things he does not want you to do. And if you do any of these ten things, he has a special place, full of fire and smoke and burning and torture and anguish, where he will send you to live and suffer and burn and choke and scream and cry forever and ever 'til the end of time!

But He loves you. He loves you, and He needs money! He always needs money! He's all-powerful, all-perfect, all-knowing, and all-wise, somehow just can't handle money!
 George Carlin
tags: atheism, humor, life, religion6341 likesLike
Mahatma Gandhi
Prayer is not asking. It is a longing of the soul. It is daily admission of one's weakness. It is better in prayer to have a heart without words than words without a heart.
 Mahatma Gandhi
tags: god, heart, humanity, inspirational, prayer, religion, souls, weakness6106 likesLike
Mahatma Gandhi
God has no religion.
 Mahatma Gandhi
tags: god, religion5177 likesLike
Friedrich Nietzsche
In heaven, all the interesting people are missing.
 Friedrich Nietzsche
tags: heaven, religion4689 likesLike
Mahatma Gandhi
Hate the sin, love the sinner.
 Mahatma Gandhi
tags: hate, love, religion, sin, sinners4398 likesLike
C.S. Lewis
A man can no more diminish God's glory by refusing to worship Him than a lunatic can put out the sun by scribbling the word 'darkness' on the walls of his cell.
 C.S. Lewis, The Problem of Pain
tags: god, religion4195 likesLike
Rumi
Knock, And He'll open the door
Vanish, And He'll make you shine like the sun
Fall, And He'll raise you to the heavens
Become nothing, And He'll turn you into everything.
 Jalal Ad-Din Rumi
tags: islam, religion, spirituality3604 likesLike
Friedrich Nietzsche
I cannot believe in a God who wants to be praised all the time.
 Friedrich Nietzsche
tags: agama, agnosticism, prayer, religion3525 likesLike
Dan Brown
Science and religion are not at odds. Science is simply too young to understand.
 Dan Brown, Angels & Demons
tags: books, dan-brown, religion, science3460 likesLike
William Blake
A truth that's told with bad intent
Beats all the lies you can invent.
 William Blake, Auguries of Innocence
tags: lies, logic, philosophy, religion, truth3328 likesLike
Douglas Adams
Isn't it enough to see that a garden is beautiful without having to believe that there are fairies at the bottom of it too?
 Douglas Adams, The Hitchhiker's Guide to the Galaxy
tags: atheism, religion, skeptic3223 likesLike
C.S. Lewis
Atheism turns out to be too simple. If the whole universe has no meaning, we should never have found out that it has no meaning...
 C.S. Lewis
tags: atheism, religion3194 likesLike
Christopher Hitchens
Owners of dogs will have noticed that, if you provide them with food and water and shelter and affection, they will think you are god. Whereas owners of cats are compelled to realize that, if you provide them with food and water and shelter and affection, they draw the conclusion that they are gods.
 Christopher Hitchens, The Portable Atheist: Essential Readings for the Nonbeliever
tags: affection, atheism, cats, dogs, food, god, pets, religion, shelter, water3066 likesLike
Robert Frost
Forgive, O Lord, my little jokes on Thee
And I'll forgive Thy great big one on me.
 Robert Frost
tags: humor, poetry, religion2969 likesLike
Abraham Lincoln
My concern is not whether God is on our side; my greatest concern is to be on God's side, for God is always right.
 Abraham Lincoln
tags: inspirational, philosophical, politics, religion, religious2939 likesLike
Charlotte Bront
No sight so sad as that of a naughty child," he began, "especially a naughty little girl. Do you know where the wicked go after death?"

"They go to hell," was my ready and orthodox answer.

"And what is hell? Can you tell me that?"

"A pit full of fire."

"And should you like to fall into that pit, and to be burning there for ever?"

"No, sir."

"What must you do to avoid it?"

I deliberated a moment: my answer, when it did come was objectionable: "I must keep in good health and not die.
 Charlotte Bront, Jane Eyre
tags: children, hell, humor, religion2738 likesLike
Harper Lee
Sometimes the Bible in the hand of one man is worse than a whisky bottle in the hand of (another)... There are just some kind of men who - who're so busy worrying about the next world they've never learned to live in this one, and you can look down the street and see the results.
 Harper Lee, To Kill a Mockingbird
tags: bible, god, hatred, judgement, religion2700 likesLike
Ralph Waldo Emerson
All I have seen teaches me to trust the Creator for all I have not seen.
 Ralph Waldo Emerson
tags: belief, experience, faith, judging-from-experience, religion, unseen2669 likesLike
C.S. Lewis
He died not for men, but for each man. If each man had been the only man made, He would have done no less.
 C.S. Lewis
tags: god, religion2566 likesLike
John Lennon
I believe in God, but not as one thing, not as an old man in the sky. I believe that what people call God is something in all of us. I believe that what Jesus and Mohammed and Buddha and all the rest said was right. It's just that the translations have gone wrong.
 John Lennon
tags: god, organized-religion, religion, spirituality2551 likesLike
John Keats
Heard melodies are sweet, but those unheard, are sweeter
 John Keats, Ode On A Grecian Urn And Other Poems
tags: philosophy, religion, science2532 likesLike
Abraham Lincoln
When I do good, I feel good. When I do bad, I feel bad. That's my religion.
 Abraham Lincoln
tags: abraham-lincoln, religion2476 likesLike
Dalai Lama XIV
My religion is very simple. My religion is kindness.
 Dalai Lama XIV
tags: buddism, kindness, religion2431 likesLike

Religion Quotes
Quotes tagged as "religion" Showing 31-60 of 11,582
Friedrich Nietzsche
Is man merely a mistake of God's? Or God merely a mistake of man?
 Friedrich Nietzsche
tags: atheism, organized-religion, paradox, religion2390 likesLike
Mark Twain
The easy confidence with which I know another man's religion is folly teaches me to suspect that my own is also.
 Mark Twain
tags: humor, philosophy, religion2382 likesLike
Voltaire
Those who can make you believe absurdities, can make you commit atrocities.
 Voltaire, Questions sur les Miracles  M. Claparede, Professeur de Thologie  Genve, par un Proposant: Ou Extrait de Diverses Lettres de M. de Voltaire
tags: absurdities, atheism, atrocities, barbarity, injustice, religion, skepticism2323 likesLike
George Carlin
Religion is like a pair of shoes.....Find one that fits for you, but don't make me wear your shoes.
 George Carlin
tags: evangelism, freedom-of-religion, religion, tolerance2052 likesLike
Vikram Seth
God save us from people who mean well.
 Vikram Seth, A Suitable Boy
tags: god, good-intentions, humanity, religion1983 likesLike
Augustine of Hippo
Thou hast made us for thyself, O Lord, and our heart is restless until it finds its rest in thee.
 Augustine of Hippo, Confessions
tags: christ, christianity, desire, god, heart, jesus, longing, peace, religion, rest, restlessness1843 likesLike
T.D. Jakes
No woman wants to be in submission to a man who isn't in submission to God!
 T D Jakes
tags: christian, god, love, marriage, men, religion, spirituality, women1809 likesLike
Edgar Allan Poe
All religion, my friend, is simply evolved out of fraud, fear, greed, imagination, and poetry.
 Edgar Allan Poe
tags: irreligion, organized-religion, religion1795 likesLike
Richard Dawkins
The God of the Old Testament is arguably the most unpleasant character in all fiction: jealous and proud of it; a petty, unjust, unforgiving control-freak; a vindictive, bloodthirsty ethnic cleanser; a misogynistic, homophobic, racist, infanticidal, genocidal, filicidal, pestilential, megalomaniacal, sadomasochistic, capriciously malevolent bully.
 Richard Dawkins, The God Delusion
tags: bible, christianity, god, organized-religion, religion, yahweh1792 likesLike
Epicurus
Is God willing to prevent evil, but not able? Then he is not omnipotent.
Is he able, but not willing? Then he is malevolent.
Is he both able and willing? Then whence cometh evil?
Is he neither able nor willing? Then why call him God?
 Epicurus
tags: atheism, god, religion1788 likesLike
Mahatma Gandhi
There are people in the world so hungry, that God cannot appear to them except in the form of bread.
 Mahatma Gandhi
tags: bread, food, god, humanity, hunger, poverty, religion1734 likesLike
Alice Walker
I think it pisses God off if you walk by the color purple in a field somewhere and don't notice it.
 alice walker, The Color Purple
tags: color, god, purple, religion1723 likesLike
C.S. Lewis
God allows us to experience the low points of life in order to teach us lessons that we could learn in no other way.
 C.S. Lewis
tags: inspirational, religion1722 likesLike
George Carlin
He - and if there is a God, I am convinced he is a he, because no woman could or would ever fuck things up this badly.
 George Carlin
tags: equality, feminism, feminist, george-carlin, god, men-and-women, religion1711 likesLike
Carl Sandburg
A baby is God's opinion that the world should go on.
 Carl Sandburg
tags: children, hope, religion1581 likesLike
Above all else, guard your heart for it affects everything else you do.
 Anonymous, Holy Bible: New International Version
tags: bible, god, inspirational, religion1570 likesLike
Carl Sagan
For me, it is far better to grasp the Universe as it really is than to persist in delusion, however satisfying and reassuring.
 Carl Sagan, The Demon-Haunted World: Science as a Candle in the Dark
tags: cosmology, delusion, knowledge, religion, science, truth, understanding1546 likesLike
Alan W. Watts
Man suffers only because he takes seriously what the gods made for fun.
 Alan Wilson Watts
tags: buddhism, metaphysics, philosophy, religion, tao, taoism, theology, zen1449 likesLike
Isaac Asimov
Properly read, the Bible is the most potent force for atheism ever conceived.
 Isaac Asimov
tags: atheism, bible, organized-religion, religion1387 likesLike
John Green
People, I thought, wanted security. They couldn't bear the idea of death being a big black nothing, couldn't bear the thought of their loved ones not existing, and couldn't even imagine themselves not existing. I finally decided that people believed in an afterlife because they couldn't bear not to.
 John Green, Looking for Alaska
tags: religion1332 likesLike
Christopher Hitchens
To terrify children with the image of hell, to consider women an inferior creationis that good for the world?
 Christopher Hitchens
tags: atheism, child-abuse, children, feminism, hell, religion, religion-and-children, rhetorical-questions, sexism, women, women-and-religion1330 likesLike
George Carlin
I'm completely in favor of the
separation of Church and State.
... These two institutions screw us up enough
on their own, so both of them together is
certain death.
 George Carlin
tags: organized-religion, politics, religion1327 likesLike
Napolon Bonaparte
Religion is excellent stuff for keeping common people quiet. Religion is what keeps the poor from murdering the rich.
 Napoleon Bonaparte
tags: atheism, organized-religion, religion1316 likesLike
Jon   Stewart
Yes, reason has been a part of organized religion, ever since two nudists took dietary advice from a talking snake.
 Jon Stewart
tags: humor, religion1300 likesLike
Abraham Lincoln
I can see how it might be possible for a man to look down upon the earth and be an atheist, but I cannot conceive how a man could look up into the heavens and say there is no God.
 Abraham Lincoln
tags: abraham-lincoln, life, politics, religion, science1300 likesLike
Thomas Jefferson
The legitimate powers of government extend to such acts only as are injurious to others. It does me no injury for my neighbor to say there are twenty gods or no god. It neither picks my pocket nor breaks my leg.
 Thomas Jefferson
tags: atheism, philosophy, religion1280 likesLike
G.K. Chesterton
The Christian ideal has not been tried and found wanting. It has been found difficult; and left untried.
 G.K. Chesterton, What's Wrong with the World
tags: christian-behavior, christianity, pacifism, religion1271 likesLike
Elizabeth Gilbert
Look for God, suggests my Guru. Look for God like a man with his head on fire looks for water.
 Elizabeth Gilbert
tags: god, religion1259 likesLike
Voltaire
I have never made but one prayer to God, a very short one: Oh Lord, make my enemies ridiculous. And God granted it."

(Letter to tienne Nol Damilaville, May 16, 1767)
 Voltaire
tags: enmity, humor, prayers, religion, ridicule, satire, social-justice, social-life1209 likesLike
Albert Camus
I do not believe in God and I am not an atheist.
 Albert Camus, Notebooks 1951-1959
tags: atheism, god, religion1204 likesLike
 
Religion Quotes
Quotes tagged as "religion" Showing 61-90 of 11,585
G.K. Chesterton
Because children have abounding vitality, because they are in spirit fierce and free, therefore they want things repeated and unchanged. They always say, "Do it again"; and the grown-up person does it again until he is nearly dead. For grown-up people are not strong enough to exult in monotony. But perhaps God is strong enough to exult in monotony. It is possible that God says every morning, "Do it again" to the sun; and every evening, "Do it again" to the moon. It may not be automatic necessity that makes all daisies alike; it may be that God makes every daisy separately, but has never got tired of making them. It may be that He has the eternal appetite of infancy; for we have sinned and grown old, and our Father is younger than we.
 G. K. Chesterton, Orthodoxy
tags: humor, leibniz, religion, watchmaker1194 likesLike
Terry Pratchett
If complete and utter chaos was lightning, then he'd be the sort to stand on a hilltop in a thunderstorm wearing wet copper armour and shouting 'All gods are bastards!
 Terry Pratchett, The Color of Magic
tags: gods, humour, religion, stupidity1168 likesLike
Cassandra Clare
I believe in good and evil," said Jem. "And I believe the soul is eternal. But I don't believe in the fiery pit, the pitchforks, or endless torment. I do not believe you can threaten people into goodness."

Tessa looked at will. "What about you? What do you believe?

"Pulvis et umbra sumus," said Will, not looking at her as he spoke. "I believe we are dust and shadows. What else is there?
 Cassandra Clare, Clockwork Angel
tags: religion, young-adults-fantasy1153 likesLike
Stephen Colbert
If this is going to be a Christian nation that doesn't help the poor, either we have to pretend that Jesus was just as selfish as we are, or we've got to acknowledge that He commanded us to love the poor and serve the needy without condition and then admit that we just don't want to do it.
 Stephen Colbert
tags: christ, christian, christian-behavior, poor, religion, selfish1145 likesLike
Thomas Merton
My Lord God, I have no idea where I am going. I do not see the road ahead of me. I cannot know for certain where it will end. Nor do I really know myself, and the fact that I think that I am following your will does not mean that I am actually doing so. But I believe that the desire to please you does in fact please you. And I hope I have that desire in all that I am doing. I hope that I will never do anything apart from that desire. And I know that if I do this you will lead me by the right road though I may know nothing about it. Therefore will I trust you always though I may seem to be lost and in the shadow of death. I will not fear, for you are ever with me, and you will never leave me to face my perils alone.
 Thomas Merton, Thoughts in Solitude
tags: inspiration, religion1124 likesLike
Albert Camus
Do not wait for the last judgment. It comes every day.
 Albert Camus
tags: judgement, life, religion1120 likesLike
I think it's perfectly possible to explain how the universe came about without bringing God into it, but I don't know everything, and there may well be a God somewhere, hiding away. Actually, if he is keeping out of sight, it's because he's ashamed of his followers and all the cruelty and ignorance they're responsible for promoting in his name. If I were him, I'd want nothing to do with them.
 Philip Pullman
tags: cruelty, religion1104 likesLike
Mahatma Gandhi
It is easy enough to be friendly to one's friends. But to befriend the one who regards himself as your enemy is the quintessence of true religion. The other is mere business.
 Mahatma Gandhi
tags: compassion, enemies, friends, friendship, religion1085 likesLike
Emmett F. Fields
Atheism is more than just the knowledge that gods do not exist, and that religion is either a mistake or a fraud. Atheism is an attitude, a frame of mind that looks at the world objectively, fearlessly, always trying to understand all things as a part of nature.
 Emmett F. Fields
tags: atheism, misattributed-to-carl-sagan, religion1082 likesLike
Carl Sagan
In science it often happens that scientists say, 'You know that's a really good argument; my position is mistaken,' and then they would actually change their minds and you never hear that old view from them again. They really do it. It doesn't happen as often as it should, because scientists are human and change is sometimes painful. But it happens every day. I cannot recall the last time something like that happened in politics or religion.
 Carl Sagan
tags: politics, religion, science1069 likesLike
Jon   Stewart
Religion. It's given people hope in a world torn apart by religion.
 Jon Stewart
tags: absurd, organized-religion, paradox, religion1059 likesLike
Elizabeth Gilbert
I want God to play in my bloodstream the way sunlight amuses itself on the water.
 Elizabeth Gilbert, Eat, Pray, Love
tags: religion1031 likesLike
Friedrich Nietzsche
In truth,there was only one christian and he died on the cross.
 Friedrich Nietzsche
tags: christian-behavior, christianity, religion1026 likesLike
Albert Camus
I have no idea what's awaiting me, or what will happen when this all ends. For the moment I know this: there are sick people and they need curing.
 Albert Camus, The Plague
tags: afterlife, compassion, life, religion1025 likesLike
Dalai Lama XIV
This is my simple religion. No need for temples. No need for complicated philosophy. Your own mind, your own heart is the temple. Your philosophy is simple kindness.
 Dalai Lama XIV
tags: kindness, religion, self-containment975 likesLike
Ally Condie
Isn't it funny how the memories you cherish before a breakup can become your worst enemies afterwards? The thoughts you loved to think about, the memories you wanted to hold up to the light and view from every angle--it suddenly seems a lot safer to lock them in a box, far from the light of day and throw away the key. It's not an act of bitterness. It's an act if self-preservation. It's not always a bad idea to stay behind the window and look out at life instead, is it?
 Allyson Braithwaite Condie, First Day
tags: allyson-braithwaite-condie, box, breakup, church, day, first, humor, lockup, love, memories, novel, pain, religion, romance971 likesLike
Martin Luther King Jr.
Science investigates; religion interprets. Science gives man knowledge, which is power; religion gives man wisdom, which is control. Science deals mainly with facts; religion deals mainly with values. The two are not rivals.
 Martin Luther King, Jr
tags: religion, science964 likesLike
C.S. Lewis
It is when we notice the dirt that God is most present in us; it is the very sign of His presence.
 C.S. Lewis
tags: god, religion964 likesLike
Christopher Hitchens
Human decency is not derived from religion. It precedes it.
 Christopher Hitchens, God Is Not Great: How Religion Poisons Everything
tags: atheism, decency, humanism, religion950 likesLike
Shannon L. Alder
There comes a time in your life when you have to choose to turn the page, write another book or simply close it.
 Shannon L. Alder
tags: beliefs, books, boyfriend, choices, faith, family, friendships, girlfriend, hang-ups, in-love, life, love, marriage, memories, moving-on, nostalgia, obsessions, peace, relationships, religion, sister-in-laws, sisters, spouse, unrequited-love, wife, writing930 likesLike
 
     
  ,     
tags: life, mistake, regret, religion907 likesLike
Mark Twain
The dog is a gentleman; I hope to go to his heaven not man's.
 Mark Twain
tags: animals, dogs, heaven, inspirational, man, religion902 likesLike
Robert Anton Wilson
belief is the death of intelligence.
 Robert Anton Wilson, Cosmic Trigger: Die letzten Geheimnisse der Illuminaten oder An den Grenzen des erweiterten Bewusstseins
tags: atheism, belief, faith, intelligence, metaphysics, philosophy, religion898 likesLike
Frank Sinatra
Alcohol may be man's worst enemy, but the bible says love your enemy.
 Frank Sinatra
tags: alcohol, bible, drinking, enemies, religion878 likesLike
Bertrand Russell
And if there were a God, I think it very unlikely that He would have such an uneasy vanity as to be offended by those who doubt His existence
 Bertrand Russell
tags: god, religion847 likesLike
Benjamin Franklin
How many observe Christ's birthday! How few, His precepts!
 Benjamin Franklin
tags: christian-behavior, christmas, religion845 likesLike
Douglas Coupland
I don't deserve a soul, yet I still have one. I know because it hurts.
 Douglas Coupland, The Gum Thief
tags: humour, philosophy, religion, soul835 likesLike
Carl Sagan
Science is not only compatible with spirituality; it is a profound source of spirituality. When we recognize our place in an immensity of lightyears and in the passage of ages, when we grasp the intricacy, beauty, and subtlety of life, then that soaring feeling, that sense of elation and humility combined, is surely spiritual. So are our emotions in the presence of great art or music or literature, or acts of exemplary selfless courage such as those of Mohandas Gandhi or Martin Luther King, Jr. The notion that science and spirituality are somehow mutually exclusive does a disservice to both.
 Carl Sagan, The Demon-Haunted World: Science as a Candle in the Dark
tags: atheism, religion, science, science-vs-religion, spirituality818 likesLike
Dan Brown
Whether or not you believe in God, you must believe this: when we as a species abandon our trust in a power greater than us, we abandon our sense of accountability. Faiths all faiths are admonitions that there is something we cannot understand, something to which we are accountable. With faith we are accountable to each other, to ourselves, and to a higher truth. Religion is flawed, but only because man is flawed. The church consists of a brotherhood of imperfect, simple souls wanting only to be a voice of compassion in a world spinning out of control.
 Dan Brown, Angels & Demons
tags: faith, god, religion, science803 likesLike
Fulton J. Sheen
It takes three to make love, not two: you, your spouse, and God. Without God people only succeed in bringing out the worst in one another. Lovers who have nothing else to do but love each other soon find there is nothing else. Without a central loyalty life is unfinished.
 Fulton J. Sheen, Seven Words of Jesus and Mary: Lessons from Cana and Calvary
tags: catholicism, christianity, church, expectations, god, happiness, lovers, marriage, philosophy, relationship-with-god, relationships, religion, spirituality, unhappy-marriage784 likesLike

Religion Quotes
Quotes tagged as "religion" Showing 121-150 of 11,585
Bill Watterson
CALVIN:
This whole Santa Claus thing just doesn't make sense. Why all the secrecy? Why all the mystery?
If the guy exists why doesn't he ever show himself and prove it?
And if he doesn't exist what's the meaning of all this?
HOBBES:
I dunno. Isn't this a religious holiday?
CALVIN:
Yeah, but actually, I've got the same questions about God.
 Bill Watterson
tags: christmas, life, religion675 likesLike
Christopher Hitchens
We keep on being told that religion, whatever its imperfections, at least instills morality. On every side, there is conclusive evidence that the contrary is the case and that faith causes people to be more mean, more selfish, and perhaps above all, more stupid.
 Christopher Hitchens
tags: atheism, cruelty, ethics, ethics-in-religion, morality, morality-without-religion, religion, selfishness, stupidity658 likesLike
G.K. Chesterton
Religious liberty might be supposed to mean that everybody is free to discuss religion. In practice it means that hardly anybody is allowed to mention it.
 G.K. Chesterton
tags: freedom-of-religion, religion636 likesLike
Carl Sagan
I don't want to believe. I want to know.
 Carl Sagan
tags: atheism, education, religion, science634 likesLike
Tere Liye
Ya Rabb, Engkaulah alasan semua kehidupan ini. Engkaulah penjelasan atas semua kehidupan ini. Perasaan itu datang dariMu. Semua perasaan itu juga akan kembali kepadaMu. Kami hanya menerima titipan. Dan semua itu ada sungguh karenaMu...
Katakanlah wahai semua pencinta di dunia. Katakanlah ikrar cinta itu hanya karenaNya. Katakanlah semua kehidupan itu hanya karena Allah. Katakanlah semua getar-rasa itu hanya karena Allah. Dan semoga Allah yang Maha Mencinta, yang Menciptakan dunia dengan kasih-sayang mengajarkan kita tentang cinta sejati.
Semoga Allah memberikan kesempatan kepada kita untuk merasakan hakikatNya.
Semoga Allah sungguh memberikan kesempatan kepada kita untuk memandang wajahNya. Wajah yang akan membuat semua cinta dunia layu bagai kecambah yang tidak pernah tumbuh. Layu bagai api yang tak pernah panas membakar. Layu bagai sebongkah es yang tidak membeku. 
 Tere Liye, Hafalan Shalat Delisa
tags: love, religion622 likesLike
Albert Einstein
My religion consists of a humble admiration of the illimitable superior spirit who reveals himself in the slight details we are able to perceive with our frail and feeble mind.
 Albert Einstein
tags: god, religion, spirit, spirituality616 likesLike
Confucius
The hardest thing of all is to find a black cat in a dark room, especially if there is no cat.
 Confucius
tags: futility, knowledge, religion615 likesLike
John Lennon
God is a concept by which we measure our pain.
 John Lennon
tags: beatles, god, religion602 likesLike
Patrick Rothfuss
Only priests and fools are fearless and I've never been on the best of terms with God.
 Patrick Rothfuss, The Name of the Wind
tags: fear, religion581 likesLike
Carl Sagan
How is it that hardly any major religion has looked at science and concluded, This is better than we thought! The Universe is much bigger than our prophets said, grander, more subtle, more elegant? Instead they say, No, no, no! My god is a little god, and I want him to stay that way. A religion, old or new, that stressed the magnificence of the Universe as revealed by modern science might be able to draw forth reserves of reverence and awe hardly tapped by the conventional faiths.
 Carl Sagan, Pale Blue Dot: A Vision of the Human Future in Space
tags: awe, cosmology, epistemology, god, organized-religion, religion, science581 likesLike
Neil Gaiman
Religions are, by definition, metaphors, after all: God is a dream, a hope, a woman, an ironist, a father, a city, a house of many rooms, a watchmaker who left his prize chronometer in the desert, someone who loves youeven, perhaps, against all evidence, a celestial being whose only interest is to make sure your football team, army, business, or marriage thrives, prospers, and triumphs over all opposition. Religions are places to stand and look and act, vantage points from which to view the world. So none of this is happening. Such things could not occur. Never a word of it is literally true.
 Neil Gaiman, American Gods
tags: religion575 likesLike
Richard Dawkins
A child is not a Christian child, not a Muslim child, but a child of Christian parents or a child of Muslim parents. This latter nomenclature, by the way, would be an excellent piece of consciousness-raising for the children themselves. A child who is told she is a 'child of Muslim parents' will immediately realize that religion is something for her to choose -or reject- when she becomes old enough to do so.
 Richard Dawkins, The God Delusion
tags: children, indoctrination, religion571 likesLike
Salman Rushdie
From the beginning men used God to justify the unjustifiable.
 Salman Rushdie, The Satanic Verses
tags: dogma, extremism, fanaticism, god, inhumanity, justification, religion, zealotry562 likesLike
Rick Warren
You were made by God and for God and until you understand that, life will never make sense.
 Rick Warren
tags: faith, life, religion562 likesLike
Terry Pratchett
What have I always believed?
That on the whole, and by and large, if a man lived properly, not according to what any priests said, but according to what seemed decent and honest inside, then it would, at the end, more or less, turn out all right.
 Terry Pratchett, Small Gods
tags: belief, decency, honesty, morality, religion561 likesLike
John Green
Well, while you were in the bathroom, I sat down at this picnic table here in Bumblefug, Kentucky, and noticed that someone had carved that GOD HATES FAG, which, aside from being a grammatical nightmare, is absolutely ridiculous. So I'm changing it to 'God Hates Baguettes.' It's tough to disagree with that. Everybody hates baguettes.
 John Green, An Abundance of Katherines
tags: graffiti, homophobia, homosexuality, humor, picnic-tables, religion561 likesLike
Albert Einstein
I cannot imagine a God who rewards and punishes the objects of his creation, whose purposes are modeled after our own -- a God, in short, who is but a reflection of human frailty. Neither can I believe that the individual survives the death of his body, although feeble souls harbor such thoughts through fear or ridiculous egotisms.
 Albert Einstein
tags: god, rational, religion, thinking559 likesLike
Bernard Branson
Rejection is an opportunity for your selection.
 Bernard Branson
tags: adult, african-american-romance, angels, baby, bible, bible-study, business, childrens, christian-living, christian-romance, college, creativity, dark-fantasy, dating, economics, education, educational, entrepreneurship, ethics, explicit, faith, family, family-relationships, fantasy-romance, friendship, fun, funny, humorous-romance, jesus, leadership, love-story, management, marriage, meditation, motivational, nonfiction, paranormal-romance, parenting, personal-transformation, relationships, religion, romantic-comedy, romantic-suspense, self-esteem, self-help, sex, sexuality, sexy, spiritual-growth, spirituality, students, success, supernatural, teen, women, young-adult, young-adult-fantasy549 likesLike
David Hume
Beauty is no quality in things themselves: It exists merely in the mind which contemplates them; and each mind perceives a different beauty.
 David Hume, Of the Standard of Taste and Other Essays
tags: beauty, beholder, evil, god, perception, religion, religious-meaning529 likesLike
Haruki Murakami
If you think Gods there, He is. If you dont, He isnt. And if thats what Gods like, I wouldnt worry about it.
 Haruki Murakami, Kafka on the Shore
tags: atheism, god, religion523 likesLike
Jodi Picoult
Sometimes you can see things happen right in front of your eyes and still jump to the wrong conclusions.
 Jodi Picoult, Keeping Faith
tags: god, inspirational, religion515 likesLike
Albert Einstein
The most beautiful thing we can experience is the mysterious. It is the source of all true art and science. He to whom the emotion is a stranger, who can no longer pause to wonder and stand wrapped in awe, is as good as dead his eyes are closed. The insight into the mystery of life, coupled though it be with fear, has also given rise to religion. To know what is impenetrable to us really exists, manifesting itself as the highest wisdom and the most radiant beauty, which our dull faculties can comprehend only in their most primitive formsthis knowledge, this feeling is at the center of true religiousness.
 Albert Einstein, Living Philosophies
tags: curiosity, religion, spirituality, wonder505 likesLike
Christopher Hitchens
About once or twice every month I engage in public debates with those whose pressing need it is to woo and to win the approval of supernatural beings. Very often, when I give my view that there is no supernatural dimension, and certainly not one that is only or especially available to the faithful, and that the natural world is wonderful enoughand even miraculous enough if you insistI attract pitying looks and anxious questions. How, in that case, I am asked, do I find meaning and purpose in life? How does a mere and gross materialist, with no expectation of a life to come, decide what, if anything, is worth caring about?

Depending on my mood, I sometimes but not always refrain from pointing out what a breathtakingly insulting and patronizing question this is. (It is on a par with the equally subtle inquiry: Since you don't believe in our god, what stops you from stealing and lying and raping and killing to your heart's content?) Just as the answer to the latter question is: self-respect and the desire for the respect of otherswhile in the meantime it is precisely those who think they have divine permission who are truly capable of any atrocityso the answer to the first question falls into two parts. A life that partakes even a little of friendship, love, irony, humor, parenthood, literature, and music, and the chance to take part in battles for the liberation of others cannot be called 'meaningless' except if the person living it is also an existentialist and elects to call it so. It could be that all existence is a pointless joke, but it is not in fact possible to live one's everyday life as if this were so. Whereas if one sought to define meaninglessness and futility, the idea that a human life should be expended in the guilty, fearful, self-obsessed propitiation of supernatural nonentities but there, there. Enough.
 Christopher Hitchens, Hitch 22: A Memoir
tags: afterlife, atheism, debate, ethics, existence, existentialism, faith, god, life, materialism, meaning-of-life, morality, naturalism, religion, respect, secular-ethics, self-respect, supernaturalism503 likesLike
Charlotte Bront
Conventionality is not morality. Self-righteousness is not religion. To attack the first is not to assail the last.
 Charlotte Bront, Jane Eyre
tags: dissent, life, morality, religion500 likesLike
Albert Einstein
Your question is the most difficult in the world. It is not a question I can answer simply with yes or no. I am not an Atheist. I do not know if I can define myself as a Pantheist. The problem involved is too vast for our limited minds. May I not reply with a parable? The human mind, no matter how highly trained, cannot grasp the universe. We are in the position of a little child, entering a huge library whose walls are covered to the ceiling with books in many different tongues. The child knows that someone must have written those books. It does not know who or how. It does not understand the languages in which they are written. The child notes a definite plan in the arrangement of the books, a mysterious order, which it does not comprehend, but only dimly suspects. That, it seems to me, is the attitude of the human mind, even the greatest and most cultured, toward God. We see a universe marvelously arranged, obeying certain laws, but we understand the laws only dimly. Our limited minds cannot grasp the mysterious force that sways the constellations. I am fascinated by Spinoza's Pantheism. I admire even more his contributions to modern thought. Spinoza is the greatest of modern philosophers, because he is the first philosopher who deals with the soul and the body as one, not as two separate things.
 Albert Einstein
tags: cosmos, religion, science490 likesLike
Christopher Paolini
Perhaps not one religion contains all of the truth of the world. Perhaps every religion contains fragments of the truth, and it is our responsibility to identify those fragments and piece them together.
 Christopher Paolini, Brisingr
tags: philosophy, religion482 likesLike
Christopher Hitchens
Many religions now come before us with ingratiating smirks and outspread hands, like an unctuous merchant in a bazaar. They offer consolation and solidarity and uplift, competing as they do in a marketplace. But we have a right to remember how barbarically they behaved when they were strong and were making an offer that people could not refuse.
 Christopher Hitchens, God Is Not Great: How Religion Poisons Everything
tags: atheism, fundamentalism, religion475 likesLike
Neil deGrasse Tyson
The more I learn about the universe, the less convinced I am that there's any sort of benevolent force that has anything to do with it, at all.
 Neil deGrasse Tyson
tags: atheism, religion, science475 likesLike
Terry Pratchett
Night poured over the desert. It came suddenly, in purple. In the clear air, the stars drilled down out of the sky, reminding any thoughtful watcher that it is in the deserts and high places that religions are generated. When men see nothing but bottomless infinity over their heads they have always had a driving and desperate urge to find someone to put in the way.
 Terry Pratchett , Jingo
tags: desert, religion459 likesLike
What has he found who has lost God?
And what has he lost who has found God?
 Ibn 'Ata' Allah Al-Iskandari
tags: islam, religion, spirituality, sufism447 likesLike

Religion Quotes
Quotes tagged as "religion" Showing 151-180 of 11,585
Woody Allen
If Jesus came back and saw what was being done in his name, he'd never stop throwing up.
 Woody Allen, Hannah and Her Sisters
tags: christian-behavior, humor, organized-religion, religion, woody-allen726 likesLike
George Carlin
I have as much authority as the Pope. I just dont have as many people who believe it.
 George Carlin
tags: organized-religion, religion702 likesLike
Jiddu Krishnamurti
It is truth that liberates, not your effort to be free.
 Jiddu Krishnamurti, The First and Last Freedom
tags: inspirational, religion, truth520 likesLike
Aleksandr Solzhenitsyn
Gradually it was disclosed to me that the line separating good and evil passes not through states, nor between classes, nor between political parties either -- but right through every human heart -- and through all human hearts. This line shifts. Inside us, it oscillates with the years. And even within hearts overwhelmed by evil, one small bridgehead of good is retained. And even in the best of all hearts, there remains ... an unuprooted small corner of evil.

Since then I have come to understand the truth of all the religions of the world: They struggle with the evil inside a human being (inside every human being). It is impossible to expel evil from the world in its entirety, but it is possible to constrict it within each person.
 Aleksandr I. Solzhenitsyn, The Gulag Archipelago 19181956
tags: evil, good, heart, religion484 likesLike
Oliver James
Music is my higher power
 Oliver James
tags: music, religion477 likesLike
Woody Allen
I did not marry the first girl that I fell in love with, because there was a tremendous religious conflict, at the time.
She was an atheist, and I was an agnostic.
 Woody Allen
tags: absurd, atheism, humor, religion446 likesLike
Woody Allen
Photons have mass? I didnt even know they were Catholic.
 Woody Allen
tags: attributed, humor, physics, religion432 likesLike
Yann Martel
If there's only one nation in the sky, shouldn't all passports be valid for it?
 Yann Martel, Life of Pi
tags: hope, humanity, inspiration, religion429 likesLike
Barbara Kingsolver
God doesnt need to punish us. He just grants us a long enough life to punish ourselves.
 Barbara Kingsolver, The Poisonwood Bible
tags: religion425 likesLike
Ludwig Wittgenstein
The real question of life after death isn't whether or not it exists, but even if it does what problem this really solves.
 Ludwig Wittgenstein
tags: afterlife, philosophy, religion414 likesLike
George Bernard Shaw
Im an atheist and I thank God for it.
 George Bernard Shaw
tags: humor, religion414 likesLike
Thomas Jefferson
...legitimate powers of government reach actions only, & not opinions, I contemplate with sovereign reverence that act of the whole American people which declared that their legislature should 'make no law respecting an establishment of religion, or prohibiting the free exercise thereof,' thus building a wall of separation between Church & State. Adhering to this expression of the supreme will of the nation in behalf of the rights of conscience, I shall see with sincere satisfaction the progress of those sentiments which tend to restore to man all his natural rights, convinced he has no natural right in opposition to his social duties.
 Thomas Jefferson, Letters of Thomas Jefferson
tags: civil-rights, government, organized-religion, religion, separation-of-church-and-state413 likesLike
mile Zola
Civilization will not attain to its perfection until the last stone from the last church falls on the last priest.
 mile Zola
tags: atheism, civilization, organized-religion, religion401 likesLike
Mahatma Gandhi
I call him religious who understands the suffering of others.
 Mahatma Gandhi
tags: empathy, religion, understanding398 likesLike
C.S. Lewis
A young man who wishes to remain a sound atheist cannot be too careful of his reading.
 C.S. Lewis, Surprised by Joy: The Shape of My Early Life
tags: atheism, reading, religion393 likesLike
Sam Harris
We have a choice. We have two options as human beings. We have a choice between conversation and war. That's it. Conversation and violence. And faith is a conversation stopper.
 Sam Harris
tags: agnosticism, atheism, belief, ethics, faith, humanism, religion, spirituality388 likesLike
Friedrich Nietzsche
I assess the power of a will by how much resistance, pain, torture it endures and knows how to turn to its advantage
 Fredrich Nietzsche
tags: ant-christ, atheism, philosophy, religion388 likesLike
Carl Sagan
I consider it an extremely dangerous doctrine, because the more likely we are to assume that the solution comes from the outside, the less likely we are to solve our problems ourselves.
 Carl Sagan
tags: philosophy, religion, science386 likesLike
Robert A. Heinlein
Almost any sect, cult, or religion will legislate its creed into law if it acquires the political power to do so.
 Robert A. Heinlein
tags: cult, danger, law, organized-religion, power, religion, sect, separation-of-church-and-state386 likesLike
Albert Einstein
The word 'God' is for me nothing more than the expression and product of human weaknesses, the Bible a collection of honorable, but still primitive legends which are nevertheless pretty childish. No interpretation, no matter how subtle, can (for me) change this.
 Albert Einstein
tags: bible, god, religion385 likesLike
Terry Pratchett
Gods prefer simple, vicious games, where you Do Not Achieve Transcendence but Go Straight To Oblivion; a key to the understanding of all religion is that a god's idea of amusement is Snakes and Ladders with greased rungs.
 Terry Pratchett, Wyrd Sisters
tags: destiny, religion382 likesLike
Yann Martel
Hindus, in their capacity for love, are indeed hairless Christians, just as Muslims, in the way they see God in everything, are bearded Hindus, and Christians, in their devotion to God, are hat wearing Muslims.
 Yann Martel, Life of Pi
tags: religion382 likesLike
George Carlin
I would never want to be a member of a group whose symbol was a man nailed to two pieces of wood.
 George Carlin
tags: christianity, humor, religion377 likesLike
David Hume
Generally speaking, the errors in religion are dangerous; those in philosophy only ridiculous.
 David Hume, A Treatise of Human Nature
tags: errors, philosophy, religion367 likesLike
Mahatma Gandhi
I believe in the fundamental truth of all great religions of the world.
 Mahatma Gandhi
tags: god, religion, truth364 likesLike
Pope John Paul II
Do not abandon yourselves to despair. We are the Easter people and hallelujah is our song.
 Pope John Paul II (Karol Wojtya)
tags: christianity, depression, easter, joy, religion, spirituality360 likesLike
Gautama Buddha
Words do not express thoughts very well; every thing immediately becomes a little different, a little distorted, a little foolish. And yet it also pleases me and seems right that what is of value and wisdom of one man seems nonsense to another.
 Siddhartha Gautama
tags: philosophy, religion357 likesLike
Albert Einstein
All religions, arts and sciences are branches of the same tree. All these aspirations are directed toward ennobling man's life, lifting it from the sphere of mere physical existence and leading the individual towards freedom.
 Albert Einstein, Out of My Later Years: The Scientist, Philosopher, and Man Portrayed Through His Own Words
tags: arts, existence, freedom, life, purpose-of-life, religion, sciences355 likesLike
Charlotte Bront
Conventionality is not morality. Self-righteousness is not religion. To attack the first is not to assail the last. To pluck the mask from the face of the Pharisee, is not to lift an impious hand to the Crown of Thorns.

These things and deeds are diametrically opposed: they are as distinct as is vice from virtue. Men too often confound them: they should not be confounded: appearance should not be mistaken for truth; narrow human doctrines, that only tend to elate and magnify a few, should not be substituted for the world-redeeming creed of Christ. There is  I repeat it  a difference; and it is a good, and not a bad action to mark broadly and clearly the line of separation between them.
 Charlotte Bront, Jane Eyre
tags: appearances, criticism, religion, truth347 likesLike
C.S. Lewis
Oh, Adams sons, how cleverly you defend yourselves against all that might do you good!
 C.S. Lewis, The Magician's Nephew
tags: religion343 likesLike

Religion Quotes
Quotes tagged as "religion" Showing 181-210 of 11,585
Shannon L. Alder
The most confused you will ever get is when you try to convince your heart and spirit of something your mind knows is a lie.
 Shannon L. Alder
tags: acceptance, actions, beliefs, common-sense, confusion, disbelief, evidence, faith, family, hoping, life-purpose, love, mixed-signals, obvious, outrage, proof, reality, religion, sorrow, timing, truth, unrequited-love575 likesLike
Thomas Merton
To be grateful is to recognize the Love of God in everything He has given us - and He has given us everything. Every breath we draw is a gift of His love, every moment of existence is a grace, for it brings with it immense graces from Him.
Gratitude therefore takes nothing for granted, is never unresponsive, is constantly awakening to new wonder and to praise of the goodness of God. For the grateful person knows that God is good, not by hearsay but by experience. And that is what makes all the difference.
 Thomas Merton
tags: faith, gratitude, inspirational, religion542 likesLike
C.S. Lewis
There are no ordinary people. You have never talked to a mere mortal. Nations, cultures, arts, civilizations - these are mortal, and their life is to ours as the life of a gnat. But it is immortals whom we joke with, work with, marry, snub and exploit - immortal horrors or everlasting splendors. This does not mean that we are to be perpetually solemn. We must play. But our merriment must be of that kind (and it is, in fact, the merriest kind) which exists between people who have, from the outset, taken each other seriously - no flippancy, no superiority, no presumption.
 C.S. Lewis, The Weight of Glory
tags: christ, neighbor, ordinary-people, religion515 likesLike
Brandon Sanderson
Just because I do not accept the teachings of the devotaries does not mean I've discarded a belief in right and wrong."
"But the Almighty determines what is right!"
"Must someone, some unseen thing, declare what is right for it to be right? I believe that my own morality -- which answers only to my heart -- is more sure and true than the morality of those who do right only because they fear retribution.
 Brandon Sanderson, The Way of Kings
tags: altruism, belief, ethics, heart, humanism, morality, punishment, religion, retribution, right, wrong453 likesLike
Christopher Hitchens
I suppose that one reason I have always detested religion is its sly tendency to insinuate the idea that the universe is designed with 'you' in mind or, even worse, that there is a divine plan into which one fits whether one knows it or not. This kind of modesty is too arrogant for me.
 Christopher Hitchens, Hitch 22: A Memoir
tags: antitheism, arrogance, atheism, modesty, religion, solipsism438 likesLike
Martin Luther
I have so much to do that I shall spend the first three hours in prayer.
 Martin Luther
tags: prayer, religion390 likesLike
Joseph Campbell
All religions are true but none are literal.
 Joseph Campbell
tags: morality, religion372 likesLike
Elizabeth Berg
There are random moments - tossing a salad, coming up the driveway to the house, ironing the seams flat on a quilt square, standing at the kitchen window and looking out at the delphiniums, hearing a burst of laughter from one of my children's rooms - when I feel a wavelike rush of joy. This is my true religion: arbitrary moments of of nearly painful happiness for a life I feel privileged to lead.
 Elizabeth Berg, The Art of Mending
tags: happiness, joy, religion364 likesLike
Bill Maher
I have a problem with people who take the Constitution loosely and the Bible literally.
 Bill Maher
tags: bible, bill-of-rights, christianity, constitution, politics, religion359 likesLike
Joseph Campbell
Half the people in the world think that the metaphors of their religious traditions, for example, are facts. And the other half contends that they are not facts at all. As a result we have people who consider themselves believers because they accept metaphors as facts, and we have others who classify themselves as atheists because they think religious metaphors are lies.
 Joseph Campbell, Thou Art That: Transforming Religious Metaphor
tags: atheists, believers, metaphor, myth, organized-religion, religion, theists350 likesLike
Ray Bradbury
The minute you get a religion you stop thinking. Believe in one thing too much and you have no room for new ideas.
 Ray Bradbury, The October Country
tags: religion337 likesLike
G.K. Chesterton
Tradition means giving votes to the most obscure of all classes, our ancestors. It is the democracy of the dead. Tradition refuses to submit to the small and arrogant oligarchy of those who merely happen to be walking about.
 G.K. Chesterton, Orthodoxy
tags: catholic, politics, religion, tradition334 likesLike
Brennan Manning
To live by grace means to acknowledge my whole life story, the light side and the dark. In admitting my shadow side I learn who I am and what God's grace means.
 Brennan Manning
tags: religion, spiritual333 likesLike
Jimmy Carter
We should live our lives as though Christ was coming this afternoon.
 Jimmy Carter
tags: jesus-christ, judgement, life, preparation, religion332 likesLike
Mahatma Gandhi
I came to the conclusion long ago that all religions were true and that also that all had some error in them, and while I hold by my own religion, I should hold other religions as dear as Hinduism. So we can only pray, if we were Hindus, not that a Christian should become a Hindu; but our innermost prayer should be that a Hindu should become a better Hindu, a Muslim a better Muslim, and a Christian a better Christian.
 Mahatma Gandhi
tags: christian-behavior, inspirational, organized-religion, religion316 likesLike
C.S. Lewis
But, first, remember, remember, remember the signs. Say them to yourself when you wake in the morning and when you lie down at night, and when you wake in the middle of the night. And whatever strange things may happen to you, let nothing turn your mind from following the signs. And secondly, I give you a warning. Here on the mountain I have spoken to you clearly: I will not often do so down in Narnia. Here on the mountain, the air is clear and your mind is clear; as you drop down into Narnia, the air will thicken. Take great care that it does not confuse your mind. And the signs which you have learned here will not look at all as you expect them to look, when you meet them there. That is why it is so important to know them by heart and pay no attention to appearances. Remember the signs and believe the signs. Nothing else matters.
 C.S. Lewis, The Chronicles of Narnia
tags: religion314 likesLike
Anas Nin
When we blindly adopt a religion, a political system, a literary dogma, we become automatons.
 Anas Nin, The Diary of Anas Nin, Vol. 4: 1944-1947
tags: critical-thinking, dogma, freedom-of-thought, independent-thought, inspirational, politics, religion313 likesLike
Richard Dawkins
Religion is about turning untested belief into unshakable truth through the power of institutions and the passage of time.
 Richard Dawkins
tags: institutions, organized-religion, religion, richard-dawkins310 likesLike
Ravi Zacharias
I think the reason we sometimes have the false sense that God is so far away is because that is where we have put him. We have kept him at a distance, and then when we are in need and call on him in prayer, we wonder where he is. He is exactly where we left him.
 Ravi Zacharias, Has Christianity Failed You?
tags: god, inspirational, prayer, religion308 likesLike
George Bernard Shaw
The fact that a believer is happier than a skeptic is no more to the point than the fact that a drunken man is happier than a sober one. The happiness of credulity is a cheap and dangerous quality of happiness, and by no means a necessity of life.
 George Bernard Shaw, Androcles and the Lion
tags: religion304 likesLike
Kahlil Gibran
One's own religion is after all a matter between oneself and one's Maker and no one else's.
 Kahlil Gibran
tags: religion304 likesLike
H.P. Lovecraft
Religion is still useful among the herd - that it helps their orderly conduct as nothing else could. The crude human animal is in-eradicably superstitious, and there is every biological reason why they should be.
Take away his Christian god and saints, and he will worship something else...
 H.P. Lovecraft
tags: god, mankind, organized-religion, religion302 likesLike
Zora Neale Hurston
All gods who receive homage are cruel. All gods dispense suffering without reason. Otherwise they would not be worshipped. Through indiscriminate suffering men know fear and fear is the most divine emotion. It is the stones for altars and the beginning of wisdom. Half gods are worshipped in wine and flowers. Real gods require blood.
 Zora Neale Hurston, Their Eyes Were Watching God
tags: blood, cruelty, fear, gods, religion, suffering297 likesLike
Frank Zappa
There's a big difference between kneeling down and bending over.
 Frank Zappa
tags: religion297 likesLike
Elizabeth Gilbert
[Saint Anthony] said, in his solitude, he sometimes encountered devils who looked like angels, and other times he found angels who looked like devils. When asked how he could tell the difference, the saint said that you can only tell which is which by the way you feel after the creature has left your company.
 Elizabeth Gilbert, Eat, Pray, Love
tags: angels, devils, religion, saints289 likesLike
Stephen Hawking
When people ask me if a god created the universe, I tell them that the question itself makes no sense. Time didnt exist before the big bang, so there is no time for god to make the universe in. Its like asking directions to the edge of the earth; The Earth is a sphere; it doesnt have an edge; so looking for it is a futile exercise. We are each free to believe what we want, and its my view that the simplest explanation is; there is no god. No one created our universe,and no one directs our fate. This leads me to a profound realization; There is probably no heaven, and no afterlife either. We have this one life to appreciate the grand design of the universe, and for that I am extremely grateful.
 Stephen Hawking
tags: atheism, god, life, reality, religion285 likesLike
 
               !
  ,  
tags: religion, 284 likesLike
Lord Byron
There is something pagan in me that I cannot shake off. In short, I deny nothing, but doubt everything.
 George Gordon Byron
tags: pagan, religion283 likesLike
Voltairine de Cleyre
I die, as I have lived, a free spirit, an Anarchist, owing no allegiance to rulers, heavenly or earthly.
 Voltairine de Cleyre
tags: anarchy, atheism, religion276 likesLike
Robert Anton Wilson
The Bible tells us to be like God, and then on page after page it describes God as a mass murderer. This may be the single most important key to the political behavior of Western Civilization.
 Robert Anton Wilson
tags: anton, religion272 likesLike

Religion Quotes
Quotes tagged as "religion" Showing 241-270 of 11,585
Elizabeth Gilbert
I have good idea, for if you meet some person from different religion and he want to make argument about God. My idea is, you listen to everything this man say about God. Never argue about God with him. Best thing to say is, 'I agree with you.' Then you go home, pray what you want. This is my idea for people to have peace about religion.
 Elizabeth Gilbert, Eat, Pray, Love
tags: god, religion, tolerance381 likesLike
Vine Deloria Jr.
Religion is for people who're afraid of going to hell. Spirituality is for those who've already been there.
 Vine Deloria Jr.
tags: native-american-wisdom, religion, spirituality355 likesLike
Neil Gaiman
It doesn't matter that you didn't believe in us," said Mr. Ibis. "We believed in you.
 Neil Gaiman, American Gods
tags: religion301 likesLike
Umberto Eco
People are never so completely and enthusiastically evil as when they act out of religious conviction.
 Umberto Eco, The Prague Cemetery
tags: dogma, evil, fanaticism, fundamentalism, religion299 likesLike
Isaac Asimov
To surrender to ignorance and call it God has always been premature, and it remains premature today.
 Isaac Asimov
tags: religion, science, willful-ignorance299 likesLike
Stephen Hawking
There is a fundamental difference between religion, which is based on authority, and science, which is based on observation and reason. Science will win because it works.
 Stephen Hawking
tags: religion, religion-and-science, science287 likesLike
Scott Dikkers
Be sure to lie to your kids about the benevolent, all-seeing Santa Claus. It will prepare them for an adulthood of believing in God.
 Scott Dikkers, You Are Worthless: Depressing Nuggets of Wisdom Sure to Ruin Your Day
tags: advice, atheism, childhood, humor, kids, parenting, religion, santa282 likesLike
Christopher Hitchens
To be the father of growing daughters is to understand something of what Yeats evokes with his imperishable phrase 'terrible beauty.' Nothing can make one so happily exhilarated or so frightened: it's a solid lesson in the limitations of self to realize that your heart is running around inside someone else's body. It also makes me quite astonishingly calm at the thought of death: I know whom I would die to protect and I also understand that nobody but a lugubrious serf can possibly wish for a father who never goes away.
 Christopher Hitchens, Hitch 22: A Memoir
tags: atheism, daughters, death, fatherhood, fathers, god, mortality, religion, yeats275 likesLike
Madalyn Murray O'Hair
An atheist believes that a hospital
should be built instead of a church.
An atheist believes that deed must
be done instead of prayer said.
An atheist strives for involvement in life
and not escape into death.
He wants disease conquered,
poverty vanished, war eliminated.
 Madalyn Murray O'Hair
tags: atheism, atheists, religion273 likesLike
Dan Simmons
To see and feel one's beloved naked for the first time is one of life's pure, irreducible epiphanies. If there is a true religion in the universe, it must include that truth of contact or be forever hollow. To make love to the one true person who deserves that love is one of the few absolute rewards of being a human being, balancing all of the pain, loss, awkwardness, loneliness, idiocy, compromise, and clumsiness that go with the human condition. To make love to the right person makes up for a lot of mistakes.
 Dan Simmons, The Rise of Endymion
tags: beauty, connection, happiness, inspiration, love, religion, sex273 likesLike
Jos Saramago
Whether we like it or not, the one justification for the existence of all religions is death, they need death as much as we need bread to eat.
 Jos Saramago, Death with Interruptions
tags: death, existentialism, human, human-condition, life, religion258 likesLike
Timothy J. Keller
The gospel is this: We are more sinful and flawed in ourselves than we ever dared believe, yet at the very same time we are more loved and accepted in Jesus Christ than we ever dared hope.
 Timothy Keller, The Meaning of Marriage: Facing the Complexities of Commitment with the Wisdom of God
tags: christianity, hope, love, religion, sin258 likesLike
 
      ..                     ..           ..        ..
  ,     
tags: life, religion, sad, torture250 likesLike
Thich Nhat Hanh
The secret of Buddhism is to remove all ideas, all concepts, in order for the truth to have a chance to penetrate, to reveal itself.
 Thich Nhat Hanh, Buddha Mind, Buddha Body: Walking Toward Enlightenment
tags: buddhism, philosophy, religion250 likesLike
Friedrich Nietzsche
Two great European narcotics, alcohol and Christianity.
 Friedrich Nietzsche
tags: drinking, religion247 likesLike
Martin Luther
I am afraid that the schools will prove the very gates of hell, unless they diligently labor in explaining the Holy Scriptures and engraving them in the heart of the youth.
 Martin Luther
tags: education, faith, religion, religion-in-schools, scripture, teaching244 likesLike
Carl Sagan
The significance of our lives and our fragile planet is then determined only by our own wisdom and courage. We are the custodians of life's meaning. We long for a Parent to care for us, to forgive us our errors, to save us from our childish mistakes. But knowledge is preferable to ignorance. Better by far to embrace the hard truth than a reassuring fable. If we crave some cosmic purpose, then let us find ourselves a worthy goal.
 Carl Sagan, Pale Blue Dot: A Vision of the Human Future in Space
tags: atheism, god, knowledge, meaning, purpose, religion, truth232 likesLike
Reflection is the lamp of the heart. If it departs, the heart will have no light.
 Imam Al-Haddad
tags: islam, religion, spirituality, sufism232 likesLike
Mahatma Gandhi
Prayer is not an old woman's idle amusement. Properly understood and applied, it is the most potent instrument of action.
 Mahatma Gandhi
tags: god, inspirational, prayer, religion228 likesLike
The thought manifests the word;
The word manifests the deed;
The deed develops into habit;
And habit hardens into character;
So watch the thought and its ways with care,
And let them spring forth from love
Born out of compassion for all beings.
As the shadow follows the body, as we think, so we become.
 Dhammapada
tags: buddhism, compassion, integrity, religion227 likesLike
Christopher Hitchens
To 'choose' dogma and faith over doubt and experience is to throw out the ripening vintage and to reach greedily for the Kool-Aid.
 Christopher Hitchens, God Is Not Great: How Religion Poisons Everything
tags: atheism, dogma, doubt, experience, faith, kool-aid, religion, scepticism222 likesLike
D.H. Lawrence
This is what I believe: That I am I. That my soul is a dark forest. That my known self will never be more than a little clearing in the forest. That gods, strange gods, come forth from the forest into the clearing of my known self, and then go back. That I must have the courage to let them come and go. That I will never let mankind put anything over me, but that I will try always to recognize and submit to the gods in me and the gods in other men and women. There is my creed.
 DH Lawrence
tags: atheism, courage, creed, god, religion, soul217 likesLike
H.P. Lovecraft
Contrary to what you may assume, I am not a pessimist but an indifferentist- that is, I don't make the mistake of thinking that the... cosmos... gives a damn one way or the other about the especial wants and ultimate welfare of mosquitoes, rats, lice, dogs, men, horses, pterodactyls, trees, fungi, dodos, or other forms of biological energy.
 H. P. Lovecraft
tags: death, life, religion217 likesLike
When you grow up as a girl, it is like there are faint chalk lines traced approximately three inches around your entire body at all times, drawn by society and often religion and family and particularly other women, who somehow feel invested in how you behave, as if your actions reflect directly on all womanhood.
 M.E. Thomas, Confessions of a Sociopath: A Life Spent Hiding in Plain Sight
tags: feminism, gender, misogyny, psychopathy, religion, society, sociopathy, women217 likesLike
Thomas Jefferson
I write nothing for publication, and last of all things should it be on the subject of religion. On the dogmas of religion as distinguished from moral principles, all mankind, from the beginning of the world to this day, have been quarrelling, fighting, burning and torturing one another, for abstractions unintelligible to themselves and to all others, and absolutely beyond the comprehension of the human mind. Were I to enter on that arena, I should only add an unit to the number of Bedlamites.

[Letter to Mathew Carey, 11 November 1816]
 Thomas Jefferson, Letters of Thomas Jefferson
tags: dogma, religion, religious-violence212 likesLike
Isaac Asimov
Once, when a religionist denounced me in unmeasured terms, I sent him a card saying, "I am sure you believe that I will go to hell when I die, and that once there I will suffer all the pains and tortures the sadistic ingenuity of your deity can devise and that this torture will continue forever. Isn't that enough for you? Do you have to call me bad names in addition?
 Isaac Asimov, I. Asimov
tags: asimov, humor, rebuttal, religion, zealots206 likesLike
John Piper
Grace is the pleasure of God to magnify the worth of God by giving sinners the right and power to delight in God without obscuring the glory of God.
 John Piper
tags: religion206 likesLike
Jay Leno
The Supreme Court has ruled that they cannot have a nativity scene in Washington, D.C. This wasn't for any religious reasons. They couldn't find three wise men and a virgin.
 Jay Leno
tags: christianity, christmas, corruption, nativity, politics, religion, washington206 likesLike
G.K. Chesterton
According to most philosophers, God in making the world enslaved it. According to Christianity, in making it, He set it free. God had written, not so much a poem, but rather a play; a play he had planned as perfect, but which had necessarily been left to human actors and stage-managers, who had since made a great mess of it.
 G.K. Chesterton, Orthodoxy
tags: free-will, religion204 likesLike
Flannery O'Connor
I think it is safe to say that while the South is hardly Christ-centered, it is most certainly Christ-haunted.
 Flannery O'Connor
tags: christ, religion, south202 likesLike
 previous 1 2  5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13  99 100 next

Religion Quotes
Quotes tagged as "religion" Showing 271-300 of 11,585
Arthur Schopenhauer
Religion is the masterpiece of the art of animal training, for it trains people as to how they shall think. 
 Arthur Schopenhauer
tags: religion301 likesLike
Arthur C. Clarke
One of the greatest tragedies in mankind's entire history may be that morality was hijacked by religion.
 Arthur C. Clarke
tags: morality, organized-religion, religion271 likesLike
Lenny Bruce
Every day people are straying away from the church and going back to God.
 Lenny Bruce
tags: god, jesus, organized-religion, religion263 likesLike
Thomas Paine
One good schoolmaster is of more use than a hundred priests.
 Thomas Paine, The Age of Reason
tags: christianity, religion, separation-of-church-and-state, skepticism260 likesLike
Frank Zappa
Take the Kama Sutra. How many people died from the Kama Sutra as opposed to the Bible? Who wins?
 Frank Zappa
tags: religion252 likesLike
Emma Goldman
The philosophy of Atheism represents a concept of life without any metaphysical Beyond or Divine Regulator. It is the concept of an actual, real world with its liberating, expanding and beautifying possibilities, as against an unreal world, which, with its spirits, oracles, and mean contentment has kept humanity in helpless degradation.
 Emma Goldman, Anarchism and Other Essays
tags: anarchy, atheism, religion243 likesLike
C.S. Lewis
Talk to me about the truth of religion and I'll listen gladly. Talk to me about the duty of religion and I'll listen submissively. But don't come talking to me about the consolations of religion or I shall suspect that you don't understand.
 C.S. Lewis, A Grief Observed
tags: faith, god, grief, religion237 likesLike
Arthur Conan Doyle
What a lovely thing a rose is!"

He walked past the couch to the open window and held up the drooping stalk of a moss-rose, looking down at the dainty blend of crimson and green. It was a new phase of his character to me, for I had never before seen him show any keen interest in natural objects.

"There is nothing in which deduction is so necessary as religion," said he, leaning with his back against the shutters. "It can be built up as an exact science by the reasoner. Our highest assurance of the goodness of Providence seems to me to rest in the flowers. All other things, our powers, our desires, our food, are all really necessary for our existence in the first instance. But this rose is an extra. Its smell and its color are an embellishment of life, not a condition of it. It is only goodness which gives extras, and so I say again that we have much to hope from the flowers.
 Arthur Conan Doyle, The Naval Treaty
tags: deduction, flowers, goodness, hope, nature, providence, reason, religion, roses227 likesLike
Christopher Hitchens
Alcohol makes other people less tedious, and food less bland, and can help provide what the Greeks called entheos, or the slight buzz of inspiration when reading or writing. The only worthwhile miracle in the New Testamentthe transmutation of water into wine during the wedding at Canais a tribute to the persistence of Hellenism in an otherwise austere Judaea. The same applies to the seder at Passover, which is obviously modeled on the Platonic symposium: questions are asked (especially of the young) while wine is circulated. No better form of sodality has ever been devised: at Oxford one was positively expected to take wine during tutorials. The tongue must be untied. It's not a coincidence that Omar Khayyam, rebuking and ridiculing the stone-faced Iranian mullahs of his time, pointed to the value of the grape as a mockery of their joyless and sterile regime. Visiting today's Iran, I was delighted to find that citizens made a point of defying the clerical ban on booze, keeping it in their homes for visitors even if they didn't particularly take to it themselves, and bootlegging it with great brio and ingenuity. These small revolutions affirm the human.
 Christopher Hitchens, Hitch 22: A Memoir
tags: alcohol, ancient-greeks, atheism, boredom, brotherhood, cana, christianity, entheos, food, hellenism, inspiration, iran, judaea, marriage-at-cana, miracles, mullahs, new-testament, omar-khayyam, oxford, passover, passover-seder, plato, reading, religion, symposia, wine, writing224 likesLike
Neil Gaiman
If you sit down and think about it sensibly, you come up with some very funny ideas. Like: why make people inquisitive, and then put some forbidden fruit where they can see it with a big neon finger flashing on and off saying 'THIS IS IT!'? ... I mean, why do that if you really don't want them to eat it, eh? I mean, maybe you just want to see how it all turns out. Maybe it's all part of a great big ineffable plan. All of it. You, me, him, everything. Some great big test to see if what you've built all works properly, eh? You start thinking: it can't be a great cosmic game of chess, it has to be just very complicated Solitaire.
 Neil Gaiman , Good Omens: The Nice and Accurate Prophecies of Agnes Nutter, Witch
tags: christianity, fantasy, humor, life, religion221 likesLike
Terry Pratchett
On the Disc, the Gods aren't so much worshipped, as they are blamed.
 Terry Pratchett, The Color of Magic
tags: gods, religion209 likesLike
Sam Harris
It is taboo in our society to criticize a persons religious faith... these taboos are offensive, deeply unreasonable, but worse than that, they are getting people killed. This is really my concern. My concern is that our religions, the diversity of our religious doctrines, is going to get us killed. I'm worried that our religious discourse- our religious beliefs are ultimately incompatible with civilization.
 Sam Harris
tags: agnosticism, atheism, belief, ethics, humanism, religion, spirituality204 likesLike
Thomas Carlyle
If Jesus Christ were to come today, people would not even crucify him. They would ask him to dinner, and hear what he had to say, and make fun of it.
 Thomas Carlyle
tags: atheism, atheist, religion203 likesLike
I contend that we are both atheists. I just believe in one fewer god than you do. When you understand why you dismiss all the other possible gods, you will understand why I dismiss yours.
 Stephen Roberts
tags: atheism, belief, deism, religion, scepticism201 likesLike
Kahlil Gibran
Pity the nation that is full of beliefs and empty of religion.
Pity the nation that wears a cloth it does not weave
and eats a bread it does not harvest.

Pity the nation that acclaims the bully as hero,
and that deems the glittering conqueror bountiful.

Pity a nation that despises a passion in its dream,
yet submits in its awakening.

Pity the nation that raises not its voice
save when it walks in a funeral,
boasts not except among its ruins,
and will rebel not save when its neck is laid
between the sword and the block.

Pity the nation whose statesman is a fox,
whose philosopher is a juggler,
and whose art is the art of patching and mimicking

Pity the nation that welcomes its new ruler with trumpeting,
and farewells him with hooting,
only to welcome another with trumpeting again.

Pity the nation whose sages are dumb with years
and whose strongmen are yet in the cradle.

Pity the nation divided into fragments,
each fragment deeming itself a nation.
 Kahlil Gibran, The Garden of The Prophet
tags: philosophy, religion, spirituality201 likesLike
Fulton J. Sheen
Unless there is a Good Friday in your life, there can be no Easter Sunday.
 Archbishop Fulton J. Sheen
tags: catholic, catholicism, inspiration, religion201 likesLike
Thomas Paine
I have always strenuously supported the right of every man to his own opinion, however different that opinion might be to mine. He who denies to another this right, makes a slave of himself to his present opinion, because he precludes himself the right of changing it.
 Thomas Paine, The Age of Reason
tags: christianity, religion, skepticism198 likesLike
Ruth Hurmence Green
There was a time when religion ruled the world. It is known as the Dark Ages.
 Ruth Hurmence Green
tags: atheism, christianity, dark-ages, religion195 likesLike
Yuval Noah Harari
The capitalist and consumerist ethics are two sides of the same coin, a merger of two commandments. The supreme commandment of the rich is Invest! The supreme commandment of the rest of us is Buy! The capitalistconsumerist ethic is revolutionary in another respect. Most previous ethical systems presented people with a pretty tough deal. They were promised paradise, but only if they cultivated compassion and tolerance, overcame craving and anger, and restrained their selfish interests. This was too tough for most. The history of ethics is a sad tale of wonderful ideals that nobody can live up to. Most Christians did not imitate Christ, most Buddhists failed to follow Buddha, and most Confucians would have caused Confucius a temper tantrum. In contrast, most people today successfully live up to the capitalistconsumerist ideal. The new ethic promises paradise on condition that the rich remain greedy and spend their time making more money and that the masses give free reign to their cravings and passions and buy more and more. This is the first religion in history whose followers actually do what they are asked to do. How though do we know that we'll really get paradise in return? We've seen it on television.
 Yuval Noah Harari,   
tags: capitalism, capitalist, consumerism, inequality, poor, religion, rich195 likesLike
Brandon Sanderson
Jasnah had once defined a fool as a person who ignored information because it disagreed with desired results.
 Brandon Sanderson, Words of Radiance
tags: bias, bickering, disagreement, falacy, fool, information, intelligence, politics, religion, science, stupidity, wisdom195 likesLike
Dalai Lama XIV
We can reject everything else: religion, ideology, all received
wisdom. But we cannot escape the necessity of love and compassion....
This, then, is my true religion, my simple faith. In this sense, there is no need
for temple or church, for mosque or synagogue, no need for complicated
philosophy, doctrine or dogma. Our own heart, our own mind, is the temple.
The doctrine is compassion. Love for others and respect for their rights and
dignity, no matter who or what they are: ultimately these are all we need.
So long as we practice these in our daily lives, then no matter if we are
learned or unlearned, whether we believe in Buddha or God, or follow some
other religion or none at all, as long as we have compassion for others and
conduct ourselves with restraint out of a sense of responsibility, there is
no doubt we will be happy.
 Dalai Lama XIV
tags: religion191 likesLike
George Carlin
It turned out I was pretty good in science. But again, because of the small budget, in science class we couldn't afford to do experiments in order to prove theories. We just believed everything. Actually, I think that class was called Religion. Religion class was always an easy class. All you had to do was suspend the logic and reasoning you were being taught in all the other classes.
 George Carlin, Brain Droppings
tags: humor, logic, religion, science188 likesLike
Dan Brown
Forgiveness is God's greatest gift
 Dan Brown, The Da Vinci Code
tags: forgiveness, inspirational, religion182 likesLike
Terry Pratchett
The merest accident of microgeography had meant that the first man to hear the voice of Om, and who gave Om his view of humans, was a shepherd and not a goatherd. They have quite different ways of looking at the world, and the whole of history might have been different. For sheep are stupid, and have to be driven. But goats are intelligent, and need to be led.
 Terry Pratchett, Small Gods
tags: humor, religion180 likesLike
Dan Brown
Every faith in the world is based on fabrication. That is the definition of faithacceptance of that which we imagine to be true, that which we cannot prove. Every religion describes God through metaphor, allegory, and exaggeration, from the early Egyptians through modern Sunday school. Metaphors are a way to help our minds process the unprocessible. The problems arise when we begin to believe literally in our own metaphors.

Should we wave a flag and tell the Buddhists that we have proof the Buddha did not come from a lotus blossom? Or that Jesus was not born of a literal virgin birth? Those who truly understand their faiths understand the stories are metaphorical.
 Dan Brown, The Da Vinci Code
tags: da-vinci-code, dan-brown, god, religion174 likesLike
Richard Dawkins
The take-home message is that we should blame religion itself, not religious extremism - as though that were some kind of terrible perversion of real, decent religion. Voltaire got it right long ago: 'Those who can make you believe absurdities can make you commit atrocities.' So did Bertrand Russell: 'Many people would sooner die than think. In fact they do.
 Richard Dawkins, The God Delusion
tags: extremism, religion, religious-extremism174 likesLike
If absolute power corrupts absolutely, where does that leave God?
 George Deacon
tags: corruption, god, humor, power, religion168 likesLike
Jules Verne
Reality provides us with facts so romantic that imagination itself could add nothing to them.
 Jules Verne
tags: religion, science, skepticism162 likesLike
Rumi
Woman is the light of God.
 Rumi
tags: god, persian, persian-poetry, religion, rumi, rumi-poetry, women160 likesLike
  

Religion Quotes
Quotes tagged as "religion" Showing 301-330 of 11,585
C.S. Lewis
Aim at Heaven and you will get Earth 'thrown in': aim at Earth and you will get neither.
 C.S. Lewis, The Joyful Christian
tags: christ, christianity, religion363 likesLike
Douglas Adams
Now, the invention of the scientific method and science is, I'm sure we'll all agree, the most powerful intellectual idea, the most powerful framework for thinking and investigating and understanding and challenging the world around us that there is, and that it rests on the premise that any idea is there to be attacked and if it withstands the attack then it lives to fight another day and if it doesn't withstand the attack then down it goes. Religion doesn't seem to work like that; it has certain ideas at the heart of it which we call sacred or holy or whatever. That's an idea we're so familiar with, whether we subscribe to it or not, that it's kind of odd to think what it actually means, because really what it means is 'Here is an idea or a notion that you're not allowed to say anything bad about; you're just not. Why not? - because you're not!
 Douglas Adams
tags: atheism, religion, science278 likesLike
Abigail Adams
Well, knowledge is a fine thing, and mother Eve thought so; but she smarted so severely for hers, that most of her daughters have been afraid of it since. 
 Abigail Adams
tags: adam-and-eve, bible, christianity, feminism, genesis, knowledge, motherhood, old-testement, religion238 likesLike
David Mitchell
We have just enough religion to make us hate, but not enough to make us love.
 David Mitchell, The Thousand Autumns of Jacob de Zoet
tags: hate, love, religion226 likesLike
The fact is that more people have been slaughtered in the name of religion than for any other single reason. That, that my friends, that is true perversion!
 Harvey Milk
tags: history, organized-religion, religion226 likesLike
Robert A. Heinlein
One man's theology is another man's belly laugh.
 Robert A. Heinlein
tags: religion207 likesLike
Stephen Colbert
Here's an easy way to figure out if you're in a cult: If you're wondering whether you're in a cult, the answer is yes.
 Stephen Colbert, I Am America
tags: cult, humor, religion, satire190 likesLike
Kahlil Gibran
Your daily life is your temple and your religion.
 Kahill Gibran
tags: religion188 likesLike
Nicholas Sparks
I don't pray because it doesn't work. Prayer doesn't fix anything. Bad things happen anyway.
 Nicholas Sparks, Three Weeks With My Brother
tags: prayer, religion183 likesLike
Walt Whitman
Argue not concerning God,re-examine all that you have been told at church or school or in any book, dismiss whatever insults your soul
 Walt Whitman
tags: inspirational, personal-faith, religion181 likesLike
Eliezer Yudkowsky
There is no justice in the laws of nature, no term for fairness in the equations of motion. The Universe is neither evil, nor good, it simply does not care. The stars don't care, or the Sun, or the sky.

But they don't have to! WE care! There IS light in the world, and it is US!
 Eliezer Yudkowsky, Harry Potter and the Methods of Rationality
tags: humanism, morality, morals, philosophy, religion180 likesLike
Abraham Lincoln
The Bible is not my book nor Christianity my profession. I could never give assent to the long, complicated statements of Christian dogma.
 Abraham Lincoln, Speeches and Writings 18321858
tags: abraham-lincoln, religion177 likesLike
Brian Cox
The problem with todays world is that everyone believes they have the right to express their opinion AND have others listen to it.

The correct statement of individual rights is that everyone has the right to an opinion, but crucially, that opinion can be roundly ignored and even made fun of, particularly if it is demonstrably nonsense!
 Brian Cox
tags: atheism, critical-thinking, freedom, freedom-of-speech, honesty, manipulation, offense, opinions, rationality, religion, society176 likesLike
Dan Brown
Professor Langdon,' called a young man with curly hair in the back row, 'if Masonry is not a secret society, not a corporation, and not a religion, then what is it?'
'Well, if you were to ask a Mason, he would offer the following definition: Masonry is a system of morality, veiled in allegory and illustrated by symbols.'
'Sounds to me like a euphemism for "freaky cult." '
'Freaky, you say?'
'Hell yes!' the kid said, standing up. 'I heard what they do inside those secret buildings! Weird candlelight rituals with coffins, and nooses, and drinking wine out of skulls. Now that's freaky!'
Langdon scanned the class. 'Does that sound freaky to anyone else?'
'Yes!' they all chimed in.
Langdon feigned a sad sigh. 'Too bad. If that's too freaky for you, then I know you'll never want to join my cult.'
Silence settled over the room. The student from the Women's Center looked uneasy. 'You're in a cult?'
Langdon nodded and lowered his voice to a conspiratorial whisper. 'Don't tell anyone, but on the pagan day of the sun god Ra, I kneel at the foot of an ancient instrument of torture and consume ritualistic symbols of blood and flesh.'
The class looked horrified.
Langdon shrugged. 'And if any of you care to join me, come to the Harvard chapel on Sunday, kneel beneath the crucifix, and take Holy Communion.'
The classroom remained silent.
Langdon winked. 'Open your minds, my friends. We all fear what we do not understand.
 Dan Brown, The Lost Symbol
tags: cults, freemasonry, religion, secret-society172 likesLike
Mark Twain
In religion and politics peoples beliefs and convictions are in almost every case gotten at second-hand, and without examination, from authorities who have not themselves examined the questions at issue but have taken them at second-hand from other non-examiners, whose opinions about them were not worth a brass farthing.
 Mark Twain
tags: beliefs, politics, religion172 likesLike
Terry Pratchett
The figures looked more or less human. And they were engaged in religion. You could tell by the knives (it's not murder if you do it for a god).
 Terry Pratchett, Small Gods
tags: humor, religion171 likesLike
Gautama Buddha
The Way is not in the sky; the Way is in the heart.
 Gautama Buddha
tags: buddha, buddhism, life, living, religion, spirituality171 likesLike
Frank Zappa
The essence of Christianity is told us in the Garden of Eden history. The fruit that was forbidden was on the tree of knowledge. The subtext is, 'All the suffering you have is because you wanted to find out what was going on. You could be in the Garden of Eden if you had just kept your fucking mouth shut and hadn't asked any questions.
 Frank Zappa
tags: christianity, conservative, democrat, fundamentalism, homosexuality, humor, liberal, progressive, religion, republican, science164 likesLike
Steven Weinberg
Religion is an insult to human dignity. Without it you would have good people doing good things and evil people doing evil things.
But for good people to do evil things, that takes religion.
 Steven Weinberg
tags: religion163 likesLike
Jim Elliot
Forgive me for being so ordinary while claiming to know so extraordinary a God.
 Jim Elliot
tags: christian, christian-life, inspirational, religion163 likesLike
But with dogs, we do have "bad dog." Bad dog exists. "Bad dog! Bad dog! Stole a biscuit, bad dog!" The dog is saying, "Who are you to judge me? You human beings whove had genocide, war against people of different creeds, colors, religions, and I stole a biscuit?! Is that a crime? People of the world!"
"Well, if you put it that way, I think youve got a point. Have another biscuit, sorry.
 Eddie Izzard, Glorious
tags: bicuit, dog, ethics, humor, race, religion158 likesLike
Sam Harris
What I'm asking you to entertain is that there is nothing we need to believe on insufficient evidence in order to have deeply ethical and spiritual lives.
 Sam Harris
tags: agnosticism, atheism, belief, ethics, humanism, religion, spirituality154 likesLike
Mustafa Kemal Atatrk
My people are going to learn the principles of democracy the dictates of truth and the teachings of science. Superstition must go. Let them worship as they will, every man can follow his own conscience provided it does not interfere with sane reason or bid him act against the liberty of his fellow men.
 Mustafa Kemal Atatrk
tags: democracy, religion, secularism152 likesLike
Terry Pratchett
It was all very well going on about pure logic and how the universe was ruled by logic and the harmony of numbers, but the plain fact of the matter was that the Disc was manifestly traversing space on the back of a giant turtle and the gods had a habit of going round to atheists' houses and smashing their windows.
 Terry Pratchett, The Color of Magic
tags: gods, religion152 likesLike
Neil Gaiman
There was only one guy in the whole Bible Jesus ever personally promised a place with him in Paradise. Not Peter, not Paul, not any of those guys. He was a convicted thief, being executed. So don't knock the guys on death row. Maybe they know something you don't.
 Neil Gaiman, American Gods
tags: convicts, criminals, god, good-and-bad, good-and-evil, heaven, idealism, jesus, life-lessons, prejudice, prejudices, religion152 likesLike
Richard Dawkins
Many of us saw religion as harmless nonsense. Beliefs might lack all supporting evidence but, we thought, if people needed a crutch for consolation, where's the harm? September 11th changed all that.
 Richard Dawkins
tags: critical, religion, science, thinking152 likesLike
If moneys the god people worship, Id rather go worship the devil instead.
 Jess C Scott, Rockstar
tags: bromance, commercialism, core, core-of-the-soul, core-values, devil, god, humor, humour, job, materialism, mm, money, rat-race, religion, rockstar, sarcasm, sarcastic, sarcastic-humor, sarcastic-quotes, satan, society, work, working, worship, yaoi149 likesLike
Voltaire
What can you say to a man who tells you he prefers obeying God rather than men, and that as a result he's certain he'll go to heaven if he cuts your throat?
 Voltaire, Philosophical Dictionary
tags: extremism, fanaticism, murder, religion148 likesLike
    , 
tags: religion144 likesLike
Markus Zusak
A halo surrounded the grim reaper nun, Sister Maria. (By the way-I like this human idea of the grim reaper. I like the scythe. It amuses me.)
 Markus Zusak, The Book Thief
tags: death, religion140 likesLike

Religion Quotes
Quotes tagged as "religion" Showing 361-390 of 11,585
James Baldwin
If the concept of God has any validity or any use, it can only be to make us larger, freer, and more loving. If God cannot do this, then it is time we got rid of Him.
 James Baldwin, The Fire Next Time
tags: god, love, religion244 likesLike
Richard Francis Burton
The more I study religions the more I am convinced that man never worshiped anything but himself.
 Richard Francis Burton, The Book of a Thousand Nights and One Night: 17 Volumes, Complete
tags: organized-religion, religion, there-is-no-god-but-man204 likesLike
C.S. Lewis
But very quickly they all became grave again: for, as you know, there is a kind of happiness and wonder that makes you serious. It is too good to waste on jokes.
 C.S. Lewis, The Chronicles of Narnia
tags: narnia, religion186 likesLike
Let my heart be broken by the things that break the heart of God.
 Bob Pierce
tags: christianity, religion177 likesLike
Douglas Adams
I find the whole business of religion profoundly interesting. But it does mystify me that otherwise intelligent people take it seriously.
 Douglas Adams
tags: intelligence, religion170 likesLike
Joseph Smith Jr.
Whatever God requires is right, no matter what it is, although we may not see the reason there of until all of the events transpire.
 Joseph Smith
tags: god, mormonism, religion164 likesLike
Steve Martin
It's so hard to believe in anything anymore. I mean, it's like, religion, you really can't take it seriously, because it seems so mythological, it seems so arbitrary...but, on the other hand, science is just pure empiricism, and by virtue of its method, it excludes metaphysics. I guess I wouldn't believe in anything anymore if it weren't for my lucky astrology mood watch.
 Steve Martin
tags: humor, religion, science163 likesLike
Black Elk
The Holy Land is everywhere
 Black Elk
tags: conservation, ecology, environmentalism, native-american, religion, spirituality152 likesLike
George Carlin
And here's something else, another problem you might have: Suppose your prayers aren't answered. What do you say? "Well, it's God's will." "Thy Will Be Done." Fine, but if it's God's will, and He's going to do what He wants to anyway, why the fuck bother praying in the first place? Seems like a big waste of time to me! Couldn't you just skip the praying part and go right to His Will? It's all very confusing.
 George Carlin
tags: humor, prayer, religion150 likesLike
Terry Pratchett
No it's not!" said Constable Visit. "Atheism is a denial of a god."

"Therefore It Is A Religious Position," said Dorfl. "Indeed, A True Atheist Thinks Of The Gods Constantly, Albeit In Terms of Denial. Therefore, Atheism Is A Form Of Belief. If The Atheist Truly Did Not Believe, He Or She Would Not Bother To Deny.
 Terry Pratchett, Feet of Clay
tags: atheism, atheist, gods, religion146 likesLike
Yann Martel
It was my first clue that atheists are my brothers and sisters of a different faith. Like me, they go as far as the legs of reason will carry them - and then they leap. I'll be honest about it. It is not atheists who get stuck in my craw, but agnostics. Doubt is useful for awhile. We must all pass through the garden of Gethsemane. If Christ played with doubt, so must we. If Christ spent an anguished night in prayer, if He burst out from the Cross, "My God, my God, why have you forsaken me?" then surely we are also permitted doubt. But we must move on. To choose doubt as a philosophy of life is akin to choosing immobility as a means of transportation.
 Yann Martel, Life of Pi
tags: religion141 likesLike
Joyce Meyer
It is not about doing what we feel like. It is about doing what God says.
 Joyce Meyer
tags: christian-behavior, religion139 likesLike
Joseph Campbell
Every religion is true one way or another. It is true when understood metaphorically. But when it gets stuck in its own metaphors, interpreting them as facts, then you are in trouble.
 Joseph Campbell
tags: dogma, mythology, religion, tolerance, zealotry129 likesLike
Bill Watterson
Isn't it sad how some people's grip on their lives is so precarious that they'll embrace any preposterous delusion rather than face an occasional bleak truth?
 Bill Watterson, The Complete Calvin and Hobbes
tags: life, religion, truth126 likesLike
Amit Ray
Yoga is the art work of awareness on the canvas of body, mind, and soul.
 Amit Ray, Yoga and Vipassana: An Integrated Life Style
tags: art, art-work, awareness, canvas-of-life, culture, heart, love, mind-body-spirit, religion, religions, soul, yoga124 likesLike
Alice Walker
Man corrupt everything, say Shug. He on your box of grits, in your head, and all over the radio. He try to make you think he everywhere. Soon as you think he everywhere, you think he God. But he ain't. Whenever you trying to pray, and man plop himself on the other end of it, tell him to git lost, say Shug. Conjure up the flowers, wind, water, a big rock.
 Alice Walker, The Color Purple
tags: feminism, god, man, religion121 likesLike
Kirk Cameron
There is nothing more important than your eternal salvation.
 Kirk Cameron
tags: eternity, god, hope, important, inspirational, religion, salvation, truth120 likesLike
Christopher Hitchens
I am not even an atheist so much as an antitheist; I not only maintain that all religions are versions of the same untruth, but I hold that the influence of churches and the effect of religious belief, is positively harmful. Reviewing the false claims of religion I do not wish, as some sentimental materialists affect to wish, that they were true. I do not envy believers their faith. I am relieved to think that the whole story is a sinister fairy tale; life would be miserable if what the faithful affirmed was actually true.... There may be people who wish to live their lives under cradle-to-grave divine supervision, a permanent surveillance and monitoring. But I cannot imagine anything more horrible or grotesque.
 Christopher Hitchens
tags: atheism, religion119 likesLike
Dan Brown
Religion is flawed, but only because man is flawed.
 Dan Brown, Angels & Demons
tags: religion119 likesLike
Robert A. Heinlein
Goodness without wisdom always accomplishes evil.
 Robert Heinlein
tags: piety, religion, understanding, wisdom, zealotry119 likesLike
I am a religious person, although I am not a believer.
 Philip Pullman
tags: religion117 likesLike
Mark Twain
A man is accepted into a church for what he believes and he is turned out for what he knows.
 Mark Twain
tags: religion116 likesLike
John Henry Newman
God has created me to do Him some definite service. He has committed some work to me which He has not committed to another. I have my mission. I may never know it in this life, but I shall be told it in the next. I am a link in a chain, a bond of connection between persons.

He has not created me for naught. I shall do good; I shall do His work. I shall be an angel of peace, a preacher of truth in my own place, while not intending it if I do but keep His commandments.

Therefore, I will trust Him, whatever I am, I can never be thrown away. If I am in sickness, my sickness may serve Him, in perplexity, my perplexity may serve Him. If I am in sorrow, my sorrow may serve Him. He does nothing in vain. He knows what He is about. He may take away my friends. He may throw me among strangers. He may make me feel desolate, make my spirits sink, hide my future from me. Still, He knows what He is about.
 John Henry Newman
tags: catholic, catholicism, christianity, god, religion114 likesLike
The invisible and the non-existent look very much alike.
 Delos Banning McKown
tags: reason, religion, science109 likesLike
Daniel C. Dennett
You don't get to advertise all the good that your religion does without first scrupulously subtracting all the harm it does and considering seriously the question of whether some other religion, or no religion at all, does better.
 Daniel Dennett
tags: atheism, faith, religion105 likesLike
Ming-Dao Deng
All teachings are mere references. The true experience is living your own life. Then, even the holiest of words are only words.
 Deng Ming-Dao
tags: alive, experience, holy-books, life, living, religion, teaching, teachings, wisdom102 likesLike
Mustafa Kemal Atatrk
Those who use religion for their own benefit are detestable. We are against such a situation and will not allow it. Those who use religion in such a manner have fooled our people; it is against just such people that we have fought and will continue to fight.
 Mustafa Kemal Atatrk
tags: fight, inspirational, religion, secularism101 likesLike
Anton Szandor LaVey
Some religions actually go so far as to label anyone who belongs to a religious sect other than their own a heretic, even though the overall doctrines and impressions of godliness are nearly the same. For example: The Catholics believe the Protestants are doomed to Hell simply because they do not belong to the Catholic Church. In the same way, many splinter groups of the Christian faith, such as the evangelical or revivalist churches, believe the Catholics worship graven images. (Christ is depicted in the image that is most physiologically akin to the individual worshipping him, and yet the Christians criticize "heathens" for the worship of graven images.) And the Jews have always been given the Devil's name.
 Anton Szandor LaVey, The Satanic Bible
tags: christianity, heathens, hypocrite, lavey, religion, satanism101 likesLike
Criss Jami
If you have to say or do something controversial, aim so that people will hate that they love it and not love that they hate it.
 Criss Jami, Killosophy
tags: arguing, belief, controversial, controversy, debating, difference, difference-of-opinion, effectiveness, hate, love, make-a-difference, opinion, opinions, people, politics, protesting, rebel, rebellion, religion99 likesLike
Roger Zelazny
A totally nondenominational prayer: Insofar as I may be heard by anything, which may or may not care what I say, I ask, if it matters, that I be forgiven for anything I may have done or failed to do which requires forgiveness.  Conversely, if not forgiveness but something else may be required to insure any possible benefit for which I may be eligible after the destruction of my body, I ask that this, whatever it may be, be granted or withheld, as the case may be, in such a manner as to insure said benefit. I ask this in my capacity as your elected intermediary between yourself and that which may not be yourself, but which may have an interest in the matter of your receiving as much as it is possible for you to receive of this thing, and which may in some way be influenced by this ceremony. Amen.
 Roger Zelazny, Creatures of Light and Darkness
tags: agnostic, agnosticism, bureaucracy, funny, humor, mythology, parody, prayer, religion99 likesLike

Knowledge Quotes
Quotes tagged as "knowledge" Showing 1-30 of 8,830
Elbert Hubbard
A friend is someone who knows all about you and still loves you.
 Elbert Hubbard
tags: friend, friendship, knowledge, love79094 likesLike
Socrates
The only true wisdom is in knowing you know nothing.
 Socrates
tags: knowledge, wisdom13959 likesLike
The Seven Social Sins are: Wealth without work. Pleasure without conscience. Knowledge without character. Commerce
The Seven Social Sins are:

Wealth without work.
Pleasure without conscience.
Knowledge without character.
Commerce without morality.
Science without humanity.
Worship without sacrifice.
Politics without principle.


From a sermon given by Frederick Lewis Donaldson in Westminster Abbey, London, on March 20, 1925.
 Frederick Lewis Donaldson
tags: character, commerce, conscience, happiness, humanity, knowledge, misattributed-to-gandhi, money, morality, pleasure, politics, principle, sacrifice, science, sin, sins, wealth, work, worship12636 likesLike
Langston Hughes
Hold fast to dreams,
For if dreams die
Life is a broken-winged bird,
That cannot fly.
 Langston Hughes
tags: dreams, hope, inspiration, knowledge, wisdom10568 likesLike
Albert Einstein
Any fool can know. The point is to understand.
 Albert Einstein
tags: knowledge, learning, understanding, wisdom7872 likesLike
Mark Twain
I was gratified to be able to answer promptly, and I did. I said I didnt know.
 Mark Twain
tags: humor, knowledge6604 likesLike
Maya Angelou
I did then what I knew how to do. Now that I know better, I do better.
 Maya Angelou
tags: attributed, attributed-no-source, education, intelligence, knowledge, unsourced5203 likesLike
L. Frank Baum
No thief, however skillful, can rob one of knowledge, and that is why knowledge is the best and safest treasure to acquire.
 L. Frank Baum, The Lost Princess of Oz
tags: knowledge, thievery, treasure4580 likesLike
Friedrich Nietzsche
The man of knowledge must be able not only to love his enemies but also to hate his friends.
 Friedrich Nietzsche
tags: enemies, friends, friendship, hatred, intelligence, knowledge, love, wisdom4216 likesLike
John Locke
Reading furnishes the mind only with materials of knowledge; it is thinking that makes what we read ours.
 John Locke
tags: knowledge, reading, thinking3694 likesLike
Dan Brown
Great minds are always feared by lesser minds.
 Dan Brown, The Lost Symbol
tags: knowledge3534 likesLike
Socrates
I cannot teach anybody anything. I can only make them think
 Socrates
tags: knowledge, philosophy3185 likesLike
Eoin Colfer
Confidence is ignorance. If you're feeling cocky, it's because there's something you don't know.
 Eoin Colfer, Artemis Fowl
tags: confidence, humor, ignorance, knowledge3182 likesLike
Daniel J. Boorstin
The greatest enemy of knowledge is not ignorance, it is the illusion of knowledge.
 Daniel J. Boorstin
tags: ignorance, knowledge, misattributed-stephen-hawking2974 likesLike
Rick Riordan
Knowing too much of your future is never a good thing.
 Rick Riordan, The Lightning Thief
tags: fate, future, knowledge2926 likesLike
Cassandra Clare
Jace?"
"Yeah?"
"How did you know I had Shadowhunter blood? Was there some way you could tell?"
The elevator arrived with a final groan. Jace unlatched the gate and slid it open. The inside reminded Clary of a birdcage, all black metal and decorative bits of gilt. "I guessed," he said, latching the door behind them. "It seemed like the most likely explanation."
"You guessed? You must have been pretty sure, considering you could have killed me."
He pressed a button in the wall, and the elevator lurched into action with a vibrating groan that she felt all through the bones in her feet. "I was ninety percent sure."
"I see," Clary said.
There must have been something in her voice, because he turned to look at her. Her hand cracked across his face, a slap that rocked him back on his heels. He put a hand to his cheek, more in surprise than pain. "What the hell was that for?"
The other ten percent," she said, and they rode the rest of the way down to the street in silence.
 Cassandra Clare, City of Bones
tags: 10, 90, blood, clary-fray, elevator, jace-wayland, knowledge, shadowhunter2389 likesLike
Neil deGrasse Tyson
For me, I am driven by two main philosophies: know more today about the world than I knew yesterday and lessen the suffering of others. You'd be surprised how far that gets you.
 Neil deGrasse Tyson
tags: compassion, inspiration, inspirational, knowledge, learning, philosophy, science, values2376 likesLike
Hilary Mantel
It is the absence of facts that frightens people: the gap you open, into which they pour their fears, fantasies, desires.
 Hilary Mantel, Wolf Hall
tags: facts, knowledge2262 likesLike
Isaac Asimov
Your assumptions are your windows on the world. Scrub them off every once in a while, or the light won't come in.
 Isaac Asimov
tags: assumptions, close-mindedness, intelligence, isaac-asimov, knowledge, open-mind, open-mindedness, open-minds, opinions, receptivity, science, science-of-mind2248 likesLike
Howard Nemerov
Write what you know. That should leave you with a lot of free time.
 Howard Nemerov
tags: humor, knowledge, literature, writing2146 likesLike
Hermann Hesse
Wisdom cannot be imparted. Wisdom that a wise man attempts to impart always sounds like foolishness to someone else ... Knowledge can be communicated, but not wisdom. One can find it, live it, do wonders through it, but one cannot communicate and teach it.
 Hermann Hesse, Siddhartha
tags: communication, foolishness, knowledge, sharing, teaching, wisdom1876 likesLike
Cassandra Clare
All knowledge hurts.
 Cassandra Clare, City of Bones
tags: city-of-bones, disillusionment, experience, knowledge, wisdom1860 likesLike
C. JoyBell C.
Last night I lost the world, and gained the universe.
 C. JoyBell C.
tags: enlightenment, forgiveness, inspirational-quotes, knowledge, letting-go1791 likesLike
Anas Nin
The possession of knowledge does not kill the sense of wonder and mystery. There is always more mystery.
 Anais Nin
tags: knowledge, mystery, sense-of-wonder, spirituality1767 likesLike
Russell T. Davies
Doctor Who: You want weapons? We're in a library. Books are the best weapon in the world. This room's the greatest arsenal we could have. Arm yourself!

(from Tooth and Claw in Season 2)
 Russell T. Davies
tags: books, doctor-who, knowledge, library, reading, weapons1751 likesLike
Hermann Hesse
I have been and still am a seeker, but I have ceased to question stars and books; I have begun to listen to the teaching my blood whispers to me.
 Hermann Hesse, Demian: Die Geschichte von Emil Sinclairs Jugend
tags: inspiration, instinct, knowledge, search, seekers, self-awareness, self-discovery, understanding1642 likesLike
I mean, you could claim that anything's real if the only basis for believing in it is that nobody's proved it doesn't exist!
 J.K. Rowling
tags: common-sense, hermione-granger, knowledge, logic, reason, skepticism1550 likesLike
Carl Sagan
For me, it is far better to grasp the Universe as it really is than to persist in delusion, however satisfying and reassuring.
 Carl Sagan, The Demon-Haunted World: Science as a Candle in the Dark
tags: cosmology, delusion, knowledge, religion, science, truth, understanding1548 likesLike
Margaret Atwood
If you knew what was going to happen, if you knew everything that was going to happen nextif you knew in advance the consequences of your own actionsyou'd be doomed. You'd be ruined as God. You'd be a stone. You'd never eat or drink or laugh or get out of bed in the morning. You'd never love anyone, ever again. You'd never dare to.
 Margaret Atwood, The Blind Assassin
tags: foresight, knowledge, women1474 likesLike
Veronica Roth
Knowledge is power. Power to do evil...or power to do good. Power itself is not evil. So knowledge itself is not evil.
 Veronica Roth, Allegiant
tags: evil, good, knowledge, power1331 likesLike

Knowledge Quotes
Quotes tagged as "knowledge" Showing 31-60 of 8,830
Theodore Roosevelt
People don't care how much you know until they know how much you care
 Theodore Roosevelt
tags: customer-service, knowledge1231 likesLike
Giacomo Leopardi
The surest way of concealing from others the boundaries of one's own knowledge is not to overstep them.
 Giacomo Leopardi
tags: knowledge1177 likesLike
Dorothy Parker
Inventory:

"Four be the things I am wiser to know:
Idleness, sorrow, a friend, and a foe.
Four be the things I'd been better without:
Love, curiosity, freckles, and doubt.
Three be the things I shall never attain:
Envy, content, and sufficient champagne.
Three be the things I shall have till I die:
Laughter and hope and a sock in the eye.
 Dorothy Parker, The Complete Poems of Dorothy Parker
tags: champagne, contentment, curiosity, doubt, envy, foes, friends, hope, idleness, inventory, knowledge, laughter, life, love, sorrow, sufficienty, superfluity, unattainable, values, wisdom1073 likesLike
Alan Moore
Knowledge, like air, is vital to life. Like air, no one should be denied it.
 Alan Moore, V for Vendetta
tags: knowledge, life1001 likesLike
Richard P. Feynman
I have a friend who's an artist and has sometimes taken a view which I don't agree with very well. He'll hold up a flower and say "look how beautiful it is," and I'll agree. Then he says "I as an artist can see how beautiful this is but you as a scientist take this all apart and it becomes a dull thing," and I think that he's kind of nutty. First of all, the beauty that he sees is available to other people and to me too, I believe. Although I may not be quite as refined aesthetically as he is ... I can appreciate the beauty of a flower. At the same time, I see much more about the flower than he sees. I could imagine the cells in there, the complicated actions inside, which also have a beauty. I mean it's not just beauty at this dimension, at one centimeter; there's also beauty at smaller dimensions, the inner structure, also the processes. The fact that the colors in the flower evolved in order to attract insects to pollinate it is interesting; it means that insects can see the color. It adds a question: does this aesthetic sense also exist in the lower forms? Why is it aesthetic? All kinds of interesting questions which the science knowledge only adds to the excitement, the mystery and the awe of a flower. It only adds. I don't understand how it subtracts.
 Richard P. Feynman, The Pleasure of Finding Things Out: The Best Short Works of Richard P. Feynman
tags: feynman, knowledge, mystery, philosophy, science, understanding939 likesLike
Pablo Picasso
It takes a very long time to become young.
 Pablo Picasso
tags: ignorance, innocence, knowledge, wisdom, youth902 likesLike
Robertson Davies
The eye sees only what the mind is prepared to comprehend.
 Robertson Davies, Tempest-Tost
tags: belief, bias, knowledge, perception, philosophy, reality856 likesLike
Kurt Vonnegut Jr.
Beware of the man who works hard to learn something, learns it, and finds himself no wiser than before.
 Kurt Vonnegut, Cat's Cradle
tags: knowledge854 likesLike
Isaac Asimov
I am an atheist, out and out. It took me a long time to say it. I've been an atheist for years and years, but somehow I felt it was intellectually unrespectable to say one was an atheist, because it assumed knowledge that one didn't have. Somehow, it was better to say one was a humanist or an agnostic. I finally decided that I'm a creature of emotion as well as of reason. Emotionally, I am an atheist. I don't have the evidence to prove that God doesn't exist, but I so strongly suspect he doesn't that I don't want to waste my time.
 Isaac Asimov
tags: agnostic, atheism, atheist, belief, emotion, humanist, interview, knowledge, reason, religion, respect, science785 likesLike
Bertrand Russell
I do not pretend to be able to prove that there is no God. I equally cannot prove that Satan is a fiction. The Christian god may exist; so may the gods of Olympus, or of ancient Egypt, or of Babylon. But no one of these hypotheses is more probable than any other: they lie outside the region of even probable knowledge, and therefore there is no reason to consider any of them.
 Bertrand Russell , Why I Am Not a Christian and Other Essays on Religion and Related Subjects
tags: babylon, belief, burden-of-proof, christian-god, egyptian, fiction, gods, hypothesis, knowledge, olympus, probability, proof, rational, reason, santa, satan, superstition727 likesLike
Benjamin Franklin
An investment in knowledge always pays the best interest.
 Benjamin Franklin, The Way to Wealth: Ben Franklin on Money and Success
tags: knowledge723 likesLike
Albert Einstein
Few people are capable of expressing with equanimity opinions which differ from the prejudices of their social enviroment. Most people are incapable of forming such opinions."

(Essay to Leo Baeck, 1953)
 Albert Einstein
tags: disagreement, dissent, equanimity, expressing, knowledge, opinions, prejudices, social, society, thought722 likesLike
Alfred Tennyson
Knowledge comes, but wisdom lingers.
 Alfred Lord Tennyson
tags: knowledge, wisdom698 likesLike
William Blake
What is now proved was once only imagined.
 William Blake
tags: english-poet, inspirational, knowledge, willpower690 likesLike
Margaret Mitchell
It was better to know the worst than to wonder.
 Margaret Mitchell, Gone with the Wind
tags: knowledge686 likesLike
Will Durant
Science is organized knowledge. Wisdom is organized life.
 Will Durant, The Story of Philosophy: The Lives and Opinions of the World's Greatest Philosophers
tags: knowledge, life, misattributed-to-kant, paraphrasing-herbert-spencer, science674 likesLike
Alexander Pope
A little Learning is a dangerous Thing.
 Alexander Pope
tags: knowledge, misattributed-to-einstein, misquote, misquoted666 likesLike
Charles Darwin
Ignorance more frequently begets confidence than does knowledge: it is those who know little, not those who know much, who so positively assert that this or that problem will never be solved by science.
 Charles Darwin, The Descent of Man
tags: certainty, ignorance, knowledge, open-mindedness, science, willful-ignorance659 likesLike
Unless you try to do something beyond what you have already mastered, you will never grow.
 Ronald E. Osborn
tags: knowledge, misattributed-to-emerson644 likesLike
Meister Eckhart
The eye through which I see God is the same eye through which God sees me; my eye and God's eye are one eye, one seeing, one knowing, one love.
 Meister Eckhart, Sermons of Meister Eckhart
tags: eyes, god, knowledge, love, medieval, mysticism, religious-experience, seeing, understanding, vision642 likesLike
Cormac McCarthy
Whatever in creation exists without my knowledge exists without my consent.
 Cormac McCarthy, Blood Meridian, or the Evening Redness in the West
tags: consent, existence, horror, knowledge, western622 likesLike
Confucius
The hardest thing of all is to find a black cat in a dark room, especially if there is no cat.
 Confucius
tags: futility, knowledge, religion615 likesLike
Alexandre Dumas
Learning does not make one learned: there are those who have knowledge and those who have understanding. The first requires memory and the second philosophy.
 Alexandre Dumas, The Count of Monte Cristo
tags: knowledge, philosophy615 likesLike
Alexander McCall Smith
It is sometimes easier to be happy if you don't know everything.
 Alexander McCall Smith, Morality for Beautiful Girls
tags: happiness, irony, knowledge581 likesLike
P.C. Cast
Don't fuck with an English major. They keep lots of useless crap trapped in their heads. Once in a while they let some of it out and it bites you square on the ass.
 P.C. Cast, Divine By Mistake
tags: english, knowledge, teaching550 likesLike
Isaac Newton
I can calculate the motion of heavenly bodies but not the madness of people.
 Isaac Newton
tags: human-nature, ignorance, knowledge, wisdom547 likesLike
Seneca
The time will come when diligent research over long periods will bring to light things which now lie hidden. A single lifetime, even though entirely devoted to the sky, would not be enough for the investigation of so vast a subject... And so this knowledge will be unfolded only through long successive ages. There will come a time when our descendants will be amazed that we did not know things that are so plain to them... Many discoveries are reserved for ages still to come, when memory of us will have been effaced.
 Seneca, Natural Questions
tags: astronomy, diligence, discoveries, disinformation, knowledge, lies, memory, misinformation, propoganda, research, science, time, truth526 likesLike
Leonardo da Vinci
The knowledge of all things is possible
 Leonardo da Vinci
tags: creativity, curiosity, knowledge, learning507 likesLike
C.S. Lewis
You can't know, you can only believe - or not.
 C.S. Lewis
tags: faith, knowledge502 likesLike
Bram Stoker
Remember my friend, that knowledge is stronger than memory, and we should not trust the weaker
 Bram Stoker, Dracula
tags: knowledge, memory488 likesLike

Knowledge Quotes
Quotes tagged as "knowledge" Showing 61-90 of 8,830
Jane Austen
A woman, especially if she have the misfortune of knowing anything, should conceal it as well as she can.
 Jane Austen
tags: knowledge, women664 likesLike
Ursula K. Le Guin
To learn which questions are unanswerable, and not to answer them: this skill is most needful in times of stress and darkness.
 Ursula K. Le Guin, The Left Hand of Darkness
tags: ambiguity, certainty, humility, knowledge, policy623 likesLike
Janet Fitch
Remember it all, every insult, every tear. Tattoo it on the inside of your mind. In life, knowledge of poisons is essential. I've told you, nobody becomes an artist unless they have to.
 Janet Fitch
tags: artist, insults, knowledge, poison, remember582 likesLike
Knowing is not enough; we must apply. Willing is not enough; we must do.
Knowing is not enough; we must apply. Willing is not enough; we must do.
 Johann wolfgang von Goethe
tags: knowledge539 likesLike
Lao Tzu
To know that you do not know is the best.
To think you know when you do not is a disease.
Recognizing this disease as a disease is to be free of it.
 Lao Tzu
tags: ignorance, knowledge480 likesLike
Henry Rollins
I definitely learned a lesson this time. I know that I can be broken. I am not as tough as I thought. I see it now. At this point, it's the only thing good that came out of all of this. I know myself better now and know what I have to do.
 Henry Rollins, The Portable Henry Rollins
tags: knowledge, life468 likesLike
Gautama Buddha
Conquer the angry one by not getting angry; conquer the wicked by goodness; conquer the stingy by generosity, and the liar by speaking the truth.

[Verse 223]
 Siddhrtha Gautama, The Dhammapada
tags: anger, generosity, goodness, inspirational, kindness, knowledge, love, truth, wisdom459 likesLike
Gustave Flaubert
Doubt  is an illness that comes from knowledge and leads to madness.
 Gustave Flaubert, Memoirs of a Madman
tags: doubt, knowledge, madness440 likesLike
Carl Sagan
Books permit us to voyage through time, to tap the wisdom of our ancestors. The library connects us with the insight and knowledge, painfully extracted from Nature, of the greatest minds that ever were, with the best teachers, drawn from the entire planet and from all our history, to instruct us without tiring, and to inspire us to make our own contribution to the collective knowledge of the human species. I think the health of our civilization, the depth of our awareness about the underpinnings of our culture and our concern for the future can all be tested by how well we support our libraries.
 Carl Sagan, Cosmos
tags: books, civilization, education, history, knowledge, libraries, wisdom438 likesLike
Yukio Mishima
What transforms this world is  knowledge. Do you see what I mean? Nothing else can change anything in this world. Knowledge alone is capable of transforming the world, while at the same time leaving it exactly as it is. When you look at the world with knowledge, you realize that things are unchangeable and at the same time are constantly being transformed.
 Yukio Mishima, The Temple of the Golden Pavilion
tags: knowledge, stillness, transformation437 likesLike
Opinion is really the lowest form of human knowledge. It requires no accountability, no understanding. The highest form of knowledge is empathy, for it requires us to suspend our egos and live in anothers world. It requires profound purpose larger than the self kind of understanding.
 Bill Bullard
tags: accountability, ego, empathy, inspirational, knowledge, opinion418 likesLike
Albert Einstein
Information is not knowledge.
 Albert Einstein
tags: information, knowledge414 likesLike
Socrates
I examined the poets, and I look on them as people whose talent overawes both themselves and others, people who present themselves as wise men and are taken as such, when they are nothing of the sort.

From poets, I moved to artists. No one was more ignorant about the arts than I; no one was more convinced that artists possessed really beautiful secrets. However, I noticed that their condition was no better than that of the poets and that both of them have the same misconceptions. Because the most skillful among them excel in their specialty, they look upon themselves as the wisest of men. In my eyes, this presumption completely tarnished their knowledge. As a result, putting myself in the place of the oracle and asking myself what I would prefer to be  what I was or what they were, to know what they have learned or to know that I know nothing  I replied to myself and to the god: I wish to remain who I am.

We do not know  neither the sophists, nor the orators, nor the artists, nor I what the True, the Good, and the Beautiful are. But there is this difference between us: although these people know nothing, they all believe they know something; whereas, I, if I know nothing, at least have no doubts about it. As a result, all this superiority in wisdom which the oracle has attributed to me reduces itself to the single point that I am strongly convinced that I am ignorant of what I do not know.
 Socrates
tags: humbleness, ignorance, knowledge, truth, understanding410 likesLike
Malcolm X
Don't be in a hurry to condemn because he doesn't do what you do or think as you think or as fast. There was a time when you didn't know what you know today.
 Malcolm X
tags: condemnation, knowledge, tolerance, understanding405 likesLike
The first men to be created and formed were called the Sorcerer of Fatal Laughter, the Sorcerer of Night, Unkempt, and the Black Sorcerer  They were endowed with intelligence, they succeeded in knowing all that there is in the world. When they looked, instantly they saw all that is around them, and they contemplated in turn the arc of heaven and the round face of the earth  [Then the Creator said]: 'They know all  what shall we do with them now? Let their sight reach only to that which is near; let them see only a little of the face of the earth! Are they not by nature simple creatures of our making? Must they also be gods?
 Anonymous, Popol Vuh
tags: creation, creation-myth, earth, gods, heaven, intelligence, knowledge, sight404 likesLike
Wil Zeus
Always forgive, but never forget, else you will be a prisoner of your own hatred, and doomed to repeat your mistakes forever.
 Wil Zeus, Sun Beyond the Clouds
tags: forgiveness, happiness, inspirational, knowledge, life, philosophy, truth, wisdom400 likesLike
Lao Tzu
Knowledge is a treasure, but practice is the key to it.
 Lao Tzu
tags: knowledge393 likesLike
Ray Bradbury
You're a hopeless romantic," said Faber. "It would be funny if it were not serious. It's not books you need, it's some of the things that once were in books. The same things could be in the 'parlor families' today. The same infinite detail and awareness could be projected through the radios, and televisors, but are not. No,no it's not books at all you're looking for! Take it where you can find it, in old phonograph records, old motion pictures, and in old friends; look for it in nature and look for it in yourself. Books were only one type or receptacle where we stored a lot of things we were afraid we might forget. There is nothing magical in them at all. The magic is only in what books say, how they stitched the patches of the universe together into one garment for us. Of course you couldn't know this, of course you still can't understand what I mean when i say all this. You are intuitively right, that's what counts.
 Ray Bradbury, Fahrenheit 451
tags: books, fahrenheit-451, knowledge, love, magic387 likesLike
Kahlil Gibran
No man can reveal to you aught but that which already lies half asleep in the dawning of your knowledge.
The teacher who walks in the shadow of the temple, among his followers, gives not of his wisdom but rather of his faith and his lovingness.
If he is indeed wise he does not bid you enter the house of his wisdom, but rather leads you to the threshold of your own mind.
 Khalil Gibran, The Prophet
tags: knowledge, learning, philosophy, poetry, teaching, wisdom384 likesLike
Corrie ten Boom
And so seated next to my father in the train compartment, I suddenly asked, "Father, what is sexsin?"
He turned to look at me, as he always did when answering a question, but to my surprise he said nothing. At last he stood up, lifted his traveling case off the floor and set it on the floor.
Will you carry it off the train, Corrie?" he said.
I stood up and tugged at it. It was crammed with the watches and spare parts he had purchased that morning.
It's too heavy," I said.
Yes," he said, "and it would be a pretty poor father who would ask his little girl to carry such a load. It's the same way, Corrie, with knowledge. Some knowledge is too heavy for children. When you are older and stronger, you can bear it. For now you must trust me to carry it for you.
 Corrie Ten Boom, The Hiding Place: The Triumphant True Story of Corrie Ten Boom
tags: childhood, father, knowledge381 likesLike
Niccol Machiavelli
Because there are three classes of intellects: one which comprehends by itself; another which appreciates what others comprehend; and a third which neither comprehends by itself nor by the showing of others; the first is the most excellent, the second is good, the third is useless.
 Niccol Machiavelli, The Prince
tags: comprehension, intellect, intelligence, knowledge, philosophy, use381 likesLike
Abu Hamid al-Ghazali
The happiness of the drop is to die in the river.
 Imam Al-Ghazali
tags: islam, knowledge, sufism, wisdom360 likesLike
Sigmund Freud
No, our science is no illusion. But an illusion it would be to suppose that what science cannot give us we can get elsewhere.
 Sigmund Freud, The Future of an Illusion
tags: future, gains, hope, illusion, inspirational, knowledge, progress, science, understanding356 likesLike
Kahlil Gibran
When you reach the end of what you should know, you will be at the beginning of what you should sense.
 Kahlil Gibrn, Sand and Foam
tags: beginnings-and-endings, feeling, intuition, knowledge340 likesLike
Oscar Wilde
nothing that is worth knowing can be taught
 Oscar Wilde
tags: education, experience, knowledge337 likesLike
Allan Rufus
Life is like a game of chess.
To win you have to make a move.
Knowing which move to make comes with IN-SIGHT
and knowledge, and by learning the lessons that are
acculated along the way.

We become each and every piece within the game called life!
 Allan Rufus, The Master's Sacred Knowledge
tags: anxiety, art-of-dying, art-of-living, depression, enlightenment, hang-man, know-thyself, knowing, knowing-oneself, knowledge, knowledge-education, knowledge-of-self, knowledge-teaching, love, master, master-key, master-of-love, masters, mastery, mind, mind-body-spirit, mind-power, personal-development, personal-growth, positive-attitude, positive-mindset, positive-motivation, positive-outlook, positive-quotes, positive-thinking, positive-thoughts, power-of-love, power-of-thoughts, power-of-words, powerful-story, quote, sacred, sacred-teachings, sacred-wisdom, sage, sage-advice, self-esteem, self-help-book, self-improvement, self-improvement-book, soul, soul-searching, spirit, spiritual-development, spiritual-growth, spiritual-wisdom, spiritualism, suicidal-thoughts, suicide, teachings, unconditional-acceptance, unconditional-love, wisdom, wise-man336 likesLike
Criss Jami
Popular culture is a place where pity is called compassion, flattery is called love, propaganda is called knowledge, tension is called peace, gossip is called news, and auto-tune is called singing.
 Criss Jami, Killosophy
tags: autotune, bandwagon, compassion, culture, fads, flattery, gossip, knowledge, love, music, news, peace, pity, pop, pop-culture, pop-music, popular, popular-culture, popular-music, propaganda, singing, tension, trends335 likesLike
Umberto Eco
Then why do you want to know?"

"Because learning does not consist only of knowing what we must or we can do, but also of knowing what we could do and perhaps should not do.
 Umberto Eco, The Name of the Rose
tags: knowledge, learning, understanding318 likesLike
Isaac Asimov
We now know the basic rules governing the universe, together with the gravitational interrelationships of its gross components, as shown in the theory of relativity worked out between 1905 and 1916. We also know the basic rules governing the subatomic particles and their interrelationships, since these are very neatly described by the quantum theory worked out between 1900 and 1930. What's more, we have found that the galaxies and clusters of galaxies are the basic units of the physical universe, as discovered between 1920 and 1930.

...The young specialist in English Lit, having quoted me, went on to lecture me severely on the fact that in every century people have thought they understood the universe at last, and in every century they were proved to be wrong. It follows that the one thing we can say about our modern 'knowledge' is that it is wrong...

My answer to him was, when people thought the Earth was flat, they were wrong. When people thought the Earth was spherical they were wrong. But if you think that thinking the Earth is spherical is just as wrong as thinking the Earth is flat, then your view is wronger than both of them put together.

The basic trouble, you see, is that people think that 'right' and 'wrong' are absolute; that everything that isn't perfectly and completely right is totally and equally wrong.

However, I don't think that's so. It seems to me that right and wrong are fuzzy concepts, and I will devote this essay to an explanation of why I think so.

When my friend the English literature expert tells me that in every century scientists think they have worked out the universe and are always wrong, what I want to know is how wrong are they? Are they always wrong to the same degree?
 Isaac Asimov
tags: expert, knowledge, literature, science313 likesLike
Hippocrates
There are in fact two things, science and opinion; the former begets knowledge, the latter ignorance.
 Hippocrates
tags: ignorance, knowledge, opinion, science305 likesLike

Knowledge Quotes
Quotes tagged as "knowledge" Showing 91-120 of 8,830
Frank Herbert
Belief can be manipulated. Only knowledge is dangerous.
 Frank Herbert
tags: belief, kindlehighlight, knowledge, manipulation, propoganda, truth320 likesLike
Immanuel Kant
I had to deny knowledge in order to make room for faith.
 Immanuel Kant, Critique of Pure Reason
tags: deny, faith, knowledge299 likesLike
Alexander Pope
A little learning is a dangerous thing.
Drink deep, or taste not the Pierian Spring;
There shallow draughts intoxicate the brain,
and drinking largely sobers us again.
 Alexander Pope, An Essay On Criticism
tags: knowledge, learning, poetry, sophomoric295 likesLike
Mark Twain
That is just the way with some people. They get down on a thing when they dont know nothing about it.
 Mark Twain, The Adventures of Huckleberry Finn
tags: knowledge, people, prejudice290 likesLike
Dan Brown
The power of human thought grows exponentially with the number of minds that share that thought.
 Dan Brown, The Lost Symbol
tags: knowledge, spirituality284 likesLike
Ursula K. Le Guin
Belief is the wound that knowledge heals.
 Ursula K. Le Guin, The Telling
tags: belief, knowledge283 likesLike
Ursula K. Le Guin
To light a candle is to cast a shadow...
 Ursula K. Le Guin, A Wizard of Earthsea
tags: balance, equilibrium, evil, good, knowledge, taoism283 likesLike
Audre Lorde
Our feelings are our most genuine paths to knowledge.
 Audre Lorde
tags: emotion, feelings, knowledge280 likesLike
John  Adams
Let us tenderly and kindly cherish therefore, the means of knowledge. Let us dare to read, think, speak, and write .
 John Adams, The Works Of John Adams, Second President Of The United States
tags: cherish, knowledge, read, think275 likesLike
Jiddu Krishnamurti
You can only be afraid of what you think you know.
 Jiddu Krishnamurti
tags: fear, inspirational, knowledge273 likesLike
Hermann Hesse
I have always thirsted for knowledge, I have always been full of questions.
 Hermann Hesse, Siddhartha
tags: hesse, knowledge, question, siddhartha268 likesLike
Plato
Bodily exercise, when compulsory, does no harm to the body; but knowledge which is acquired under compulsion obtains no hold on the mind.
 Plato, The Republic
tags: compulsion, education, knowledge, learning, teaching268 likesLike
Henry James
Her reputation for reading a great deal hung about her like the cloudy envelope of a goddess in an epic.
 Henry James, The Portrait of a Lady
tags: books, knowledge, reading261 likesLike
Aristotle
All men by nature desire to know.
 Aristotle, Metaphysics
tags: knowledge, philosophy256 likesLike
Anne Rice
Very few beings really seek knowledge in this world. Mortal or immortal, few really ask. On the contrary, they try to wring from the unknown the answers they have already shaped in their own minds -- justifications, confirmations, forms of consolation without which they can't go on. To really ask is to open the door to the whirlwind. The answer may annihilate the question and the questioner.
 Anne Rice, The Vampire Lestat
tags: asking, courage, daring, knowledge, questions, risk, seeking, uncertainty256 likesLike
Joe Abercrombie
The truth is like salt. Men want to taste a little, but too much makes everyone sick.
 Joe Abercrombie, The Heroes
tags: ignorance, knowledge, truth254 likesLike
Horace Mann
Do not think of knocking out another person's brains because he differs in opinion from you. It would be as rational to knock yourself on the head because you differ from yourself ten years ago.
 Horace Mann
tags: conflict, growth, intelligence, knowledge, opinion247 likesLike
Dan Brown
Small minds have always lashed out at what they don't understand.
 Dan Brown
tags: knowledge, learning243 likesLike
Margaret Atwood
Knowing was a temptation. What you don't know won't tempt you.
 Margaret Atwood, The Handmaid's Tale
tags: fear, knowledge, temptation236 likesLike
Carl Sagan
The significance of our lives and our fragile planet is then determined only by our own wisdom and courage. We are the custodians of life's meaning. We long for a Parent to care for us, to forgive us our errors, to save us from our childish mistakes. But knowledge is preferable to ignorance. Better by far to embrace the hard truth than a reassuring fable. If we crave some cosmic purpose, then let us find ourselves a worthy goal.
 Carl Sagan, Pale Blue Dot: A Vision of the Human Future in Space
tags: atheism, god, knowledge, meaning, purpose, religion, truth232 likesLike
Laurell K. Hamilton
He was twenty. I remembered twenty. I'd known everything at twenty. It took me another year to realize I knew nothing. I was still hoping to learn something before I hit thirty, but I wasn't holding my breath.
 Laurell K. Hamilton, Circus of the Damned
tags: knowledge, learning, twenty232 likesLike
Michel de Montaigne
Nothing is so firmly believed as that which we least know.
 Michel de Montaigne, The Complete Essays
tags: belief, firm, ignorance, intensity, knowledge231 likesLike
Ludwig Wittgenstein
The problems are solved, not by giving new information, but by arranging what we have known since long.
 Ludwig Wittgenstein, Philosophical Investigations
tags: information, knowledge, problems230 likesLike
Arthur Schopenhauer
Philosophy ... is a science, and as such has no articles of faith; accordingly, in it nothing can be assumed as existing except what is either positively given empirically, or demonstrated through indubitable conclusions.
 Arthur Schopenhauer, Parerga and Paralipomena
tags: demonstration, empirical, existence, knowledge, philosophy, science228 likesLike
Seneca
Timendi causa est nescire -
Ignorance is the cause of fear.
 Lucius Annaeus Seneca, Natural Questions
tags: fear, ignorance, knowledge, life221 likesLike
Wilhelm Reich
You differ from a great man in only one respect: the great man was once a very little man, but he developed one important quality: he recognized the smallness and narrowness of his thoughts and actions. Under the pressure of some task that meant a great deal to him, he learned to see how his smallness, his pettiness endangered his happiness. In other words, a great man knows when and in what way he is a little man. A little man does not know he is little and is afraid to know. He hides his pettiness and narrowness behind illusions of strength and greatness, someone else's strength and greatness. He's proud of his great generals but not of himself. He admires an idea he has not had, not one he has had. The less he understands something, the more firmly he believes in it. And the better he understands an idea, the less he believes in it.
 Wilhelm Reich, Listen, Little Man!
tags: emotional-plague, knowledge, orgone, pride, projection, self-knowledge, self-perception, success210 likesLike
Neil deGrasse Tyson
I know that the molecules in my body are traceable to phenomena in the cosmos. That makes me want to grab people on the street and say: Have you HEARD THIS?
 Neil deGrasse Tyson
tags: connectedness, inspirational, knowledge, perspective, philosophy, science209 likesLike
Alexandre Dumas
To learn is not to know; there are the learners and the learned. Memory makes the one, philosophy the others.
 Alexandre Dumas, The Count of Monte Cristo
tags: knowledge, philosophy, understanding204 likesLike
Plato
I thought to myself: I am wiser than this man; neither of us probably knows anything that is really good, but he thinks he has knowledge, when he has not, while I, having no knowledge, do not think I have.
 Plato, Apology
tags: apology, knowledge, plato, socrates, wisdom201 likesLike
Ambrose Bierce
Faith, n. Belief without evidence in what is told by one who speaks without knowledge, of things without parallel.
 Ambrose Bierce, The Unabridged Devil's Dictionary
tags: belief, definitions, evidence, humor, knowledge190 likesLike

Knowledge Quotes
Quotes tagged as "knowledge" Showing 121-150 of 8,830
James Madison
The advancement and diffusion of knowledge is the only guardian of true liberty.
 James Madison
tags: education, freedom, intelligence, knowledge, liberty, media312 likesLike
Ezra Pound
Properly, we should read for power. Man reading should be man intensely alive. The book should be a ball of light in one's hand.
 Ezra Pound
tags: books, knowledge, reading265 likesLike
Ernest Hemingway
How little we know of what there is to know. I wish that I were going to live a long time instead of going to die today because I have learned much about life in these four days; more, I think than in all other time. I'd like to be an old man to really know. I wonder if you keep on learning or if there is only a certain amount each man can understand. I thought I knew so many things that I know nothing of. I wish there was more time.
 Ernest Hemingway, For Whom The Bell Tolls
tags: knowledge, life, time252 likesLike
Jiddu Krishnamurti
Do not repeat after me words that you do not understand. Do not merely put on a mask of my ideas, for it will be an illusion and you will thereby deceive yourself.
 Jiddu Krishnamurti
tags: autonomy, imitation, knowledge249 likesLike
Napoleon Hill
The way of success is the way of continuous pursuit of knowledge.
 Napoleon Hill, Think and Grow Rich: The Landmark Bestseller Now Revised and Updated for the 21st Century
tags: knowledge, pursuit, success, way240 likesLike
Abigail Adams
Well, knowledge is a fine thing, and mother Eve thought so; but she smarted so severely for hers, that most of her daughters have been afraid of it since. 
 Abigail Adams
tags: adam-and-eve, bible, christianity, feminism, genesis, knowledge, motherhood, old-testement, religion238 likesLike
Immanuel Kant
All our knowledge begins with the senses, proceeds then to the understanding, and ends with reason. There is nothing higher than reason.
 immanuel kant, Critique of Pure Reason
tags: empiricism, knowledge, rationalism, reason, senses, understanding236 likesLike
Malcolm X
The greatest mistake of the movement has been trying to organize a sleeping people around specific goals. You have to wake the people up first, then you'll get action.
 Malcolm X, Malcolm X Speaks: Selected Speeches and Statements
tags: activism, awareness, change, education, knowledge, revolution, truth232 likesLike
Edward W. Said
All knowledge that is about human society, and not about the natural world, is historical knowledge, and therefore rests upon judgment and interpretation. This is not to say that facts or data are nonexistent, but that facts get their importance from what is made of them in interpretation for interpretations depend very much on who the interpreter is, who he or she is addressing, what his or her purpose is, at what historical moment the interpretation takes place.
 Edward Said
tags: history, human-society, interpretation, knowledge228 likesLike
Carl Sagan
The size and age of the Cosmos are beyond ordinary human understanding. Lost somewhere between immensity and eternity is our tiny planetary home. In a cosmic perspective, most human concerns seem insignificant, even petty. And yet our species is young and curious and brave and shows much promise. In the last few millennia we have made the most astonishing and unexpected discoveries about the Cosmos and our place within it, explorations that are exhilarating to consider. They remind us that humans have evolved to wonder, that understanding is a joy, that knowledge is prerequisite to survival. I believe our future depends on how well we know this Cosmos in which we float like a mote of dust in the morning sky.
 Carl Sagan, Cosmos
tags: humanity, knowledge, sagan, science219 likesLike
Idowu Koyenikan
Acquiring wisdom is great but it is not the goal, applying it is.
 idowu koyenikan, Wealth for All: Living a Life of Success at the Edge of Your Ability
tags: achievement, coaching, goals, growth, knowledge, personal-development, planning, self-help, success, wisdom202 likesLike
Criss Jami
I think a lot of psychopaths are just geniuses who drove so fast that they lost control.
 Criss Jami, Killosophy
tags: brain, cognition, compassion, control, creative, creative-genius, creativity, disorder, driving, genius, illness, intelligence, knowledge, mental, mental-illness, pain, psychopath, schizophrenia, self-control, sorrow, sympathy, understanding199 likesLike
Terry Goodkind
Knowledge is a weapon. I intend to be formidably armed.
 Terry Goodkind
tags: knowledge198 likesLike
Thomas Hobbes
Scientia potentia est.

Knowledge is power.
 Thomas Hobbes, Leviathan
tags: knowledge, power186 likesLike
Thomas A. Edison
...What I have denied and what my reason compels me to deny, is the existence of a Being throned above us as a god, directing our mundane affairs in detail, regarding us as individuals, punishing us, rewarding us as human judges might.

When the churches learn to take this rational view of things, when they become true schools of ethics and stop teaching fables, they will be more effective than they are to-day... If they would turn all that ability to teaching this one thing  the fact that honesty is best, that selfishness and lies of any sort must surely fail to produce happiness  they would accomplish actual things. Religious faiths and creeds have greatly hampered our development. They have absorbed and wasted some fine intellects. That creeds are getting to be less and less important to the average mind with every passing year is a good sign, I think, although I do not wish to talk about what is commonly called theology.

The criticisms which have been hurled at me have not worried me. A man cannot control his beliefs. If he is honest in his frank expression of them, that is all that can in justice be required of him. Professor Thomson and a thousand others do not in the least agree with me. His criticism of me, as I read it, charged that because I doubted the souls immortality, or personality, as he called it, my mind must be abnormal, pathological, in other, words, diseased... I try to say exactly what I honestly believe to be the truth, and more than that no man can do. I honestly believe that creedists have built up a mighty structure of inaccuracy, based, curiously, on those fundamental truths which I, with every honest man, must not alone admit but earnestly acclaim.

I have been working on the same lines for many years. I have tried to go as far as possible toward the bottom of each subject I have studied. I have not reached my conclusions through study of traditions; I have reached them through the study of hard fact. I cannot see that unproved theories or sentiment should be permitted to have influence in the building of conviction upon matters so important. Science proves its theories or it rejects them. I have never seen the slightest scientific proof of the religious theories of heaven and hell, of future life for individuals, or of a personal God. I earnestly believe that I am right; I cannot help believing as I do... I cannot accept as final any theory which is not provable. The theories of the theologians cannot be proved. Proof, proof! That is what I always have been after; that is what my mind requires before it can accept a theory as fact. Some things are provable, some things disprovable, some things are doubtful. All the problems which perplex us, now, will, soon or late, be solved, and solved beyond a question through scientific investigation. The thing which most impresses me about theology is that it does not seem to be investigating. It seems to be asserting, merely, without actual study.

...Moral teaching is the thing we need most in this world, and many of these men could be great moral teachers if they would but give their whole time to it, and to scientific search for the rock-bottom truth, instead of wasting it upon expounding theories of theology which are not in the first place firmly based. What we need is search for fundamentals, not reiteration of traditions born in days when men knew even less than we do now.

[Columbian Magazine interview]
 Thomas A. Edison
tags: atheism, belief, evidence, knowledge, morality, proof, reason, science, skepticism, study, theology, tradition, truth176 likesLike
Dan Brown
Knowledge grows exponentially. The more we know, the greater our ability to learn, and the faster we expand our knowledge base.
 Dan Brown, The Lost Symbol
tags: knowledge176 likesLike
Criss Jami
I don't pretend to know everything; I just only speak on matters I know I'll win.
 Criss Jami, Killosophy
tags: argument, correct, debate, knowledge, pretend, right, speech, winning175 likesLike
Jane Austen
She was heartily ashamed of her ignorance - a misplaced shame. Where people wish to attach, they should always be ignorant. To come with a wellinformed mind is to come with an inability of administering to the vanity of others, which a sensible person would always wish to avoid. A woman especially, if she have the misfortune of knowing anything, should conceal it as well as she can.
 Jane Austen, Northanger Abbey
tags: attachment, clichs, concealment, empowerment, feminism, ignorance, intelligence, irony, knowledge, preconceptions, prejudice, sarcasm, stereotypes, vanity, women174 likesLike
John Berger
The relation between what we see and what we know is never settled. Each evening we see the sun set. We know that the earth is turning away from it. Yet the knowledge, the explanation, never quite fits the sight.
 John Berger, Ways of Seeing
tags: connections, explanations, knowledge, seeing174 likesLike
Clarence Darrow
I do not consider it an insult, but rather a compliment to be called an agnostic. I do not pretend to know where many ignorant men are sure  that is all that agnosticism means.
 Clarence Darrow
tags: agnosticism, compliment, ignorance, knowledge, pretense, scopes-trial169 likesLike
Allan Rufus
Life is like a sandwich!

Birth as one slice,
and death as the other.
What you put in-between
the slices is up to you.

Is your sandwich tasty or sour?
Allan Rufus.org
 Allan Rufus
tags: anxiety, art-of-dying, art-of-living, depression, enlightenment, hang-man, know-thyself, knowing, knowing-oneself, knowledge, knowledge-education, knowledge-of-self, knowledge-teaching, love, master, master-key, master-of-love, masters, mastery, mind, mind-body-spirit, mind-power, personal-development, personal-growth, positive-attitude, positive-mindset, positive-motivation, positive-outlook, positive-quotes, positive-thinking, positive-thoughts, power-of-love, power-of-thoughts, power-of-words, powerful-story, quote, sacred, sacred-teachings, sacred-wisdom, sage, sage-advice, self-esteem, self-help-book, self-improvement, self-improvement-book, soul, soul-searching, spirit, spiritual-development, spiritual-growth, spiritual-wisdom, spiritualism, suicidal-thoughts, suicide, teachings, unconditional-acceptance, unconditional-love, wisdom, wise-man169 likesLike
Richard P. Feynman
We are at the very beginning of time for the human race. It is not unreasonable that we grapple with problems. But there are tens of thousands of years in the future. Our responsibility is to do what we can, learn what we can, improve the solutions, and pass them on.
 Richard P. Feynman
tags: humanity, insightful, knowledge, science159 likesLike
Criss Jami
Quiet people always know more than they seem. Although very normal, their inner world is by default fronted mysterious and therefore assumed weird. Never underestimate the social awareness and sense of reality in a quiet person; they are some of the most observant, absorbent persons of all.
 Criss Jami, Healology
tags: absorbent, ambivert, assumption, awareness, bias, cool, crazy, culture, discernment, down-to-earth, extrovert, friendly, intelligent, introversion, introvert, judgment, knowledge, learned, loner, misunderstood, mysterious, normal, observation, odd, prejudgment, prudence, psychology, quiet-people, reality, reflection, shy, silence, social, social-awareness, strange, thinking, underestimated, understanding, weird, wisdom159 likesLike
Charles Baudelaire
I set out to discover the why of it, and to transform my pleasure into knowledge.
 Charles Baudelaire
tags: curiosity, knowledge, pleasure157 likesLike
Baruch Spinoza
Those who wish to seek out the cause of miracles and to understand the things of nature as philosophers, and not to stare at them in astonishment like fools, are soon considered heretical and impious, and proclaimed as such by those whom the mob adores as the interpreters of nature and the gods. For these men know that, once ignorance is put aside, that wonderment would be taken away, which is the only means by which their authority is preserved.
 Baruch De Spinoza, Ethics
tags: adoration, astonishment, authority, causation, cause, foolish, fools, gods, heresy, heretical, ignorance, impious, interpret, knowledge, miracles, mob, nature, philosopher, piety, preservation, stare, the-gods, thinking, truth, understanding, wonder156 likesLike
Marguerite Yourcenar
The true birthplace is that wherein for the first time one looks intelligently upon oneself; my first homelands have been books, and to a lesser degree schools.
 Marguerite Yourcenar, Memoirs of Hadrian
tags: books, knowledge, literature, reading, self, words151 likesLike
A.P.J. Abdul Kalam
When learning is purposeful, creativity blossoms. When creativity blossoms, thinking emanates. When thinking emanates, knowledge is fully lit. When knowledge is lit, economy flourishes.
 A.P.J. Abdul Kalam, Indomitable Spirit
tags: creativity, economic-growth, education, indomitable-spirit, knowledge, learning, mission-of-education, personal-growth149 likesLike
L. Frank Baum
A baby has brains, but it doesn't know much. Experience is the only thing that brings knowledge, and the longer you are on earth the more experience you are sure to get.
 L. Frank Baum, The Wonderful Wizard of Oz
tags: brains, experience, knowledge144 likesLike
Margaret  Rogerson
Knowledge always has the potential to be dangerous. It is a more powerful weapon than any sword or spell.
 Margaret Rogerson, Sorcery of Thorns
tags: knowledge, margaret-rogerson, powerful, sorcery-of-thorns135 likesLike
Nikki Sixx
You know, it's pretty easy reading this book to see why I was angry and confused for all those years. I lived my life being told different stories: some true, some lies and I still don't know which is which. Children are born innocent. At birth we are very much like a new hard drive - no viruses, no bad information, no crap that's been downloaded into it yet. It's what we feed into that hard drive, or in my case "head drive" that starts the corruption of the files.
 Nikki Sixx, The Heroin Diaries: A Year in the Life of a Shattered Rock Star
tags: childhood, children, corruption, knowledge, mind, nikki-sixx, youth134 likesLike

Knowledge Quotes
Quotes tagged as "knowledge" Showing 151-180 of 8,830
Arthur Conan Doyle
Dr. Watson's summary list of Sherlock Holmes's strengths and weaknesses:

"1. Knowledge of Literature: Nil.
2. Knowledge of Philosophy: Nil.
3. Knowledge of Astronomy: Nil.
4. Knowledge of Politics: Feeble.
5. Knowledge of Botany: Variable. Well up in belladonna, opium, and poisons generally. Knows nothing of practical gardening.
6. Knowledge of Geology: Practical but limited. Tells at a glance different soils from each other. After walks has shown me splashes upon his trousers, and told me by their colour and consistence in what part of London he had received them.
7. Knowledge of Chemistry: Profound.
8. Knowledge of Anatomy: Accurate but unsystematic.
9. Knowledge of Sensational Literature: Immense. He appears to know every detail of every horror perpetrated in the century.
10. Plays the violin well.
11. Is an expert singlestick player, boxer, and swordsman.
12. Has a good practical knowledge of British law.
 Arthur Conan Doyle, A Study in Scarlet
tags: abilities, detectives, knowledge, sherlock-holmes, skills, strengths, talents, weaknesses267 likesLike
Holly Black
What an author doesn't know could fill a book.
 Holly Black, Lucinda's Secret
tags: author, books, knowledge183 likesLike
John Locke
The only defense against the world is a thorough knowledge of it.
 John Locke, Some Thoughts Concerning Education
tags: defense, knowledge180 likesLike
Voltaire
It is an infantile superstition of the human spirit that virginity would be thought a virtue and not the barrier that separates ignorance from knowledge.
 Voltaire
tags: ignorance, knowledge, virginity, virtue175 likesLike
Neil Gaiman
She said we all not only could know everything. We do. We just tell ourselves we don't to make it all bearable.
 Neil Gaiman, Brief Lives
tags: knowledge169 likesLike
W.E.B. Du Bois
Herein lies the tragedy of the age: not that men are poor,  all men know something of poverty; not that men are wicked,  who is good? not that men are ignorant,  what is Truth? Nay, but that men know so little of men.
 W. E. B. DuBois, The Souls of Black Folk
tags: humanity, ignorance, knowledge, poverty, truth, wicked166 likesLike
Stephen R. Covey
Habit is the intersection of knowledge (what to do), skill (how to do), and desire (want to do).
 Stephen R. Covey, The 7 Habits of Highly Effective People: Powerful Lessons in Personal Change
tags: desire, habit, knowledge, skill165 likesLike
Kirstie Alley
It's funny. No matter how hard you try, you can't close your heart forever. And the minute you open it up, you never know what's going to come in. But when it does, you just have to go for it! Because if you don't, there's not point in being here.
 Kirstie Alley
tags: chance, chances, close, comedic, eternity, existance, forever, funny, go, hard, heart, know, knowledge, life, love, minute, never, open, purpose, time, try163 likesLike
Ian McEwan
No one knows anything, really. It's all rented, or borrowed.
 Ian McEwan
tags: knowledge156 likesLike
G.K. Chesterton
Humor can get in under the door while seriousness is still fumbling at the handle.
 G.K. Chesterton
tags: humor, ignorance, knowledge, wisdom150 likesLike
Karl Popper
True ignorance is not the absence of knowledge, but the refusal to acquire it.
 Karl R. Popper
tags: knowledge, refusal, true-ignorance148 likesLike
Veronica Roth
Valuing knowledge above all else results in a lust for power, and that leads men into dark and empty places.
 Veronica Roth, Divergent
tags: knowledge143 likesLike
Iris Murdoch
Education doesnt make you happy. Nor does freedom. We dont become happy just because were free  if we are. Or because weve been educated  if we have. But because education may be the means by which we realize we are happy. It opens our eyes, our ears, tells us where delights are lurking, convinces us that there is only one freedom of any importance whatsoever, that of the mind, and gives us the assurance  the confidence  to walk the path our mind, our educated mind, offers.
 Iris Murdoch
tags: education, happiness, knowledge142 likesLike
Mortimer J. Adler
....a good book can teach you about the world and about yourself. You learn more than how to read better; you also learn more about life. You become wiser. Not just more knowledgeable - books that provide nothing but information can produce that result. But wiser, in the sense that you are more deeply aware of the great and enduring truths of human life.
 Mortimer J. Adler, How to Read a Book: The Classic Guide to Intelligent Reading
tags: books, education, knowledge141 likesLike
W.E.B. Du Bois
There is but one coward on earth, and that is the coward that dare not know.
 W.E.B. DuBois, Dusk of Dawn: An Essay Toward an Autobiography of a Race Concept
tags: coward, knowledge138 likesLike
Joseph Conrad
They trespassed upon my thoughts. They were intruders whose knowledge of life was to me an irritating pretense, because I felt so sure they could not possibly know the things I knew. Their bearing, which was simply the bearing of commonplace individuals going about their business in the assurance of perfect safety, was offensive to me like the outrageous flauntings of folly in the face of a danger it is unable to comprehend. I had no particular desire to enlighten them, but I had some difficulty in restraining myself from laughing in their faces, so full of stupid importance.
 Joseph Conrad, Heart of Darkness
tags: enlightenment, identity, knowledge138 likesLike
Dan Brown
Knowledge is a tool, and like all tools, its impact is in the hands of the user.
 Dan Brown, The Lost Symbol
tags: knowledge137 likesLike
Samuel Johnson
Integrity without knowledge is weak and useless, and knowledge without integrity is dangerous and dreadful.
 Samuel Johnson, The History of Rasselas, Prince of Abissinia
tags: integrity, knowledge136 likesLike
Michael Bassey Johnson
I don't fancy colors of the face, I'm always attracted to colors of the brain.
 Michael Bassey Johnson
tags: africa, africans, amorous, apartheid, attraction, black-people, color, common-sense, face, falling-in-love, fancy, human-beings, intelligence, knowledge, liking, love, memories, memory, michael-bassey-johnson, nigerians, race, wisdom, wise, wise-men, wise-people134 likesLike
Alfred Tennyson
So runs my dream, but what am I?
An infant crying in the night
An infant crying for the light
And with no language but a cry.
 Lord Alfred Tennyson, In Memoriam
tags: childlike, dreams, knowledge, poetry131 likesLike
Robert G. Ingersoll
Until every soul is freely permitted to investigate every book, and creed, and dogma for itself, the world cannot be free. Mankind will be enslaved until there is mental grandeur enough to allow each man to have his thought and say. This earth will be a paradise when men can, upon all these questions differ, and yet grasp each other's hands as friends. It is amazing to me that a difference of opinion upon subjects that we know nothing with certainty about, should make us hate, persecute, and despise each other. Why a difference of opinion upon predestination, or the trinity, should make people imprison and burn each other seems beyond the comprehension of man; and yet in all countries where Christians have existed, they have destroyed each other to the exact extent of their power. Why should a believer in God hate an atheist? Surely the atheist has not injured God, and surely he is human, capable of joy and pain, and entitled to all the rights of man. Would it not be far better to treat this atheist, at least, as well as he treats us?

Christians tell me that they love their enemies, and yet all I ask isnot that they love their enemies, not that they love their friends even, but that they treat those who differ from them, with simple fairness.

We do not wish to be forgiven, but we wish Christians to so act that we will not have to forgive them. If all will admit that all have an equal right to think, then the question is forever solved; but as long as organized and powerful churches, pretending to hold the keys of heaven and hell, denounce every person as an outcast and criminal who thinks for himself and denies their authority, the world will be filled with hatred and suffering. To hate man and worship God seems to be the sum of all the creeds.
 Robert G. Ingersoll, Some Mistakes of Moses
tags: amazing, atheism, atheist, believer, book, burn, christianity, christians, comprehension, creed, despise, destroy, differ, difference, dogma, earth, enemy, enslaved, existence, fairness, forgiveness, freedom, freedom-of-speech, friends, friendship, grandeur, hate, hatred, heaven, hell, human, imprison, investigate, joy, knowledge, love, mankind, opinion, pain, paradise, permission, persecute, power, predestination, rights, suffering, thought, trinity, worship126 likesLike
Isaac Asimov
Suppose that we are wise enough to learn and knowand yet not wise enough to control our learning and knowledge, so that we use it to destroy ourselves? Even if that is so, knowledge remains better than ignorance. It is better to knoweven if the knowledge endures only for the moment that comes before destructionthan to gain eternal life at the price of a dull and swinish lack of comprehension of a universe that swirls unseen before us in all its wonder. That was the choice of Achilles, and it is mine, too.
 Isaac Asimov
tags: achilles, choice, ignorance, knowledge, learning, science, universe, wisdom, wise124 likesLike
Hippocrates
People think that epilepsy is divine simply because they don't have any idea what causes epilepsy. But I believe that someday we will understand what causes epilepsy, and at that moment, we will cease to believe that it's divine. And so it is with everything in the universe
 Hippocrates
tags: epilepsy, fallacy, god-of-the-gaps, ignorance, knowledge, superstition, understanding124 likesLike
Ann Druyan
Interviewer: Didn't Sagan want to believe?
Druyan: he didn't want to believe. he wanted to know.
 Ann Druyan
tags: agnosticism, astronomy, atheism, belief, carl-sagan, knowledge, sagan, science, truth123 likesLike
Gautama Buddha
To force oneself to believe and to accept a thing without understanding is political, and not spiritual or intellectual.
 Siddhrtha Gautama
tags: intellectual, knowledge, spiritual, truth, wisdom119 likesLike
His priority did not seem to be to teach them what he knew, but rather to impress upon them that nothing, not even... knowledge, was foolproof.
 J.K. Rowling, Harry Potter and the Order of the Phoenix
tags: centaurs, knowledge112 likesLike
Julie Kagawa
Words define us,' Mom continued, as I struggled to make my clumsy marks look like her elegant script. 'We must protect our knowledge and pass it on whenever we can. If we are ever to become a society again, we must teach others how to remain human.
 Julie Kagawa, The Immortal Rules
tags: knowledge, words110 likesLike
Criss Jami
The common man prays, 'I want a cookie right now!' And God responds, 'If you'd listen to what I say, tomorrow it will bring you 100 cookies.
 Criss Jami, Killosophy
tags: bigger-picture, cookie, cute, faithfulness, figurative, foreknowledge, funny, god, hard-work, humility, humor, impatience, knowledge, literal, metaphor, misunderstanding, obedience, omniscience, patience, prayer, praying, prudence, time, timing, understanding, waiting, work107 likesLike
George Eliot
Poetry and art and knowledge are sacred and pure.
 George Eliot, The Mill on the Floss
tags: art, knowledge, poetry107 likesLike
Orson Scott Card
When you have wisdom that another person knows that he needs, you give it freely. But when the other person doesn't yet know that he needs your wisdom you keep it to yourself. Food only looks good to a hungry man.
 Orson Scott Card, Xenocide
tags: han-fei-tzu, knowledge104 likesLike

Knowledge Quotes
Quotes tagged as "knowledge" Showing 181-210 of 8,830
Gertrude Stein
Everybody gets so much information all day long that they lose their common sense.
 Gertrude Stein
tags: knowledge, wisdom266 likesLike
Carl R. Rogers
The only person who is educated is the one who has learned how to learn and change.
 Carl R. Rogers
tags: knowledge216 likesLike
Dalai Lama XIV
Share your knowledge. It is a way to achieve immortality.
 Dalai Lama XIV
tags: immortality, knowledge, learning, sharing, teaching206 likesLike
Kurt Vonnegut Jr.
New knowledge is the most valuable commodity on earth. The more truth we have to work with, the richer we become.
 Kurt Vonnegut, Breakfast of Champions
tags: knowledge172 likesLike
Ralph Waldo Emerson
We are students of words: we are shut up in schools, and colleges, and recitation -rooms, for ten or fifteen years, and come out at last with a bag of wind, a memory of words, and do not know a thing.
 Ralph Waldo Emerson, Essays Including Essays, First & Second Series, English Traits, Nature & Considerations by the Way
tags: 1844, education, education-system, knowledge168 likesLike
Robert G. Ingersoll
Give me the storm and tempest of thought and action, rather than the dead calm of ignorance and faith! Banish me from Eden when you will; but first let me eat of the fruit of the tree of knowledge!
 Robert G. Ingersoll, The Works Of Robert G. Ingersoll, Vol. Iii
tags: action, eden, faith, garden-of-eden, ignorance, knowledge, myth, religion, skepticism, superstition, thought, tree-of-knowledge163 likesLike
Plato
Poets utter great and wise things which they do not themselves understand.
 Plato
tags: knowledge, poets153 likesLike
Richard Dawkins
You could give Aristotle a tutorial. And you could thrill him to the core of his being. Aristotle was an encyclopedic polymath, an all time intellect. Yet not only can you know more than him about the world. You also can have a deeper understanding of how everything works. Such is the privilege of living after Newton, Darwin, Einstein, Planck, Watson, Crick and their colleagues.

I'm not saying you're more intelligent than Aristotle, or wiser. For all I know, Aristotle's the cleverest person who ever lived. That's not the point. The point is only that science is cumulative, and we live later.
 Richard Dawkins
tags: albert-einstein, aristotle, charles-darwin, crick, darwin, einstein, francis-crick, intellect, isaac-newton, james-d-watson, james-watson, knowledge, max-planck, newton, planck, polymath, science, understanding, watson152 likesLike
Leonardo da Vinci
All sciences are vain and full of errors that are not born of Experience, the mother of all Knowledge.
 Leonardo da Vinci, Leonardo's Notebooks
tags: knowledge, maxims, philosophy, science151 likesLike
Craig Silvey
I don't understand a thing about this world: about people, and why they do the things they do. The more I find out, the more I uncover, the more I know, the less I understand.
 Craig Silvey, Jasper Jones
tags: craig-silvey, jasper-jones, knowledge, life, understanding145 likesLike
Anton Chekhov
These people have learned not from books, but in the fields, in the wood, on the river bank. Their teachers have been the birds themselves, when they sang to them, the sun when it left a glow of crimson behind it at setting, the very trees, and wild herbs.
 Anton Chekhov
tags: knowledge, nature142 likesLike
Terence McKenna
Nobody is smarter than you are. And what if they are? What good is their understanding doing you?
 Terence McKenna
tags: knowledge, smart, understanding138 likesLike
Robert G. Ingersoll
Religion can never reform mankind because religion is slavery. It is far better to be free, to leave the forts and barricades of fear, to stand erect and face the future with a smile. It is far better to give yourself sometimes to negligence, to drift with wave and tide, with the blind force of the world, to think and dream, to forget the chains and limitations of the breathing life, to forget purpose and object, to lounge in the picture gallery of the brain, to feel once more the clasps and kisses of the past, to bring life's morning back, to see again the forms and faces of the dead, to paint fair pictures for the coming years, to forget all Gods, their promises and threats, to feel within your veins life's joyous stream and hear the martial music, the rhythmic beating of your fearless heart. And then to rouse yourself to do all useful things, to reach with thought and deed the ideal in your brain, to give your fancies wing, that they, like chemist bees, may find art's nectar in the weeds of common things, to look with trained and steady eyes for facts, to find the subtle threads that join the distant with the now, to increase knowledge, to take burdens from the weak, to develop the brain, to defend the right, to make a palace for the soul. This is real religion. This is real worship
 Robert Green Ingersoll, The Works of Robert G. Ingersoll, Vol. IV
tags: burden, development, dream, facts, fear, feeling, free, future, gods, heart, inspirational, joy, knowledge, purpose, reform, slavery, thought, threat, weak, worship137 likesLike
Patricia Briggs
Knowledge is a better weapon than a sword.
 Patricia Briggs, Raven's Shadow
tags: knowledge, weapon133 likesLike
Socrates
I only know that I know nothing
 Socrates
tags: creative-thinking, intellect, knowledge, philosophy, wisdom129 likesLike
George Washington
Nothing can illustrate these observations more forcibly, than a recollection of the happy conjuncture of times and circumstances, under which our Republic assumed its rank among the Nations; The foundation of our Empire was not laid in the gloomy age of Ignorance and Superstition, but at an Epoch when the rights of mankind were better understood and more clearly defined, than at any former period, the researches of the human mind, after social happiness, have been carried to a great extent, the Treasures of knowledge, acquired by the labours of Philosophers, Sages and Legislatures, through a long succession of years, are laid open for our use, and their collected wisdom may be happily applied in the Establishment of our forms of Government; the free cultivation of Letters, the unbounded extension of Commerce, the progressive refinement of Manners, the growing liberality of sentiment... have had a meliorating influence on mankind and increased the blessings of Society. At this auspicious period, the United States came into existence as a Nation, and if their Citizens should not be completely free and happy, the fault will be entirely their own.

[Circular to the States, 8 June 1783 - Writings 26:484--89]
 George Washington, Writings
tags: america, foundation, founding, founding-father, george-washington, government, happiness, ignorance, knowledge, mankind, mind, philosophers, research, rights, sages, superstition, use127 likesLike
C.S. Lewis
We are always falling in love or quarreling, looking for jobs or fearing to lose them, getting ill and recovering, following public affairs. If we let ourselves, we shall always be waiting for some distraction or other to end before we can really get down to our work. The only people who achieve much are those who want knowledge so badly that they seek it while the conditions are still unfavorable. Favorable conditions never come.
 C.S. Lewis, The Weight of Glory
tags: distraction, education, inspiration, knowledge, life, work123 likesLike
Friedrich Nietzsche
Knowledge kills action; action requires the veils of illusion.
 Friedrich Nietzsche, The Birth of Tragedy
tags: action, illusion, knowledge120 likesLike
T.S. Eliot
Where is the wisdom we have lost in knowledge?
Where is the knowledge we have lost in information?
 T.S. Eliot, The Rock
tags: information, knowledge, wisdom115 likesLike
Ramakrishna
Only two kinds of people can attain self-knowledge: those who are not encumbered at all with learning, that is to say, whose minds are not over-crowded with thoughts borrowed from others; and those who, after studying all the scriptures and sciences, have come to realise that they know nothing.
 Sri Ramakrishna, Sayings of Sri Ramakrishna
tags: hinduism, knowledge, spiritual109 likesLike
Thomas Carlyle
A loving heart is the beginning of all knowledge.
 Thomas Carlyle
tags: knowledge, learning107 likesLike
Democritus
Many much-learned men have no intelligence.
 Democritus
tags: intelligence, knowledge103 likesLike
Ursula K. Le Guin
But need alone is not enough to set power free: there must be knowledge.
 Ursula K. Le Guin, A Wizard of Earthsea
tags: knowledge103 likesLike
Sophocles
Alas, how terrible is wisdom
when it brings no profit to the man that's wise!
This I knew well, but had forgotten it,
else I would not have come here.
 Sophocles, Oedipus Rex
tags: knowledge99 likesLike
Dan Brown
Darkness feeds on apathy.
 Dan Brown, The Lost Symbol
tags: knowledge98 likesLike
Isaac Asimov
The true delight is in the finding out rather than in the knowing.
 Isaac Asimov
tags: delight, knowledge, wisdom96 likesLike
Lance Armstrong
The night before brain surgery, I thought about death. I searched out my larger values, and I asked myself, if I was going to die, did I want to do it fighting and clawing or in peaceful surrender? What sort of character did I hope to show? Was I content with myself and what I had done with my life so far? I decided that I was essentially a good person, although I could have been better--but at the same time I understood that the cancer didn't care.

I asked myself what I believed. I had never prayed a lot. I hoped hard, I wished hard, but I didn't pray. I had developed a certain distrust of organized religion growing up, but I felt I had the capacity to be a spiritual person, and to hold some fervent beliefs. Quite simply, I believed I had a responsibility to be a good person, and that meant fair, honest, hardworking, and honorable. If I did that, if I was good to my family, true to my friends, if I gave back to my community or to some cause, if I wasn't a liar, a cheat, or a thief, then I believed that should be enough. At the end of the day, if there was indeed some Body or presence standing there to judge me, I hoped I would be judged on whether I had lived a true life, not on whether I believed in a certain book, or whether I'd been baptized. If there was indeed a God at the end of my days, I hoped he didn't say, 'But you were never a Christian, so you're going the other way from heaven.' If so, I was going to reply, 'You know what? You're right. Fine.'

I believed, too, in the doctors and the medicine and the surgeries--I believed in that. I believed in them. A person like Dr. Einhorn [his oncologist], that's someone to believe in, I thought, a person with the mind to develop an experimental treatment 20 years ago that now could save my life. I believed in the hard currency of his intelligence and his research.

Beyond that, I had no idea where to draw the line between spiritual belief and science. But I knew this much: I believed in belief, for its own shining sake. To believe in the face of utter hopelessness, every article of evidence to the contrary, to ignore apparent catastrophe--what other choice was there? We do it every day, I realized. We are so much stronger than we imagine, and belief is one of the most valiant and long-lived human characteristics. To believe, when all along we humans know that nothing can cure the briefness of this life, that there is no remedy for our basic mortality, that is a form of bravery.

To continue believing in yourself, believing in the doctors, believing in the treatment, believing in whatever I chose to believe in, that was the most important thing, I decided. It had to be.

Without belief, we would be left with nothing but an overwhelming doom, every single day. And it will beat you. I didn't fully see, until the cancer, how we fight every day against the creeping negatives of the world, how we struggle daily against the slow lapping of cynicism. Dispiritedness and disappointment, these were the real perils of life, not some sudden illness or cataclysmic millennium doomsday. I knew now why people fear cancer: because it is a slow and inevitable death, it is the very definition of cynicism and loss of spirit.

So, I believed.
 Lance Armstrong, It's Not about the Bike: My Journey Back to Life
tags: atheism, belief, bravery, cancer, death, doctors, honor, inevitable, inspirational, knowledge, medicine, morality, mortality, science96 likesLike
Thomas Jefferson
I was bold in the pursuit of knowledge, never fearing to follow truth and reason to whatever results they led.
 Thomas Jefferson
tags: bold, courage, fact, honest, knowledge, lifelong-learning, truth94 likesLike
Johann Wolfgang von Goethe
He who cannot draw on three thousand years is living from hand to mouth.
 Johann Wolfgang von Goethe
tags: history, knowledge92 likesLike
Amaka Imani Nkosazana
When God takes out the trash, don't go digging back through it. Trust Him.
 Amaka Imani Nkosazana, Heart Crush
tags: admiration, affirmations, afterlife, attitude, awake, awakening, blessings, confirmation, corruption, courage, curiosity, dedication, destiny, divine-guidance, dreams, earth, evil-people, expression, faithfulness, fate, feelings, finding-yourself, forget, forgiveness, freedom, friends, gifts, god, godliness, guidance, happiness, hate, haters, hatred, heart, heaven, holy, holy-spirit, honesty, imagination, independent, inspiration, inspire, journey, joy, kindness, knowledge, liars, life, life-lessons, living, love, loving-you, loving-yourself, lying, lying-to-yourself, motivation, motivational-quotes, optimistic, passion, peace, peace-of-mind, peaceful, peacemaker, people, philosophy, positive-thinking, power, power-of-words, quotes, self-respect, soul-searching, spiritual, spirituality, success, thankfulness, trash, treasure, trust, trusting-god, trustworthy, truth, value, vision, wisdom, words-to-live-by, worth83 likesLike

Knowledge Quotes
Quotes tagged as "knowledge" Showing 211-240 of 8,830
Ayn Rand
Learn to distinguish the difference between errors of knowledge and breaches of morality. An error of knowledge is not a moral flaw, provided you are willing to correct it; only a mystic would judge human beings by the standard of an impossible, automatic omniscience. But a breach of morality is the conscious choice of an action you know to be evil, or a willful evasion of knowledge, a suspension of sight and of thought. That which you do not know, is not a moral charge against you; but that which you refuse to know, is an account of infamy growing in your soul. Make every allowance for errors of knowledge; do not forgive or accept any break of morality.
 Ayn Rand, Atlas Shrugged
tags: erring, evil, knowledge, morality, responsibility268 likesLike
Vera Nazarian
Would you like to know your future?

If your answer is yes, think again. Not knowing is the greatest life motivator.

So enjoy, endure, survive each moment as it comes to you in its proper sequence -- a surprise.
 Vera Nazarian, The Perpetual Calendar of Inspiration
tags: advance, coming, expectations, expected, fortell, fortelling, fortune, future, journey, knowing-ahead, knowledge, life, motivation, motive, motives, mystery, news, next, precognition, revelation, surprise, surprise-endings, surprises, survival, survive, tomorrow, unexpected, unknown201 likesLike
Jim Butcher
Knowledge is the ultimate weapon. It always has been.
 Jim Butcher, White Night
tags: harry-dresden, knowledge176 likesLike
Voltaire
Meditation is the dissolution of thoughts in Eternal awareness or Pure consciousness without objectification, knowing without thinking, merging finitude in infinity.
 Voltaire
tags: awareness, consciousness, finite, infinity, knowledge, meditation, thought164 likesLike
Edmund Burke
Whoever undertakes to set himself up as a judge of Truth and Knowledge is shipwrecked by the laughter of the gods."

[Preface to Brissot's Address to His Constituents (1794)]
 Edmund Burke, On Empire, Liberty, and Reform: Speeches and Letters
tags: arrogance, judgment, knowledge, omniscience, pomposity, preface-to-brissot-s-address, presumption, ridicule, truth146 likesLike
Pope John Paul II
Know what you are talking about.
 Pope John Paul II
tags: knowledge, language144 likesLike
Francis Bacon
Ipsa scientia potestas est.

Knowledge itself is power.
 Francis Bacon, Meditations Sacrae and Human Philosophy Meditations Sacrae and Human Philosophy
tags: knowledge, power138 likesLike
Albert Einstein
I believe in intuition and inspiration. Imagination is more important than knowledge. For knowledge is limited, whereas imagination embraces the entire world, stimulating progress, giving birth to evolution. It is, strictly speaking, a real factor in scientific research.
 Albert Einstein, On Cosmic Religion and Other Opinions and Aphorisms
tags: evolution, imagination, knowledge, science126 likesLike
John Wesley
Beware you be not swallowed up in books! An ounce of love is worth a pound of knowledge.
 John Wesley, Letters of John Wesley
tags: books, knowledge, love, reading119 likesLike
H.L. Mencken
We are here and it is now. Further than that, all human knowledge is moonshine.
 H.L. Mencken, A Mencken Chrestomathy
tags: attributed, knowledge, reality, wisdom117 likesLike
Jules Verne
Science, my boy, is made up of mistakes, but they are mistakes which it is useful to make, because they lead little by little to the truth.
 Jules Verne, Journey to the Center of the Earth
tags: experimentation, facts, knowledge, science, scientific-method, truth114 likesLike
Margaret Atwood
We understand more than we know.
 Margaret Atwood, Oryx and Crake
tags: knowledge, science, understanding, wisdom105 likesLike
Fulton J. Sheen
A teacher who cannot explain any abstract subject to a child does not himself thoroughly understand his subject; if he does not attempt to break down his knowledge to fit the child's mind, he does not understand teaching.
 Fulton J. Sheen, Life is Worth Living
tags: knowledge, students, teacher, teaching104 likesLike
Timothy Leary
And a new philosophy emerged called quantum physics, which suggest that the individuals function is to inform and be informed. You really exist only when youre in a field sharing and exchanging information. You create the realities you inhabit.
 Timothy Leary, Chaos & Cyber Culture
tags: communication, information, knowledge, physics, science, sharing103 likesLike
Osho
Only a blind man can easily define what light is. When you do not know, you are bold. Ignorance is always bold; knowledge hesitates. And the more you know, the more you feel that the ground underneath is dissolving. The more you know, the more you feel how ignorant you are.
 Osho, The Book of Secrets
tags: ignorance, knowledge99 likesLike
Neil Postman
In America, everyone is entitled to an opinion, and it is certainly useful to have a few when a pollster shows up. But these are opinions of a quite different roder from eighteenth- or nineteenth-century opinions. It is probably more accurate to call them emotions rather than opinions, which would account for the fact that they change from week to week, as the pollsters tell us. What is happening here is that television is altering the meaning of 'being informed' by creating a species of information that might properly be called disinformation. I am using this world almost in the precise sense in which it is used by spies in the CIA or KGB. Disinformation does not mean false information. It means misleading information--misplace, irrelevant, fragmented or superficial information--information that creates the illusion of knowing something but which in fact leads one away from knowing. In saying this, I do not mean to imply that television news deliberately aims to deprive Americans of a coherent, contextual understanding of their world. I mean to say that when news is packaged as entertainment, that is the inevitable result. And in saying that the television news show entertains but does not inform, I am saying something far more serious than that we are being deprived of authentic information. I am saying we are losing our sense of what it means to be well informed. Ignorance is always correctable. But what shall we do if we take ignorance to be knowledge?
 Neil Postman, Amusing Ourselves to Death: Public Discourse in the Age of Show Business
tags: discourse, ignorance, knowledge, media, nate-silver, opinions, politics, polls, television92 likesLike
Thomas Henry Huxley
I am too much of a skeptic to deny the possibility of anything.
 Thomas Henry Huxley, Life and Letters of Thomas Henry Huxley
tags: knowledge, possibility, science, skepticism, thinking85 likesLike
Andrew Sean Greer
A lover exists only in fragments, a dozen or so if the romance is new, a thousand if we're married to him, and out of those fragments our heart constructs an entire person. What we each create, since whatever is missing is filled by our imagination, is the person we wish him to be. The less we know him, of course, the more we love him. And that's why we always remember that first rapturous night when he was a stranger, and why this rapture returns only when he's dead.
 Andrew Sean Greer, The Story of a Marriage
tags: death, existentialism, imagination, knowing-someone, knowledge, love, memory, passion85 likesLike
Kendare Blake
Anna's eyes soften, and the stubborn tears begin to recede. The way she stands, the way she breathes, I know she wants to come closer. New knowledge fills up the air between us and neither of us wants to breathe it in.
 Kendare Blake, Anna Dressed in Blood
tags: awareness, knowledge, tears84 likesLike
Terry Pratchett
If you do not know where you come from, then you don't know where you are, and if you don't know where you are, then you don't know where you're going. And if you don't know where you're going, you're probably going wrong.
 Terry Pratchett, I Shall Wear Midnight
tags: certainty, direction, knowledge, self-assurance83 likesLike
John  Williams
He had come to that moment in his age when there occurred to him, with increasing intensity, a question of such overwhelming simplicity that he had no means to face it. He found himself wondering if his life were worth the living; if it had ever been. It was a question, he suspected, that came to all men at one time or another; he wondered if it came to them with such impersonal force as it came to him. The question brought with it a sadness, but it was a general sadness which (he thought) had little to do with himself or with his particular fate; he was not even sure that the question sprang from the most immediate and obvious causes, from what his own life had become. It came, he believed, from the accretion of his years, from the density of accident and circumstance, and from what he had come to understand of them. He took a grim and ironic pleasure from the possibility that what little learning he had managed to acquire had led him to this knowledge: that in the long run all things, even the learning that let him know this, were futile and empty, and at last diminished into a nothingness they did not alter.
 John Williams, Stoner
tags: age, being, futility, knowledge, life, living, nothingness76 likesLike
Santosh Kalwar
It does not matter where you go and what you study, what matters most is what you share with yourself and the world.
 Santosh Kalwar
tags: knowledge, learning, study, studying, wisdom75 likesLike
Yevgeny Zamyatin
It is said there are flowers that bloom only once in a hundred years. Why should there not be some that bloom once in a thousand, in ten thousand years? Perhaps we never know about them simply because this "once in a thousand years" has come today.
 Zamyatin, We
tags: anticipation, bloom, flowers, knowledge, timeliness, waiting74 likesLike
C.G. Jung
Often the hands will solve a mystery that the intellect has struggled with in vain.
 Carl Gustav Jung
tags: knowledge73 likesLike
Richard Dawkins
Science replaces private prejudice with public, verifiable evidence.
 Richard Dawkins
tags: belief, education, enlighten, evidence, ignorance, knowledge, prejudice, proof, richard-dawkins, science71 likesLike
Sam Harris
Are you really surprised by the endurance of religion? What ideology is likely to be more durable than one that conforms, at every turn, to our powers of wishful thinking? Hope is easy; knowledge is hard. Science is the one domain in which we human beings make a truly heroic effort to counter our innate biases and wishful thinking. Science is the one endeavor in which we have developed a refined methodology for separating what a person hopes is true from what he has good reason to believe. The methodology isn't perfect, and the history of science is riddled with abject failures of scientific objectivity. But that is just the point-these have been failures of science, discovered and corrected by-what, religion? No, by good science.
 Sam Harris
tags: belief, credulity, knowledge, science, skepticism65 likesLike
Joseph Goebbels
Faith moves mountains, but only knowledge moves them to the right place...
 Joseph Goebbels
tags: faith, knowledge64 likesLike
George Eliot
Let my body dwell in poverty, and my hands be as the hands of the toiler; but let my soul be as a temple of remembrance where the treasures of knowledge enter and the inner sanctuary is hope.
 George Eliot, Daniel Deronda
tags: hope, knowledge, memory, poverty, work62 likesLike
Debasish Mridha
The moon is the reflection of your heart and moonlight is the twinkle of your love.
 Debasish Mridha
tags: education, happiness, heart, hope, inspirational, intelligence, knowledge, life, love, moon, moonlight, philosophy, reflection, truth, twinkle, wisdom58 likesLike
Jim Butcher
I am blind and limited. I would be a fool think myself wise. And so, not knowing what the universe means, I can only try to be responsible with the knowledge, the strength, and the time given to me. I must be true to my heart.
 Jim Butcher, Death Masks
tags: conviction, knowledge, responsibility56 likesLike

Knowledge Quotes
Quotes tagged as "knowledge" Showing 241-270 of 8,830
William Blake
You never know what is enough unless you know what is more than enough.
 William Blake, The Marriage of Heaven and Hell
tags: knowledge376 likesLike
Abu Hamid al-Ghazali
Knowledge exists potentially in the human soul like the seed in the soil; by learning the potential becomes actual.
 Imam Al-Ghazali
tags: islam, knowledge259 likesLike
Dalai Lama XIV
Peace does not mean an absence of conflicts; differences will always be there. Peace means solving these differences through peaceful means; through dialogue, education, knowledge; and through humane ways.
 Dalai Lama
tags: conflicts, education, humane, knowledge, peace221 likesLike
Nicolaus Copernicus
To know that we know what we know, and to know that we do not know what we do not know, that is true knowledge.
 Nicolaus Copernicus
tags: copernicus, knowledge, wisdom116 likesLike
Criss Jami
The barrier during self-improvement is not so much that we hate learning, rather we hate being taught. To learn entails that the knowledge was achieved on one's own accord - it feels great - but to be taught often leaves a feeling of inferiority. Thus it takes a bit of determination and a lot of humility in order for one to fully develop.
 Criss Jami, Killosophy
tags: achievement, barrier, determination, development, feelings, help, helping-hand, humility, improvement, inferiority, intelligence, knowledge, learning, self-improvement, taught, teaching, wisdom108 likesLike
Plato
Either we shall find what it is we are seeking or at least we shall free ourselves from the persuasion that we know what we do not know.
 Plato, The Republic
tags: knowledge107 likesLike
Malcolm X
Despite my firm convictions, I have been always a man who tries to face facts, and to accept the reality of life as new experience and new knowledge unfolds it. I have always kept an open mind, which is necessary to the flexibility that must go hand in hand with every form of intelligent search for truth.
 Malcolm X, The Autobiography of Malcolm X
tags: convictions, intelligence, knowledge, open-mindedness, truth98 likesLike
Will Durant
And last are the few whose delight is in meditation and understanding; who yearn not for goods, nor for victory, but for knowledge; who leave both market and battlefield to lose themselves in the quiet clarity of secluded thought; whose will is a light rather than a fire, whose haven is not power but truth: these are the men of wisdom, who stand aside unused by the world.
 Will Durant, The Story of Philosophy: The Lives and Opinions of the World's Greatest Philosophers
tags: knowledge, philosopher, philosophy, truth80 likesLike
Robert Burns
There is no such uncertainty as a sure thing.
 Robert Burns, Collected Poems of Robert Burns
tags: certainty, cockiness, ignorance, knowledge, wisdom78 likesLike
Werner Heisenberg
An expert is someone who knows some of the worst mistakes that can be made in his subject, and how to avoid them.
 Werner Heisenberg
tags: expertise, knowledge, mistakes72 likesLike
Toba Beta
When walking alone in a jungle of true darkness,
there are three things that can show you the way:
instinct to survive, the knowledge of navigation,
creative imagination. Without them, you are lost.
 Toba Beta, My Ancestor Was an Ancient Astronaut
tags: creative, darkness, imagination, knowledge, navigation, spirit, survival, survive, way72 likesLike
Jiddu Krishnamurti
Do you know that even when you look at a tree and say, `That is an oak tree', or `that is a banyan tree', the naming of the tree, which is botanical knowledge, has so conditioned your mind that the word comes between you and actually seeing the tree? To come in contact with the tree you have to put your hand on it and the word will not help you to touch it.
 Jiddu Krishnamurti, Freedom from the Known
tags: experience, knowledge, language, trees, words70 likesLike
Susan Sontag
The truth is always something that is told, not something that is known. If there were no speaking or writing, there would be no truth about anything. There would only be what is.
 Susan Sontag, The Benefactor
tags: ignorance, knowledge, truth-telling, wisdom69 likesLike
Anne Rice
We all suffer under a curse, the curse that we know more than we can endure, and there is nothing, absolutely nothing we can do about the force and the lure of this knowledge.
 Anne Rice, Vittorio, The Vampire
tags: knowledge65 likesLike
You can never know everything. Part of what you know is always wrong. Perhaps the most important part. A portion of wisdom lies in knowing that. A portion of knowledge lies in going on anyway.
 Robert Jordan
tags: courage, knowledge, wisdom64 likesLike
Maya Angelou
I had given up some youth for knowledge, but my gain was more valuable than the loss
 Maya Angelou, I Know Why the Caged Bird Sings
tags: knowledge, life, wisdom, youth64 likesLike
Idries Shah
Opinion is usually something which people have when they lack comprehensive information.
 Idries Shah, Reflections
tags: information, knowledge, opinion62 likesLike
Joanne Harris
The dead know everything but they don't give a damn.
 Joanne Harris, Runemarks
tags: death, humor, knowledge61 likesLike
Gotthold Ephraim Lessing
The true value of man is not determined by his possession, supposed or real, of Truth, but rather by his sincere exertion to get to the Truth. It is not possession of Truth by which he extends his powers and in which his ever-growing perfectability is to be found. Possession makes one passive, indolent and proud. If God were to hold all Truth concealed in his right hand, and in his left only the steady and diligent drive for Truth, albeit with the proviso that I would always and forever err in the process, and to offer me the choice, I would with all humility take the left hand. 
 Gotthold Lessing
tags: inspirational, knowledge, searching, truth60 likesLike
Rumi
Knowledge that is acquired
is not like this. Those who have it worry if
audiences like it or not.
It's a bait for popularity.
Disputational knowing wants customers.
It has no soul...
The only real customer is God.
Chew quietly
your sweet sugarcane God-Love, and stay
playfully childish.
 Mawlana Jalal-al-Din Rumi, The Essential Rumi
tags: knowledge, wisdom58 likesLike
Germany Kent
How to win in life:
1 work hard
2 complain less
3 listen more
4 try, learn, grow
5 don't let people tell you it cant be done
6 make no excuses
 Germany Kent
tags: achieve-your-dreams, achievement-and-attitude, achievements, achievements-success, attitude, attitude-inspiration, attitude-toward-life, authentic-self, authenticity, author, author-quotes, authority, authors, award-winning-authors, be-honest-with-yourself, believe, best-selling-authors, challenge-and-attitude, challenge-inspiration-motivation, challenges-in-life, challenges-of-life, change, changing, changing-your-life, changing-yourself, character, comfort-zones, complain, complaining, complaining-about-your-struggles, complaining-quotes, complaints, complete, control, direction, don-t-settle, ethics, everyone, evolving, future, germany-kent, germany-kent-quote, germany-kent-quotes, grow, growing, habits, habits-of-action, habits-of-mind, happiness, happy-endings, happy-soul, have-faith, hope-guru, how-to, influence, inspirational-attitude, inspiring, joy, joyful-life, know-your-worth, know-yourself, knowledge, knowledge-of-oneself, knowledge-of-self, learn, learning, life, life-lessons, lifetime, listen, live-each-moment, live-truly, manifest, motivation, motivational-authors, motivational-speaker, motivational-speaker-quotes, motivational-speakers, motivational-writers, no-excuse, no-excuses, no-excuses-mindset, no-filter, no-limit, no-limit-people, opportunities, passion, past, pay-attention, pay-attention-to-your-thoughts, perception, perfect-timing, perseverance, persistence, personal-development, personal-growth, personal-power, positive, positive-attitude, positive-outlook, positive-thoughts, positivity, principles, progress, psychology, purpose, real-talk, regret, rules, sacrifice, sacrifice-for-gain, sacrifice-in-life, sanity, self-help-authors, significant, significant-life, step-out, step-out-of-your-comfort-zone, strength-through-adversity, success, successful-people, the-hope-guru, try, trying, trying-hard, trying-new-things, win-in-life, winners, work-hard, worth-the-wait, your-journey, youth58 likesLike
C.G. Jung
Astrology is assured of recognition from psychology, without further restrictions, because astrology represents the summation of all the psychological knowledge of antiquity.
 C.G. Jung
tags: antiquity, astrology, knowledge, psychology53 likesLike
Stephen Fry
I'm fat because I'm greedy, and if my mind is fat it's because I'm curious.
 Stephen Fry
tags: curiosity, greed, knowledge51 likesLike
John Calvin
It would be the height of absurdity to label ignorance tempered by humility "faith"!
(Institutio III.2.3)
 John Calvin
tags: absurdity, calvin, faith, humility, ignorance, knowledge51 likesLike
Karen Blixen
A visitor is a friend, he brings news, good or bad, which is bread to the hungry minds in lonely places. A real friend who comes to the house is a heavenly messenger, who brings the panis angelorum.
 Isak Dinesen, Out of Africa
tags: curiosity, friendship, knowledge, people, society, wisdom51 likesLike
Karl Popper
While differing widely in the various little bits we know, in our infinite ignorance we are all equal.
 Karl R. Popper
tags: humility, knowledge, wisdom49 likesLike
Immanuel Kant
An age cannot bind itself and ordain to put the succeeding one into such a condition that it cannot extend its (at best very occasional) knowledge , purify itself of errors, and progress in general enlightenment. That would be a crime against human nature, the proper destination of which lies precisely in this progress and the descendants would be fully justified in rejecting those decrees as having been made in an unwarranted and malicious manner.

The touchstone of everything that can be concluded as a law for a people lies in the question whether the people could have imposed such a law on itself.
 Immanuel Kant, An Answer to the Question: What Is Enlightenment?
tags: crime, enlightenment, human-nature, knowledge, law, malicious, philosophy, progress49 likesLike
Robert Anton Wilson
The Copenhagen Interpretation is sometimes called "model agnosticism" and holds that any grid we use to organize our experience of the world is a model of the world and should not be confused with the world itself. Alfred Korzybski, the semanticist, tried to popularize this outside physics with the slogan, "The map is not the territory." Alan Watts, a talented exegete of Oriental philosophy, restated it more vividly as "The menu is not the meal.
 Robert Anton Wilson, Cosmic Trigger: Die letzten Geheimnisse der Illuminaten oder An den Grenzen des erweiterten Bewusstseins
tags: concepts, knowledge, philosophy, science49 likesLike

Knowledge Quotes
Quotes tagged as "knowledge" Showing 271-300 of 8,830
Marilyn Vos Savant
To acquire knowledge, one must study;
but to acquire wisdom, one must observe.
 Marilyn vos Savant
tags: knowledge, observation, study, studying, wisdom274 likesLike
Alan Lightman
If a person holds no ambitions in this world, he suffers unknowingly. If a person holds ambitions, he suffers knowingly, but very slowly.
 Alan Lightman, Einstein's Dreams
tags: ambition, knowledge, tragedy180 likesLike
Sherman Alexie
You read a book for the story, for each of its words," Gordy said, "and you draw your cartoons for the story, for each of the words and images. And, yeah, you need to take that seriously, but you should also read and draw because really good books and cartoons give you a boner."

I was shocked:

"Did you just say books should give me a boner?"

"Yes, I did."

"Are you serious?"

"Yeah... don't you get excited about books?"

"I don't think that you're supposed to get THAT excited about books."

"You should get a boner! You have to get a boner!" Gordy shouted. "Come on!"

We ran into the Reardan High School Library.

"Look at all these books," he said.

"There aren't that many," I said. It was a small library in a small high school in a small town.

"There are three thousand four hundred and twelve books here," Gordy said. "I know that because I counted them."

"Okay, now you're officially a freak," I said.

"Yes, it's a small library. It's a tiny one. But if you read one of these books a day, it would still take you almost ten years to finish."

"What's your point?"

"The world, even the smallest parts of it, is filled with things you don't know."

Wow. That was a huge idea.

Any town, even one as small as Reardan, was a place of mystery. And that meant Wellpinit, the smaller, Indian town, was also a place of mystery.

"Okay, so it's like each of these books is a mystery. Every book is a mystery. And if you read all of the books ever written, it's like you've read one giant mystery. And no matter how much you learn, you keep on learning so much more you need to learn."

"Yes, yes, yes, yes," Gordy said. "Now doesn't that give you a boner?"

"I am rock hard," I said.
 Sherman Alexie, The Absolutely True Diary of a Part-Time Indian
tags: boners, books, funny, knowledge, reading138 likesLike
Diane Arbus
The thing that's important to know is that you never know. You're always sort of feeling your way.
 Diane Arbus, Diane Arbus: Revelations
tags: education, intelligence, knowledge, life109 likesLike
Jim Butcher
I know how you feel," I said. "You run into something you totally don't get, and it's scary as hell. But once you learn something about it, it gets easier to handle. Knowledge counters fear. It always has.
 Jim Butcher, Dead Beat
tags: fear, harry-dresden, knowledge104 likesLike
Christine de Pizan
Ah, child and youth, if you knew the bliss which resides in the taste of knowledge, and the evil and ugliness that lies in ignorance, how well you are advised to not complain of the pain and labor of learning.
 Christine de Pizan, The Treasure of the City of Ladies
tags: education, knowledge, learning101 likesLike
Garth Nix
Knowledge, like all things, is best in moderation," intoned the Will. "Knowing everything means you don't need to think, and that is very dangerous.
 Garth Nix, Lady Friday
tags: dangerous, knowledge, think94 likesLike
Albert Camus
Of whom and of what can I say: "I know that"! This heart within me I can feel, and I judge that it exists. This world I can touch, and I likewise judge that it exists. There ends all my knowledge, and the rest is construction. For if I try to seize this self of which I feel sure, if I try to define and to summarize it, it is nothing but water slipping through my fingers. I can sketch one by one all the aspects it is able to assume, all those likewise that have been attributed to it, this upbringing, this origin, this ardor or these silences, this nobility or this vileness. But aspects cannot be added up. This very heart which is mine will forever remain indefinable to me. Between the certainty I have of my existence and the content I try to give to that assurance the gap will never be filled.
 Albert Camus, The Myth of Sisyphus and Other Essays
tags: absurdism, existence, knowledge89 likesLike
Jiddu Krishnamurti
Acquiring knowledge is a form of imitation.
 Jiddu Krishnamurti
tags: imitation, knowledge86 likesLike
Noah benShea
My heart knows what my mind only think it knows.
 Noah BenShea, Jacob the Baker: Gentle Wisdom For a Complicated World
tags: heart, knowledge, mind, philosophy79 likesLike
Samuel Johnson
Knowledge is of two kinds. We know a subject ourselves, or we know where we can find information on it.
 Samuel Johnson
tags: information, knowledge78 likesLike
Claudia Gray
I see... the way you're always searching. How much you hate anything fake or phony. How you're older than your years, but still... playful, like a little girl. How you're always looking into people, or wondering what they see when they look back at you. Your eyes. It's all in the eyes.
 Claudia Gray, A Thousand Pieces of You
tags: eyes, firebird, intelligence, knowledge, life, marguerite-caine, paul-markov, people, personality, searching, self-portrait70 likesLike
Plato
Knowledge is the food of the soul.
 Plato
tags: food, knowledge, soul69 likesLike
Georges Bataille
I think that knowledge enslaves us, that at the base of all knowledge there is a servility, the acceptation of a way of life wherein each moment has meaning only in relation to another or others that will follow it.
 Georges Bataille, The Unfinished System of Nonknowledge
tags: knowledge, servility65 likesLike
Elon Musk
It is important to view knowledge as sort of a semantic tree -- make sure you understand the fundamental principles, ie the trunk and big branches, before you get into the leaves/details or there is nothing for them to hang on to.
 Elon Musk
tags: knowledge, learning, reddit, science, understanding64 likesLike
Miyamoto Musashi
There is no one way to salvation, whatever the manner in which a man may proceed. All forms and variations are governed by the eternal intelligence of the Universe that enables a man to approach perfection. It may be in the arts of music and painting or it may be in commerce, law, or medicine. It may be in the study of war or the study of peace. Each is as important as any other. Spiritual enlightenment through religious meditation such as Zen or in any other way is as viable and functional as any "Way."... A person should study as they see fit.
 Miyamoto Musashi, A Book of Five Rings: The Classic Guide to Strategy
tags: education, knowledge, salvation, spiritual-enlightenment, wisdom63 likesLike
Dejan Stojanovic
Since there is no real silence,
Silence will contain all the sounds,
All the words, all the languages,
All knowledge, all memory.
 Dejan Stojanovic
tags: dejan-stojanovic, knowledge, languages, literature, literature-quotes, memory, poetry, poetry-quotes, quotes, quotes-to-live-by, real, silence, sounds, thoughts, wisdom, words59 likesLike
Confucius
he who will not economize will have to agonize
 Confucius
tags: frugality, ignorance, knowledge, suffering, wisdom53 likesLike
Criss Jami
Old words are reborn with new faces.
 Criss Jami, Killosophy
tags: aphorisms, books, faces, generations, knowledge, learning, new, poetry, quotations, quotes, rebirth, studying, understanding, wisdom, words, writing52 likesLike
A man who denies his past is a man who truly denies himself a future, for he refuses to know himself, and to deny knowledge of oneself is to stumble through life as handicapped as the blind mute.
 Tobsha Learner, The Witch of Cologne
tags: denial, inspiration, knowledge, self-awareness50 likesLike
It is not our right to punish one for thinking as he does, no matter how much we disagree.
 Oliver Bowden, Assassin's Creed: The Secret Crusade
tags: agree, altair, altar, assassin-s-creed, believe, disagree, education, know, knowledge, mind, no-matter, oliver-bowden, people, punih, quote, right, smart, thinking, true, wisdom46 likesLike
Richard P. Feynman
We absolutely must leave room for doubt or there is no progress and there is no learning. There is no learning without having to pose a question. And a question requires doubt. People search for certainty. But there is no certainty. People are terrified  how can you live and not know? It is not odd at all. You only think you know, as a matter of fact. And most of your actions are based on incomplete knowledge and you really don't know what it is all about, or what the purpose of the world is, or know a great deal of other things. It is possible to live and not know.
 Richard P. Feynman, The Pleasure of Finding Things Out: The Best Short Works of Richard P. Feynman
tags: knowledge, learning, physics, science45 likesLike
Patricia Briggs
I can't protect you from knowledge.
 Patricia Briggs, Dragon Bones
tags: knowledge45 likesLike
Nassim Nicholas Taleb
The problem of knowledge is that there are many more books on birds written by ornithologists than books on birds written by birds and books on ornithologists written by birds
 Nassim Nicholas Taleb, The Bed of Procrustes: Philosophical and Practical Aphorisms
tags: art, art-criticism, critics, insight, knowledge, music-criticism, music-journalism, wisdom, writers, writing44 likesLike
Galen
Those who are enslaved to their sects are not merely devoid of all sound knowledge, but they will not even stop to learn!
 Claudius Galenus
tags: knowledge, learning, science, truth42 likesLike
Leonard Cohen
Show me slowly what I only
know the limits of
Dance me to the end of love
 Leonard Cohen, Leonard Cohen: Poems and Songs
tags: cohen, dance, epistemology, knowledge, love, poetry42 likesLike
Jenny Offill
A few nights later, I secretly hope that I might be a genius. Why else can no amount of sleeping pills fell my brain? But in the morning my daughter asks me what a cloud is and I cannot say.
 Jenny Offill, Dept. of Speculation
tags: brain, clouds, genius, knowledge, sleep, sleeping, sleepless, sleeplessness42 likesLike
Amit Ray
Education is beautification of the inner world and the outer world.
 Amit Ray, Nonviolence: The Transforming Power
tags: beautification, beauty, beauty-in-life, beauty-of-life, degrees, education, education-morality, education-reform, education-system, educational-philosophy, educational-quotes, educational-system, head, heart, knowledge, learning, learning-process, learning-quotes, wisdom40 likesLike
If the ignorance of nature gave birth to such a variety of gods, the knowledge of this nature is calculated to destroy them.
 Paul Henri Thiry d'Holbach, System of Nature
tags: atheism, atheist, destruction, god-of-the-gaps, gods, ignorance, knowledge, nature40 likesLike
A.S. Byatt
The individual appears for an instant, joins the community of thought, modifies it and dies; but the species, that dies not, reaps the fruit of his ephemeral existence.
 A.S. Byatt, Possession
tags: humanity, knowledge, wisdom36 likesLike

Knowledge Quotes
Quotes tagged as "knowledge" Showing 301-330 of 8,830
Neil deGrasse Tyson
... there is no shame in not knowing. The problem arises when irrational thought and attendant behavior fill the vacuum left by ignorance.
 Neil deGrasse Tyson, The Sky Is Not the Limit: Adventures of an Urban Astrophysicist
tags: ignorance, knowledge409 likesLike
Oscar Wilde
You are a wonderful creation. You know more than you think you know, just as you know less than you want to know.
 Oscar Wilde, The Picture of Dorian Gray
tags: classic-literature, inspirational, knowledge, philosophy120 likesLike
Bertrand Russell
What is wanted is not the will to believe, but the will to find out, which is the exact opposite.
 Bertrand Russell
tags: belief, discovery, knowledge118 likesLike
Leonardo da Vinci
Wisdom is the daughter of experience
 Leonardo da Vinci
tags: experience, knowledge, wisdom80 likesLike
Jay Woodman
When we make judgements we're inevitably acting on limited knowledge, isn't it best to ask if we seek to understand, or simply let them be?
 jay woodman
tags: judgement, judgemental, knowledge, limited68 likesLike
Thomas Henry Huxley
The known is finite, the unknown infinite; intellectually we stand on an islet in the midst of an illimitable ocean of inexplicability. Our business in every generation is to reclaim a little more land, to add something to the extent and the solidity of our possessions. And even a cursory glance at the history of the biological sciences during the last quarter of a century is sufficient to justify the assertion, that the most potent instrument for the extension of the realm of natural knowledge which has come into men's hands, since the publication of Newton's Principia, is Darwin's Origin of Species.
 Thomas Henry Huxley
tags: analogy, biology, business, charles-darwin, darwin, goal, history, illimitable, inexplicability, infinite, intellectual, isaac-newton, justification, knowledge, metaphor, newton, ocean, origin-of-species, possessions, principia, science, solidity, unknown68 likesLike
Robert G. Ingersoll
The more a man knows, the more willing he is to learn. The less a man knows, the more positive he is that he knows everything...
 Robert G. Ingersoll
tags: conceit, honesty, knowledge, learn, understanding, willing64 likesLike
Sholem Asch
I love the place; the magnificent books; I require books as I require air.
 Sholem Asch
tags: books, knowledge, reading63 likesLike
Kay Redfield Jamison
Knowledge is marvelous, but wisdom is even better.
 Kay Redfield Jamison
tags: experience, knowledge, wisdom61 likesLike
Featherweight by Suzy Kassem


One evening,
I sat by the ocean and questioned the moon about my destiny.
I revealed to it that I was beginning to feel smaller compared to others,
Because the more secrets of the universe I would unlock,
The smaller in size I became.

I didn't understand why I wasn't feeling larger instead of smaller.
I thought that seeking Truth was what was required of us all 
To show us the way, not to make us feel lost,
Up against the odds,
In a devilish game partitioned by
An invisible wall.

Then the next morning,
A bird appeared at my window, just as the sun began
Spreading its yolk over the horizon.
It remained perched for a long time,
Gazing at me intently, to make sure I knew I wasnt dreaming.
Then its words gently echoed throughout my mind,
Telling me:

'The world you are in 
Is the true hell.
The journey to Truth itself
Is what quickens the heart to become lighter.
The lighter the heart, the purer it is.
The purer the heart, the closer to light it becomes.
And the heavier the heart,
The more chained to this hell
It will remain.'

And just like that, it flew off towards the sun,
Leaving behind a tiny feather.
So I picked it up,
And fastened it to a toothpick,
To dip into ink
And write my name.
 Suzy Kassem, Rise Up and Salute the Sun: The Writings of Suzy Kassem
tags: bird, destiny-quotes, doing-good, dying, falcon, fate, feather, feathers, heart, heaven, hell, ink, journey, journey-to-truth, knowledge, knowlsun, light-heart, moon, name, path-to-knowledge, path-to-light, path-to-truth, pure, seeking-truth, soul, spirit, sun, truth, truth-poetry, truth-quotes, truth-seeker, wisdom54 likesLike
T.S. Eliot
Someone said, 'The dead writers are remote from us because we know so much more than they did.' Precisely, and they are that which we know.
 T.S. Eliot, Selected Essays
tags: knowledge52 likesLike
Plato
Those who don't know must learn from those who do.
 Plato, The Republic
tags: knowledge, learning, teaching52 likesLike
Ted Chiang
Science fiction is very well suited to asking philosophical questions; questions about the nature of reality, what it means to be human, how do we know the things that we think we know.
 Ted Chiang
tags: genre, knowledge, science-fiction, sf, writing51 likesLike
Roshani Chokshi
Fear grew in places unlit by knowledge
 Roshani Chokshi, The Gilded Wolves
tags: fear, inspirational, knowledge, the-gilded-wolves, zofia48 likesLike
Imran Khan
The more you study, the more you know; how less you know.
 Imran Khan
tags: knowledge43 likesLike
Patrick Rothfuss
All explicit knowledge is translated knowledge, and all translation is imperfect.
 Patrick Rothfuss, The Wise Man's Fear
tags: knowledge, translation, wisdom42 likesLike
Criss Jami
Beyond all sciences, philosophies, theologies, and histories, a child's relentless inquiry is truly all it takes to remind us that we don't know as much as we think we know.
 Criss Jami, Killosophy
tags: challenge, children, curiosity, education, history, humility, imagination, inquiry, intelligence, knowledge, not-knowing, philosophy, questions, science, theology, uncertainty, wisdom41 likesLike
Friedrich Nietzsche
We are unknown to ourselves, we men of knowledge - and with good reason. We have never sought ourselves - how could it happen that we should ever find ourselves? It has rightly been said: "Where your treasure is, there will your heart be also"; our treasure is where the beehives of our knowledge are.
 Friedrich Nietzsche, On the Genealogy of Morals
tags: knowing-oneself, knowledge, wisdom41 likesLike
Leo Tolstoy
truth, like gold, is to be obtained not by its growth, but by washing away from it all that is not gold.
 Leo Tolstoy
tags: analogy, ignorance, knowledge, refinement, wisdom41 likesLike
Donella H. Meadows
Remember, always, that everything you know, and everything everyone knows, is only a model. Get your model out there where it can be viewed. Invite others to challenge your assumptions and add their own.
 Donella H. Meadows, Thinking in Systems: A Primer
tags: beliefs, knowledge, understanding40 likesLike
Steven Erikson
Chaos needs no allies, for it dwells like a poison in every one of us.
 Steven Erikson, Midnight Tides
tags: knowledge, malazan, understanding40 likesLike
That's the problem with best friends. Sometimes they know you better than you know yourself.
 Cecily von Ziegesar, Nobody Does it Better
tags: best-friends, book, books, friends, friendship, fun, funny, gossip-girl, happy, knowledge, life, love, quote, quotes37 likesLike
Robert Anton Wilson
Belief in the traditional sense, or certitude, or dogma, amounts to the grandiose delusion, "My current model" -- or grid, or map, or reality-tunnel -- "contains the whole universe and will never need to be revised." In terms of the history of science and knowledge in general, this appears absurd and arrogant to me, and I am perpetually astonished that so many people still manage to live with such a medieval attitude.
 Robert Anton Wilson, Cosmic Trigger: Die letzten Geheimnisse der Illuminaten oder An den Grenzen des erweiterten Bewusstseins
tags: belief, dogma, knowledge35 likesLike
Erich Maria Remarque
- , ,     !   ,   .    ,   .    ,    ,     -  ,    ,     -   ,   ...
 Erich Maria Remarque, Three Comrades
tags: knowledge33 likesLike
Catherynne M. Valente
All things are strange which are worth knowing.
 Catherynne M. Valente, In the Cities of Coin and Spice
tags: bizarre, knowledge, odd, strange33 likesLike
Isaiah Berlin
The fox knows many things, but the hedgehog knows one big thing.
 Isaiah Berlin
tags: knowledge, wisdom33 likesLike
Charles Duhigg
...hiding what you know is sometimes as important as knowing it...
 Charles Duhigg, The Power of Habit: Why We Do What We Do in Life and Business
tags: knowledge32 likesLike
John Ruskin
To be taught to readwhat is the use of that, if you know not whether what you read is false or true? To be taught to write or to speakbut what is the use of speaking, if you have nothing to say? To be taught to thinknay, what is the use of being able to think, if you have nothing to think of? But to be taught to see is to gain word and thought at once, and both true.
 John Ruskin, The Works of John Ruskin: Library Edition. 39 vols.
tags: enlightenment, inspiration, knowledge, light, sight, understanding31 likesLike
Maria V. Snyder
Knowledge, whatever the form, could be as effective as a weapon.
 Maria V. Snyder, Poison Study
tags: knowledge, maria-v-snyder, poison-study28 likesLike
Jack London
Every book was a peep-hole into the realm of knowledge. His hunger fed upon what he read, and increased.
 Jack London, Martin Eden
tags: books, knowledge28 likesLike

Knowledge Quotes
Quotes tagged as "knowledge" Showing 331-360 of 8,830
Madeleine L'Engle
Qui plussait, plus se tait. French, you know. The more a man knows, the less he talks.
 Madeleine L'Engle, A Wrinkle in Time
tags: knowledge139 likesLike
Never judge someone's character based on the words of another. Instead, study the motives behind the words of the person casting the bad judgment. An honest woman can sell tangerines all day and remain a good person until she dies, but there will always be naysayers who will try to convince you otherwise. Perhaps this woman did not give them something for free, or at a discount. Perhaps too, that she refused to stand with them when they were wrong  or just stood up for something she felt was right. And also, it could be that some bitter women are envious of her, or that she rejected the advances of some very proud men. Always trust your heart. If the Creator stood before a million men with the light of a million lamps, only a few would truly see him because truth is already alive in their hearts. Truth can only be seen by those with truth in them. He who does not have Truth in his heart, will always be blind to her.
 Suzy Kassem, Rise Up and Salute the Sun: The Writings of Suzy Kassem
tags: accusations, bitter, blind-to-truth, character, character-assassination, civil-rights, conscience, creator, criticism, deceased-people, destroy, entertainment, evidence, falsely-accused, falsely-destroyed, god, gossip, gossip-quotes, gossiping, guilt-by-trial, guilty, guilty-conscience, history, hung-jury, ignorance, inestigators, innocence, innocent, integrity, investigate, judging, judging-actions, judging-others, judicial-system, jury-hearing, justice, knowledge, lamp, lamps, law, law-and-order, lie, light, lying, media, media-distortion, misjudge, misjudged, misjudgment, opinion, opinions-of-others, politics, popular-opinion, press, proof, recognize-truth, repuation-mangement, reputation, rumors, rumours, seek, seek-truth, society, tangerines, telling-the-truth, thinking, trial, trust-your-heart, truth, truth-and-justice, truth-telling, witness, woman, women88 likesLike
Robert B. Parker
Yeah. Floyd is his batman."
His what?"
Batman, like in the British army, each officer had a batman, a personal servant."
You spend too much time reading, Spenser. You know more stuff that don't make you money than anybody I know.
 Robert B. Parker, Mortal Stakes
tags: army, britain, detectives, education, humor, irrelevance, knowledge, money, reading, spenser80 likesLike
Michael  Jackson
Human knowledge consists not only of libraries of parchment and ink - it is also comprised of the volumes of knowledge that are written on the human heart, chiselled on the human soul, and engraved on the human psyche. 
 Michael Jackson
tags: knowledge78 likesLike
Randy Pausch
I was hugely impressed... was the ultimate example of a man who knew what he didn't know, was perfectly willing to admit it, and didn't want to leave until he understood. That's heroic to me.

I wish every grad student had that attitude.
 Randy Pausch, The Last Lecture
tags: heroism, ignorance, knowledge77 likesLike
Chuck Palahniuk
Some people still think knowledge is power.
 Chuck Palahniuk, Lullaby
tags: chuck, knowledge, palahniuk, power76 likesLike
Christine de Pizan
Not all men (and especially the wisest) share the opinion that it is bad for women to be educated. But it is very true that many foolish men have claimed this because it displeased them that women knew more than they did.
 Christine de Pizan, The Book of the City of Ladies
tags: abilities, education, empowerment, inequality, knowledge, men, superiority, suppression, wisdom, women66 likesLike
Criss Jami
When most of the greatest individuals in history were misunderstood and you've spent so much of your own adult life misunderstood, you can't help but believe that the majority of people know very little worth knowing.
 Criss Jami, Killosophy
tags: creativity, history, knowledge, misunderstood, originality, rebel62 likesLike
David Baldacci
Depending on the situation, sometimes you can know a person better in ten minutes than someone you have crossed paths with all your life.
 David Baldacci, The Simple Truth
tags: intimacy, knowledge, understanding60 likesLike
Robert Fulghum
Everything I need to know... I learned in kindergarten.
 Robert Fulghum, All I Really Need to Know I Learned in Kindergarten
tags: knowledge, school55 likesLike
Walter M. Miller Jr.
Because a doubt is not a denial. Doubt is a powerful tool, and it should be applied to history.
 Walter M. Miller Jr., A Canticle for Leibowitz
tags: education, knowledge51 likesLike
Paulo Coelho
The soil needs the seed and the seed needs the soil. The one only has meaning with the other. It is the same thing with human beings. When male knowledge joins with female transformation, then the great magical union is created, and its name is wisdom. Wisdom means both to know and to transform.
 Paulo Coelho, Brida
tags: knowledge50 likesLike
John  Adams
...Turn our thoughts, in the next place, to the characters of learned men. The priesthood have, in all ancient nations, nearly monopolized learning. Read over again all the accounts we have of Hindoos, Chaldeans, Persians, Greeks, Romans, Celts, Teutons, we shall find that priests had all the knowledge, and really governed all mankind. Examine Mahometanism, trace Christianity from its first promulgation; knowledge has been almost exclusively confined to the clergy. And, even since the Reformation, when or where has existed a Protestant or dissenting sect who would tolerate a free inquiry? The blackest billingsgate, the most ungentlemanly insolence, the most yahooish brutality is patiently endured, countenanced, propagated, and applauded. But touch a solemn truth in collision with a dogma of a sect, though capable of the clearest proof, and you will soon find you have disturbed a nest, and the hornets will swarm about your legs and hands, and fly into your face and eyes.

[Letters to John Taylor, 1814, XVIII, p. 484]
 John Adams, The Letters of John and Abigail Adams
tags: celts, chaldeans, clergy, greeks, hindu, hinduism, islam, knowledge, monopoly, muslim, persians, priesthood, priests, protestant, reformation, romans, science-vs-religion, sect, teutons44 likesLike
Idries Shah
Knowledge is something which you can use.
Belief is something which uses you.
 Idries Shah, Reflections
tags: asleep, belief, knowledge, usefulness, uselessness42 likesLike
Thomas S. Monson
We need learn what we need to learn, know what we need to know, and do what we need to do.
 Thomas S. Monson
tags: knowledge, learning41 likesLike
Criss Jami
Wisdom is nothing more than confirmed imagination: just because one did not study for his exam does not mean that he should leave it blank.
 Criss Jami, Killosophy
tags: blank, college, confirmation, confirmed, development, education, exam, experimentation, fill-in-the-blank, imagination, intelligence, knowledge, learning, risk, school, study, test, wisdom40 likesLike
Nick Harkaway
People don't want children to know what they need to know. They want their kids to know what they ought to need to know. If you're a teacher you're in a constant battle with mildly deluded adults who think the world will get better if you imagine it is better. You want to teach about sex? Fine, but only when they're old enough to do it. You want to talk politics? Sure, but nothing modern. Religion? So long as you don't actually think about it. Otherwise some furious mob will come to your house and burn you for a witch.
 Nick Harkaway, The Gone-Away World
tags: children, controversy, education, idealism, ignorance, knowledge, naivete, politics, reality, religion, school, school-system, sex, teachers, teaching38 likesLike
Dan Barker
People are invariably surprised to hear me say I am both an atheist and an agnostic, as if this somehow weakens my certainty. I usually reply with a question like, 'Well, are you a Republican or an American?' The two words serve different concepts and are not mutually exclusive. Agnosticism addresses knowledge; atheism addresses belief. The agnostic says, 'I don't have a knowledge that God exists.' The atheist says, 'I don't have a belief that God exists.' You can say both things at the same time. Some agnostics are atheistic and some are theistic.
 Dan Barker, Godless: How an Evangelical Preacher Became One of America's Leading Atheists
tags: agnostic-atheism, agnosticism, american, atheism, belief, definition, knowledge, republican, surprise37 likesLike
Henry David Thoreau
My desire for knowledge is intermittent; but my desire to bathe my head in atmospheres unknown to my feet is perennial and constant.
 Henry David Thoreau, Civil Disobedience and Other Essays
tags: intelligence, knowledge, learning, self-awareness36 likesLike
Edmund Husserl
First, anyone who seriously intends to become a philosopher
must "once in his life" withdraw into himself and attempt,
within himself, to overthrow and build anew all the sciences
that, up to then, he has been accepting. Philosophy wisdom
(sagesse) is the philosophizer's quite personal affair. It must
arise as His wisdom, as his self-acquired knowledge tending
toward universality, a knowledge for which he can answer from
the beginning, and at each step, by virtue of his own absolute
insights.
 Edmund Husserl, Cartesian Meditations: An Introduction to Phenomenology
tags: epoch, knowledge, phenomenology, philosophy, science33 likesLike
Clarence Darrow
Do you, good people, believe that Adam and Eve were created in the Garden of Eden and that they were forbidden to eat from the tree of knowledge? I do. The church has always been afraid of that tree. It still is afraid of knowledge. Some of you say religion makes people happy. So does laughing gas. So does whiskey. I believe in the brain of man.
 Clarence Darrow
tags: adam-and-eve, brain, church, creationism, eden, fear, garden-of-eden, genesis, happy, knowledge, laughing-gas, tree-of-knowledge, whiskey30 likesLike
Edward Abbey
If it's knowledge and wisdom you want, then seek out the company of those who do real work for an honest purpose.
 Edward Abbey, Postcards from Ed: Dispatches and Salvos from an American Iconoclast
tags: knowledge, purpose, wisdom, work30 likesLike
Jiddu Krishnamurti
While one is young is the time to investigate, to experiment with everything. The school should help its young people to discover their vocations and responsibilities, and not merely cram their minds with facts and technical knowledge; it should be the soil in which they can grow without fear, happily and integrally.
 Jiddu Krishnamurti, Education and the Significance of Life
tags: education, knowledge, school, youth30 likesLike
James Joyce
Interpretations of interpretations interpreted.
 James Joyce
tags: cognitiont, communication, knowledge29 likesLike
Robert Liparulo
Knowledge was like candy: you never turned it down, especially if you didn't have to work too hard to get it.
 Robert Liparulo, House of Dark Shadows
tags: candy, knowledge29 likesLike
Jaree Francis
Sometimes you're not ready to give the world quite what it wants. And that's okay, because the Earth is generously patient.
 Jaree Francis
tags: assessments, atonement, awakening, divinity, knowledge, world28 likesLike
Umberto Eco
A monk should surely love his books with humility, wishing their good and not the glory of his own curiosity; but what the temptation of adultery is for laymen and the yearning for riches is for secular ecclesiastics, the seduction of knowledge is for monks.
 Umberto Eco, The Name of the Rose
tags: books, curiosity, knowledge, seduction, vice27 likesLike
Jared Diamond
Science is often misrepresented as the body of knowledge acquired by performing replicated controlled experiments in the laboratory. Actually, science is something broader: the acquisition of reliable knowledge about the world.
 Jared Diamond, Collapse: How Societies Choose to Fail or Succeed
tags: epistemology, knowledge, science26 likesLike
Debasish Mridha
Happiness will grow if you plant the seeds of love in the garden of hope with compassion and care.
 Debasish Mridha
tags: care, compassion, education, garden, happiness, hope, inspirational, intelligence, knowledge, life, love, philosophy, truth, wisdom26 likesLike
Benedict XVI
Knowing is not simply a material act, since the object that is known always conceals something beyond the empirical datum. All our knowledge, even the most simple, is always a minor miracle, since it can never be fully explained by the material instruments that we apply to it. In every truth there is something more than we would have expected, in the love that we receive there is always an element that surprises us.
 Pope Benedict XVI, Charity in Truth: Caritas in Veritate
tags: knowledge, learning, love, spirit, surprise, truth25 likesLike

Question Quotes
Quotes tagged as "question" Showing 1-30 of 506
Albert Einstein
A question that sometimes drives me hazy: am I or are the others crazy?
 Albert Einstein
tags: crazy, question, thought-provoking2317 likesLike
Bill Hicks
The whole image is that eternal suffering awaits anyone who questions God's infinite love. That's the message we're brought up with, isn't it? Believe or die! Thank you, forgiving Lord, for all those options.
 Bill Hicks
tags: atheism, belief, damnation, death, eternal-suffering, forgiving, hell, humor, infinite-love, lord, love, message, options, question, suffering404 likesLike
Vera Nazarian
It's a facteveryone is ignorant in some way or another.

Ignorance is our deepest secret.

And it is one of the scariest things out there, because those of us who are most ignorant are also the ones who often don't know it or don't want to admit it.

Here is a quick test:

If you have never changed your mind about some fundamental tenet of your belief, if you have never questioned the basics, and if you have no wish to do so, then you are likely ignorant.

Before it is too late, go out there and find someone who, in your opinion, believes, assumes, or considers certain things very strongly and very differently from you, and just have a basic honest conversation.

It will do both of you good.
 Vera Nazarian, The Perpetual Calendar of Inspiration
tags: adapt, adaptability, assimilate, assimilation, beliefs, change, discovery, ignorance, ignorant, incorporating, introspection, learning, mutability, new, new-thought, open, open-mind, open-minded, open-mindedness, ponder, question, questioning, questions, re-evaluating, receptive, rethink, rethinking, secret, think, thinking, wise318 likesLike
Rick Riordan
When I got across, I looked back and saw Tyson giving Grover a piggyback ride (or was it a goatyback ride?).
 Rick Riordan, The Battle of the Labyrinth
tags: grover-underwood, percy-jackson, question, tyson278 likesLike
Hermann Hesse
I have always thirsted for knowledge, I have always been full of questions.
 Hermann Hesse, Siddhartha
tags: hesse, knowledge, question, siddhartha268 likesLike
Euripides
Question everything. Learn something. Answer nothing.
 Euripides
tags: answer, learn, question260 likesLike
Douglas Adams
Exactly!" said Deep Thought. "So once you do know what the question actually is, you'll know what the answer means.
 Douglas Adams, The Hitchhiker's Guide to the Galaxy
tags: answer, humor, life, meaning, question255 likesLike
James Joyce
The object of the artist is the creation of the beautiful. What the beautiful is is another question.
 James Joyce, A Portrait of the Artist as a Young Man
tags: art, artist, beautiful, creation, object, question158 likesLike
Yogi Berra
I wish I had an answer to that because I'm tired of answering that question.
 Yogi Berra
tags: answer, obvious, question138 likesLike
pleasefindthis
I'd rather live with the answer than die with the question.
 pleasefindthis, I Wrote This For You
tags: answer, question91 likesLike
Bill Watterson
Calvin is hammering nails into coffee table.
Mom: CALVIN WHAT ARE YOU DOING TO THE COFFEE TABLE?!?
Calvin: Is this some sort of trick question, or what?
 Bill Watterson
tags: question, trick88 likesLike
Jean Rhys
Have all beautiful things sad destinies?
 Jean Rhys, Wide Sargasso Sea
tags: beautiful, beauty, destiny, question, sad68 likesLike
Vera Nazarian
Q: Why do I love thee, O Night?
A: Because you know I will never answer.
 Vera Nazarian
tags: aloneness, answer, answers, communication, communion, enigma, introspection, love, lovers, mystery, night, peace, question, questions, quiet, silence66 likesLike
What's my age again?
 Blink-182
tags: age, awesome, blink-182, music, question, random, rock, totally-stupid54 likesLike
B.F. Skinner
The real question is not whether machines think but whether men do. The mystery which surrounds a thinking machine already surrounds a thinking man.
 B.F. Skinner, Contingencies Of Reinforcement: A Theoretical Analysis
tags: machines, mystery, question, real, science, think52 likesLike
Marvin Gaye
To share is precious, pure and fair.
Don't play with something you should cherish for life. Don't you wanna care, ain't it lonely out there?
 Marvin Gaye
tags: advice, cherish, life, lonely, love, lyric, precious, question, song, verse52 likesLike
Criss Jami
Question like a child, reason like an adult, and write like a sage.
 Criss Jami, Healology
tags: adult, child, curiosity, experience, guru, question, reason, sage-advice, truth-of-life, write48 likesLike
Jodi Picoult
The first question she was asked was What do you do? as if that were enough to define you. Nobody ever asked you who you really were, because that changed. You might be a judge or a mother or a dreamer. You might be a loner or a visionary or a pessimist. You might be the victim, and you might be the bully. You could be the parent, and also the child. You might wond one day and heal the next.
 Jodi Picoult, Nineteen Minutes
tags: bully, dreamer, question, victim, visionary, who-you-are43 likesLike
Thomas Henry Huxley
[Responding to the Bishop of Oxford, Samuel Wilberforce's question whether he traced his descent from an ape on his mother's or his father's side]

A man has no reason to be ashamed of having an ape for his grandfather. If there were an ancestor whom I should feel shame in recalling it would rather be a mana man of restless and versatile intellectwho  plunges into scientific questions with which he has no real acquaintance, only to obscure them by an aimless rhetoric, and distract the attention of his hearers from the real point at issue by eloquent digressions and skilled appeals to religious prejudice.
 Thomas Huxley
tags: aimless, ape, discussion, evolution, inspirational, nature, obstruction, preference, prejudice, purpose, question, religious-prejudice, rhetoric, ridicule, science, scientific41 likesLike
Laurell K. Hamilton
Pretend I asked, now answer the question...
 Laurell K. Hamilton
tags: ask, asking, bullet, pretend, question35 likesLike
Catherine Hapka
A little damage makes people more interesting, right?
 Catherine Hapka, Something Borrowed
tags: damage, interesting, question32 likesLike
Dan Abnett
Have you noticed we can breathe in here too?
Gosh, I wouldn't have picked up on that.
 Dan Abnett, Hereticus
tags: air, breath, question, sarcasm, sarcastic, smartass, stupid31 likesLike
Langston Hughes
My old man's a white old man
And my old mother's black.
If ever I cursed my white old man
I take my curses back.
If ever I cursed my black old mother
And wished she were in hell,
I'm sorry for that evil wish
And now i wish her well
My old man died in a fine big house
My Ma died in a shack.
I wonder were i'm going to die,
Being neither white nor black?
 Langston Hughes
tags: evil, house, mother, question, sorry29 likesLike
Vera Nazarian
For as long as there's anyone to ask 'Why?' the answer will always be, 'Why not?
 Vera Nazarian, The Perpetual Calendar of Inspiration
tags: question, why29 likesLike
Victoria Schwab
He wondered about himself (whether he was broken, or special, or better, or worse) and about other people (whether they were really all as stupid as they seemed).
 Victoria Schwab, Vicious
tags: ask, better, broken, discover, himself, other, people, ponder, question, special, stupid, truth, wonder, worse, you, yourself28 likesLike
Criss Jami
All knowledge meets an end at the question '...Why?
 Criss Jami, Healology
tags: answer, curiosity, facts, intelligence, knowing, knowledge, not-knowing, question, why, wisdom24 likesLike
Craig D. Lounsbrough
When Im at the bottom looking up, the main question may not be how do I get out of this hole? In reality, the main question might be how do I get rid of the shovel that I used to dig it?
 Craig D. Lounsbrough, A View from the Front Porch: Encounters with Life and Jesus
tags: accountability, bottom, difficulties, difficulty, dig, hole, honest, honesty, question, responsibility, responsible, rock-bottom, self-analysis, self-discovery, shovel20 likesLike
Alberto Manguel
The starting point is a question.
 Alberto Manguel, The Library at Night
tags: question19 likesLike
Niels Bohr
Every sentence I utter must be understood not as an affirmation but as a question.

[A caution he gives his students, to be wary of dogmatism.]
 Niels Bohr
tags: caution, dogma, dogmatism, humbleness, knowledge, question, sentence, students, understanding13 likesLike
Steve Kluger
Why do guys insist on wearing those odious jeans with their rear ends hanging down around their ankles? Do they really think it's hot?
 Steve Kluger
tags: guys, my-most-excellent-year, question, sagging7 likesLike

Dance Quotes
Quotes tagged as "dance" Showing 1-30 of 915
William W. Purkey
You've gotta dance like there's nobody watching,
Love like you'll never be hurt,
Sing like there's nobody listening,
And live like it's heaven on earth.
 William W. Purkey
tags: dance, heaven, hurt, inspirational, life, love, sing119555 likesLike
Friedrich Nietzsche
And those who were seen dancing were thought to be insane by those who could not hear the music.
 Friedrich Nietzsche
tags: dance, music9148 likesLike
Voltaire
Let us read, and let us dance; these two amusements will never do any harm to the world.
 Voltaire
tags: dance, dancing, reading8531 likesLike
Rumi
Dance, when you're broken open. Dance, if you've torn the bandage off. Dance in the middle of the fighting. Dance in your blood. Dance when you're perfectly free.
 Rumi
tags: dance, inspirational4138 likesLike
Friedrich Nietzsche
We should consider every day lost on which we have not danced at least once.
 Friedrich Wilhelm Nietzsche
tags: dance, dancing, music3832 likesLike
Ann Richards
After all, Ginger Rogers did everything that Fred Astaire did. She just did it backwards and in high heels.
 Ann Richards
tags: dance, dancing, politics, texas, women2289 likesLike
Edward Lear
And hand in hand, on the edge of the sand,
They danced by the light of the moon.
 Edward Lear, The Owl and the Pussycat
tags: dance, happiness, nursery-rhymes2224 likesLike
Do a loony-goony dance
'Cross the kitchen floor,
Put something silly in the world
That ain't been there before.
 Shel Silverstein, A Light in the Attic
tags: dance, silly1892 likesLike
H.P. Lovecraft
Almost nobody dances sober, unless they happen to be insane.
 Howard Phillips Lovecraft
tags: dance, dancing, life1714 likesLike
Jerry Seinfeld
Somebody just gave me a shower radio. Thanks a lot. Do you really want music in the shower? I guess there's no better place to dance than a slick surface next to a glass door.
 Jerry Seinfeld
tags: dance, humor, music, radio, shower1424 likesLike
Who're you going with, then?" said Ron.
"Angelina," said Fred promptly, without a trace of embarrassment.
"What?" said Ron, taken aback. "You've already asked her?"
"Good point," said Fred. He turned his head and called across the common room, "Oi! Angelina!"
Angelina, who had been chatting with Alicia Spinnet near the fire, looked over at him.
"What?" She called back.
"Want to come to the ball with me?"
Angelina gave Fred a sort of appraising look.
"All right, then," she said, and she turned back to Alicia and carried on chatting with a bit of a grin on her face.
"There you go," said Fred to Harry and Ron, "piece of cake.
 J.K. Rowling, Harry Potter and the Goblet of Fire
tags: dance, dating, harry-potter, humor, weasley1400 likesLike
Osho
To be creative means to be in love with life. You can be creative only if you love life enough that you want to enhance its beauty, you want to bring a little more music to it, a little more poetry to it, a little more dance to it.
 Osho
tags: beauty, creative, creativity, dance, life, music1330 likesLike
Neil Gaiman
Sleep my little baby-oh
Sleep until you waken
When you wake you'll see the world
If I'm not mistaken...

Kiss a lover
Dance a measure,
Find your name
And buried treasure...

Face your life
Its pain,
Its pleasure,
Leave no path untaken.
 Neil Gaiman, The Graveyard Book
tags: awakening, choice, dance, identity, individuality, life, love, name, pain, pleasure, sleep, treasure1319 likesLike
Mandy Hale
Youll learn, as you get older, that rules are made to be broken. Be bold enough to live life on your terms, and never, ever apologize for it. Go against the grain, refuse to conform, take the road less traveled instead of the well-beaten path. Laugh in the face of adversity, and leap before you look. Dance as though EVERYBODY is watching. March to the beat of your own drummer. And stubbornly refuse to fit in.
 Mandy Hale, The Single Woman: Life, Love, and a Dash of Sass
tags: adversity, authenticity, being-yourself, boldness, breaking-the-rules, chances, dance, dancing, finding-yourself, fitting-in, getting-older, go-against-the-grain, happiness, journey-of-life, laughter, lessons, lessons-learned, life-lessons, living-life-on-your-own-terms, loving-yourself, non-conformity, overcoming-adversity, positive-thinking, road-less-traveled, rules, standing-out, taking-chances, the-single-woman, uniqueness1294 likesLike
Life isn't about waiting for the storm to pass...It's about learning to dance in the rain.
 Vivian Greene
tags: dance, life, rain, storm1251 likesLike
Live your truth. Express your love. Share your enthusiasm. Take action towards your dreams. Walk
Live your truth. Express your love. Share your enthusiasm. Take action towards your dreams. Walk your talk. Dance and sing to your music. Embrace your blessings. Make today worth remembering.
 Steve Maraboli, Unapologetically You: Reflections on Life and the Human Experience
tags: action, blessings, carpe-diem, dance, enthusiasm, express, inspiration, live, love, motivation, music, share, sing, talk, truth, walk1021 likesLike
Martha Graham
Dance is the hidden language of the soul
 Martha Graham
tags: dance, dancing1002 likesLike
A fit, healthy bodythat is the best fashion statement
 Jess C Scott
tags: beauty, body, body-image, culture, dance, dancer, desire, fashion, fitness, food, food-for-thought, friendship, funny, girl, health, healthy, hip-hop, honesty, humor, humour, imagination, individuality, life, love, lust-for-life, music, novel, passion, reality, relationships, self, sex, truth, wisdom, young, young-adult, young-adult-fiction, young-adult-literature, young-adult-novels, young-adults, youth976 likesLike
Susan Polis Schutz
Let us dance in the sun, wearing wild flowers in our hair...
 susan polis schutz
tags: dance, flowers, happiness, happy, joy, summer, sun, wild879 likesLike
W.B. Yeats
Faeries, come take me out of this dull world,
For I would ride with you upon the wind,
Run on the top of the dishevelled tide,
And dance upon the mountains like a flame.
 William Butler Yeats, The Land of Heart's Desire
tags: dance, faeries, mountains, wind, world864 likesLike
Martha Graham
There is a vitality, a life force, an energy, a quickening that is translated through you into action, and because there is only one of you in all time, this expression is unique. And if you block it, it will never exist through any other medium and will be lost.
 Martha Graham
tags: art, be-yourself, creativity, dance, dancing, expression, self-expression855 likesLike
Alan W. Watts
The only way to make sense out of change is to plunge into it, move with it, and join the dance.
 Alan Wilson Watts
tags: change, dance, flow, impermanence, inspiration, reality, things, world804 likesLike
Eckhart Tolle
Life is the dancer and you are the dance.
 Eckhart Tolle, A New Earth: Awakening to Your Life's Purpose
tags: dance678 likesLike
Martha Graham
There is a vitality, a life force, an energy, a quickening that is translated through you into action, and because there is only one of you in all of time, this expression is unique. And if you block it, it will never exist through any other medium and it will be lost. The world will not have it. It is not your business to determine how good it is nor how valuable nor how it compares with other expressions. It is your business to keep it yours clearly and directly, to keep the channel open. You do not even have to believe in yourself or your work. You have to keep yourself open and aware to the urges that motivate you. Keep the channel open. ... No artist is pleased. [There is] no satisfaction whatever at any time. There is only a queer divine dissatisfaction, a blessed unrest that keeps us marching and makes us more alive than the others
 Martha Graham
tags: art, dance644 likesLike
Martha Graham
Nobody cares if you can't dance well. Just get up and dance. Great dancers are great because of their passion.
 Martha Graham
tags: dance, passion642 likesLike
George Bernard Shaw
Dancing is a perpendicular expression of a horizontal desire.
 George Bernard Shaw
tags: dance, dancing, definition, innuendo, sex, widely-misattributed, wordplay635 likesLike
Oprah Winfrey
Every day brings a chance for you to draw in a breath, kick off your shoes, and dance.
 Oprah Winfrey
tags: carpe-diem, dance544 likesLike
Mandy Hale
Dance. Smile. Giggle. Marvel. TRUST. HOPE. LOVE. WISH. BELIEVE. Most of all, enjoy every moment of the journey, and appreciate where you are at this moment instead of always focusing on how far you have to go.
 Mandy Hale, The Single Woman: Life, Love, and a Dash of Sass
tags: appreciation, attitude, believe, counting-your-blessings, dance, dancing, faith, faith-in-yourself, gratitude, happiness, happy-life, hope, journey-of-life, live-in-the-moment, living-a-happy-life, living-life-to-the-fullest, love, positive-thinking, seizing-the-day, smile, the-here-and-now, the-present, the-single-woman, trust, wish, your-journey524 likesLike
Martha Graham
I believe that we learn by practice. Whether it means to learn to dance by practicing dancing or to learn to live by practicing living, the principles are the same. In each, it is the performance of a dedicated precise set of acts, physical or intellectual, from which comes shape of achievement, a sense of one's being, a satisfaction of spirit. One becomes, in some area, an athlete of God. Practice means to perform, over and over again in the face of all obstacles, some act of vision, of faith, of desire. Practice is a means of inviting the perfection desired.
 Martha Graham
tags: dance, dancing, education, experience, learning, performance, practice448 likesLike
Martha Graham
All that is important is this one moment in movement. Make the moment important, vital, and worth living. Do not let it slip away unnoticed and unused.
 Martha Graham
tags: dance, dancing, life, live-in-the-moment, movement, present406 likesLike

Dance Quotes
Quotes tagged as "dance" Showing 31-60 of 915
Janet Fitch
She would be half a planet away, floating in a turquoise sea, dancing by moonlight to flamenco guitar.
 Janet Fitch, White Oleander
tags: color, dance, freedom, ocean, turquoise674 likesLike
You have to love dancing to stick to it. It gives you nothing back, no manuscripts to store away, no paintings to show on walls and maybe hang in museums, no poems to be printed and sold, nothing but that single fleeting moment when you feel alive.

 Merce Cunningham
tags: ballet, dance, inspirational, merce-cunningham401 likesLike
Craig Ferguson
If a man doesn't know how to dance he doesn't know how to make love, there I said it!
 Craig Ferguson
tags: cbs, dance, dancing, lovemaking, man, men, sex, talk-show-host320 likesLike
Sarah J. Maas
What's your name?" he asked above the roar of the music.

She leaned close. "My name is Wind," she whispered. "And Rain. And Bone and Dust. My name is a snippet of a half-remembered song."

He chuckled a low, delightful sound. She was drunk and silly, and so full of the glory of being young and alive and in the capital of the world that she could hardly contain herself.

"I have no name," she purred. "I am whoever the keepers of my fate tell me to be."

He grasped her by her wrist, running a thumb along the sensitive sknin underneath. "Then let me call you Mine for a dance or two.
 Sarah J. Maas, The Assassin and the Underworld
tags: ball, celaena-sardothien, dance, dorian-havilliard, masks, mine, name, significant302 likesLike
George Balanchine
I don't want people who want to dance, I want people who have to dance. 
 George Balanchine
tags: dance287 likesLike
Dave Barry
Nobody cares if you can't dance well. Just get up and dance. 
 Dave Barry
tags: dance275 likesLike
If you've got nothing to dance about, find a reason to sing.
 Melody Carstairs
tags: dance, freedom, happiness, happy, liberation, motivational, motivational-quotes, sing, smile250 likesLike
Michael  Jackson
Consciousness expresses itself through creation. This world we live in is the dance of the creator. Dancers come and go in the twinkling of an eye but the dance lives on. On many an occasion when I am dancing, I have felt touched by something sacred.In those moments, I felt my spirit soar and become one with everything that exists.

I become the stars and the moon. I become the lover and the beloved. I become thevictor and the vanquished. I become the master and the slave. I become the singer and the song. I become the knower and the known. I keep on dancing then it is the eternal
dance or creation. The creator and creation merge into one wholeness of joy. I keep on dancing...and dancing...and dancing. Until there is only...the dance.
 Michael Jackson
tags: creation, dance246 likesLike
Martha Graham
Great dancers are not great because of their technique, they are great because of their passion. 
 Martha Graham
tags: dance241 likesLike
Mikhail Baryshnikov
I do not try to dance better than anyone else. I only try to to dance better than myself.
 Mikhail Baryshnikov
tags: dance214 likesLike
She decided to free herself, dance into the wind, create a new language. And birds fluttered around her, writing yes in the sky.
 Monique Duval
tags: birds, dance, free, freedom, monique-duval, wind208 likesLike
To dance is to be out of yourself. Larger, more beautiful, more powerful.. This is power, it is glory on earth and it is yours for the taking
 Agnes De Mille
tags: dance198 likesLike
Kurt Vonnegut Jr.
Artists use frauds to make human beings seem more wonderful than they really are. Dancers show us human beings who move much more gracefully than human beings really move. Films and books and plays show us people talking much more entertainingly than people really talk, make paltry human enterprises seem important. Singers and musicians show us human beings making sounds far more lovely than human beings really make. Architects give us temples in which something marvelous is obviously going on. Actually, practically nothing is going on.
 Kurt Vonnegut, Wampeters, Foma and Granfalloons
tags: architecture, art, dance, exaggeration, film194 likesLike
Martha Graham
People have asked me why I chose to be a dancer. I did not choose. I was chosen to be a dancer, and with that, you live all your life. 
 Martha Graham, Blood Memory
tags: dance182 likesLike
Neil Gaiman
CORALINE'S STORY
THERE WAS A GIRL HER NAME WAS APPLE. SHE USED TO DANCE A LOT. SHE DANCED AND DANCED UNTIL HER FEET TURND INTO SOSSAJES. THE END.
 Neil Gaiman, Coraline
tags: apple, dance, sossajes178 likesLike
Xiaolu Guo
It's the heart afraid of breaking that never learns to dance.
 Xiaolu Guo, A Concise Chinese-English Dictionary for Lovers
tags: courage, dance, love, song-lyric176 likesLike
Israelmore Ayivor
You can dance in the storm. Don't wait for the rain to be over before because it might take too long. You can can do it now. Wherever you are, right now, you can start, right now; this very moment.
 Israelmore Ayivor
tags: act, action, dance, dare, do-it, do-it-now, don-t-give-up, don-t-quit, dream, excuses, go, move, never-give-up, now, potential, procrastination, rain, right-now, start, storm, this-moment, today152 likesLike
Craig Ferguson
I love zombies. If any monster could Riverdance, it would be zombies.
 Craig Ferguson
tags: dance, monsters, zombies131 likesLike
Isadora  Duncan
It has taken me years of struggle, hard work, and research to learn to make one simple gesture, and I know enough about the art of writing to realize that it would take as many years of concentrated effort to write one simple, beautiful sentence.
 Isadora Duncan
tags: dance, dancing, writing121 likesLike
Amit Ray
Life is a dance. Mindfulness is witnessing that dance.
 Amit Ray, Mindfulness Living in the Moment - Living in the Breath
tags: awareness-and-attitude, dance, dancing, life, life-and-living, life-quotes, meditation, mindful-living, mindfulness, mindfulness-meditation, mindfulness-practice, moment, moments-of-life, now-is-the-time, power-of-now, present-moment, present-moment-living, vipassana-meditation, witnessing, world111 likesLike
Nino Varsimashvili
Life For some it is battle for others its dance...For rich it is party for poor it is chance!
 Nino Varsimashvili
tags: battle, chance, dance, life, party, poor, rich110 likesLike
Cora Carmack
Then, slowly, like the sunrise peeking over the horizon, she smiled.
She snapped the box closed.
She didnt scream. She didnt run. She didnt faint.
There might have been a little crying.
But mostly she danced.
 Cora Carmack, Losing It
tags: bliss, british, dance, garrick, happy, love, marriage, virginity105 likesLike
Craig Ferguson
Anyone who's just driven 90 yards against huge men trying to kill them has earned the right to do Jazz hands. 
 Craig Ferguson
tags: celebration, dance, football89 likesLike
Robert McKee
A fine work of art - music, dance, painting, story - has the power to silence the chatter in the mind and lift us to another place.
 Robert McKee, Story: Substance, Structure, Style, and the Principles of Screenwriting
tags: art, dance, music, painting, story87 likesLike
Amelia Atwater-Rhodes
In a society that worships love, freedom and beauty, dance is sacred. It is a prayer for the future, a remembrance of the past and a joyful exclamation of thanks for the present.
 Amelia Atwater-Rhodes, The Shapeshifters: The Kiesha'ra of the Den of Shadows
tags: dance, freedom, sacred-p-22081 likesLike
Mark Twain
Work like you don't need the money. Dance like no one is watching. And love like you've never been hurt.
 Mark Twain
tags: dance, hurt, hurting-heart, love, money, work80 likesLike
Edward Lear
They dined on mince, and slices of quince
Which they ate with a runcible spoon;
And hand in hand, on the edge of the sand,
They danced by the light of the moon.
 Edward Lear, The Owl and the Pussycat
tags: dance, love, nursery-rhyme74 likesLike
Dan Pearce
It doesnt matter if Im off the beat. It doesnt matter if Im snapping to the rhythm. It doesnt matter if I look like a complete goon when I dance. It is my dance. It is my moment. It is mine. And dance I will. Try and stop me. Youll probably get kicked in the face.
 Dan Pearce, Single Dad Laughing
tags: dance, dancing, inhibitions, overcoming-fear, peer-pressure, self-doubt71 likesLike
To understand what I am saying, you have to believe that dance is something other than technique. We forget where the movements come from. They are born from life. When you create a new work, the point of departure must be contemporary life -- not existing forms of dance.
 Pina Bausch
tags: dance70 likesLike
Attar of Nishapur
A man whose eyes love opens risks his soul -
His dancing breaks beyond the mind's control.
 Farid Attar, The Conference of the Birds
tags: beauty, dance, inspirational, love, truth53 likesLike

Dance Quotes
Quotes tagged as "dance" Showing 61-90 of 915
Twyla Tharp
Art is the only way to run away without leaving home.
 Twyla Tharp
tags: dance, performance220 likesLike
W.H. Auden
The desires of the heart are as crooked as corkscrews
Not to be born is the best for man
The second best is a formal order
The dance's pattern, dance while you can.
Dance, dance, for the figure is easy
The tune is catching and will not stop
Dance till the stars come down from the rafters
Dance, dance, dance till you drop.
 W.H. Auden
tags: dance, desire142 likesLike
Dance for yourself. If someone understands, good. If not, no matter. Go right on doing what interests you, and do it until it stops interesting you.
 Louis Horst
tags: dance, inspirational117 likesLike
James Howe
Life is short and there will always be dirty dishes, so let's dance.
 James Howe, Totally Joe
tags: dance, james-howe, life107 likesLike
William Stafford
Kids: they dance before they learn there is anything that isn't music
 William Stafford
tags: dance96 likesLike
Roman Payne
What is a Wanderess? Bound by no boundaries, contained by no countries, tamed by no time, she is the force of natures course.
 Roman Payne, The Wanderess
tags: adventure, adventuress, bravery, courage, dance, dancing, dreameress, europa, exploration, explore, explorer, female, female-beauty, female-characters, female-empowerment, female-hero, female-liberation, females, feminine, femininity, feminism, freedom, girl, girl-power, girl-quotes, girls, growing, growth, happiness, imagination, imaginative, inspiration, inspirational, inspirational-attitude, inspirational-life, inspire, life-and-living, life-change, life-philosophy, literary, living-life-to-the-fullest, loving-life, passion, passionate, passionate-life, passionate-living, revitalize, revitalizing, roman-payne, seize-the-day, self-love, self-value, self-worth, strength, the-value-of-life, the-wanderess, wander, wanderer, wanderess, wandering, wanderlust, wayfaring, wild-woman, wildness, woman, woman-empowerment, woman-s-strength, womanhood, women, women-s-inspirational, women-s-liberation, women-s-motivational, women-s-power89 likesLike
Paulo Coelho
If theater is ritual, then dance is too... It's as if the threads connecting us to the rest of the world were washed clean of preconceptions and fears. When you dance, you can enjoy the luxury of being you.
 Paulo Coelho, The Witch of Portobello
tags: dance, ritual, self-awareness88 likesLike
Jenny Han
When it's finals week and you've been studying for five hours straight, you need three things to get you through the nigh.The biggest Slurpee you can find,half cherry half Coke.Pajama pants, the kind that have been washed so many times they are tissue-paper thin. And finally,dance breaks. Lots of dance breaks.
 Jenny Han, We'll Always Have Summer
tags: dance, studying79 likesLike
Nicole  Lyons
She will blaze through you like a gypsy wildfire. Igniting you soul and dancing in its flames. And when she is gone, the smell of her smoke will be the only thing left to soothe you.
 Nicole Lyons
tags: beautiful-quotes, dance, dance-quotes, dancing, gypsy, gypsy-quotes, love, love-quotes, lovers, passion, poetry, poetry-quotes, quote-of-the-day, quotes, strong-women, wildfire68 likesLike
Life is sweet when you pay attention. When it doesn't seem sweet, put a sticker on your nose and do a funky dance.
 Whitney Scott
tags: dance, inspirational, life64 likesLike
It is a truth universally acknowledge that there will always be a gentleman to dance with, except at just the moment when you require one most.
 Anna Godbersen, Envy
tags: dance, gentlemen, paraphrased, universal-truths59 likesLike
Ladies should also remember that gentlemen look more to the effect of a dress in setting off the figure and countenance of a lady than to its cost. Very few gentlemen have any idea the value of ladies' dresses. This is a subject for female criticism. Beauty of person and elegance of manners in women will always command more admiration from the opposite sex than beauty, elegance or costliness of clothing."
The Scholars' Companion and Ball Room Vade Mecum
Thomas Hillgrove, 1857
 Thomas Hillgrove
tags: dance, dress, fashion, men, women51 likesLike
I don't want to hide. I want to slow dance with you again. I want to dance with you forever.
 Sarah Black, Border Roads
tags: dance, forever, love48 likesLike
Sanober  Khan
One clear moment, one of trance
One missed step, one perfect dance
One missed shot, one and only chance
Life is all...but one fleeting glance.
 Sanober Khan
tags: dance, fleeting, glance, glimpse, indian-authors, life-and-living, life-is-short, life-quotes, moments, poems, poetry, poetry-quotes, trance46 likesLike
Kamand Kojouri
Forget your voice, sing!
Forget your feet, dance!
Forget your life, live!
Forget yourself and be!
 Kamand Kojouri
tags: aware, awareness, awareness-quotes, be, become, beloved, conscious, consciousness, consciousness-quotes, dance, enjoy, feet, forget, hafez, hafiz, harmony, inspirational, kamand, kamand-kojouri, khayyam, kojouri, let-go, letting-go-quotes, life, live, living-in-the-now, love, lover, moment, music, present, rumi, saadi, sing, song, spiritual, spirituality, sufi, surrender, voice, yourself45 likesLike
Lynda Barry
The groove is so mysterious. We're born with it and we lose it and the world seems to split apart before our eyes into stupid and cool. When we get it back, the world unifies around us, and both stupid and cool fall away.
I am grateful to those who are keepers of the groove. The babies and the grandmas who hang on to it and help us remember when we forget that any kind of dancing is better than no dancing at all.
 Lynda Barry, One Hundred Demons
tags: adolescence, babies, confidence, cool, dance, dancing, demons, grandma, groove, growing-up, lynda-barry, one-hundred-demons, self-love, stupid45 likesLike
Stasia Ward Kehoe
I feel his arm
Lightly
Over me.
He takes one of my outstretched hands.
Draws it beneath my stomach.

"One more time..."

This is not sex,
Not friendship.
Something
Strange
Special
In the stillness of his breath,
The waterlike way he moves.

He is making a dance.
We are making a dance.
 Stasia Ward Kehoe, Audition
tags: ballet, dance43 likesLike
Lisa Tawn Bergren
Don't you agree? Swordplay is a dance of sorts, an understanding of the logical, most sophisticated next step. Except that in a fight, one must take the unexpected step. In dance it is all about taking the right, expected step.
 Lisa Tawn Bergren, Waterfall
tags: analogy, dance, heroine43 likesLike
Small men oft feel a need to prove their courage with unseemly boasts," he declared. "I doubt if he could kill a duck."
Tyrion shrugged. "Fetch the duck.
 George R.R. Martin, A Dance with Dragons
tags: boast, courage, dance, dragons, duck, funny, humor, kill, martin, prove, small, soiaf, tyrion42 likesLike
Leonard Cohen
Show me slowly what I only
know the limits of
Dance me to the end of love
 Leonard Cohen, Leonard Cohen: Poems and Songs
tags: cohen, dance, epistemology, knowledge, love, poetry42 likesLike
Kamand Kojouri
We dance to seduce ourselves. To fall in love with ourselves. When we dance with another, we manifest the very thing we love about ourselves so that they may see it and love us too.
 Kamand Kojouri
tags: beloved, dance, dance-yoga, dancer, dancing, fall-in-love, flamenco, kamand, kamand-kojouri, kojouri, love, lover, loving, manifest, manifestation, quote, sama, sama-dance, seduce, seducer, seduction, sufi-whirling, tango, waltz, whirl, whirling, yoga, yoga-dance41 likesLike
Anna Pavlova
When a small child, I thought that success spelled happiness. I was wrong, happiness is like a butterfly which appears and delights us for one brief moment, but soon flits away. 
 Anna Pavlova
tags: dance, happiness, life41 likesLike
Ana Claudia Antunes
True love is like little roses,
sweet, fragrant in small doses.
 Ana Claudia Antunes, Pierrot & Columbine
tags: ballet, columbine, dance, historical-mystery, historical-romance-fiction, life, love, pierrot, romance, roses, sweet, valentine-s-day41 likesLike
Robert Fanney
Without realizing what she was doing and more on an impulse than anything else, she leaned forward and kissed him. It was a simple, yet firm kiss and she pulled back after only a moment. But it sent a thrill through her.
He leaned down for another. But she put her finger on his lips to stop him.
"That was my reward to you," she said as they danced. "Don't squander it."
"Reward? he asked still seeming both surprised and delighted at this unexpected attention. "What for?"
"Why for living, Vaelros. And for doing so much else to help me. I will have you rewarded in state as well. But that was just from me."
She saw Vaelros flush and she gave him a brilliant smile. "You don't like my reward?" she asked.
"I do!" he replied. "I want only to learn how to earn more."
The music was fading. The song was ending. Luthiel stepped back and let her hands drop.
"A mysterious thing, my heart," she said. 
 Robert Fanney
tags: dance, heart, luthiel, mystery, romance, vaelros38 likesLike
Jennifer Starzec
I often wished that more people understood the invisible side of things. Even the people who seemed to understand, didn't really.
 Jennifer Starzec, Determination
tags: chronic-illness, chronic-pain, dance, disability, fatigue, inspirational, invisible-illness, motivational, myelitis, neuropathy, paralysis, rare-disease, run, sci, spinal-cord-injury, tm, transverse-myelitis33 likesLike
Lermontov: Why do you want to dance?
Vicky: Why do you want to live?
Lermontov: Well, I don't know exactly why, but... I must.
Vicky: That's my answer too.
 The Red Shoes
tags: dance33 likesLike
Roman Payne
I'm not ashamed of heroic ambitions. If man and woman can only dance upon this earth for a few countable turns of the sun... let each of us be an Artemis, Odysseus, or Zeus... Aphrodite to the extent of the will of each one.
 Roman Payne, Rooftop Soliloquy
tags: aphrodite, artemis, dance, dancing, death, life, literature, odysseus, roman-payne, time, zeus32 likesLike
Jennifer Starzec
People who don't see you every day have a hard time understanding how on some days--good days--you can run three miles, but can barely walk across the parking lot on other days,' [my mom] said quietly.
 Jennifer Starzec, Determination
tags: chronic-illness, chronic-pain, dance, disability, fatigue, inspirational, invisible-illness, motivational, myelitis, neuropathy, paralysis, run, tm, transverse-myelitis28 likesLike
Adriana Trigiani
I don't use a crap camera, I don't eat junk, and I'm not going to a dance where the boys are bores
 Adriana Trigiani, Viola in Reel Life
tags: attitude, boys, dance, humor28 likesLike
Isadora  Duncan
Oh Woman, come before us, before our eyes longing for beauty, and tired of the ugliness of civilization, come in simple tunics, letting us see the line and harmony of the body beneath, and dance for us. Dance us the sweetness of life. Give us again the sweetness and the beauty of the true dance, give us again the joy of seeing the simple unconscious pure body of a woman. Like a great call it has come, and women must hear it and answer it.
 Isadora Duncan, The Art of the Dance
tags: dance, isadora-duncan, spirituality, women26 likesLike

Death Quotes
Quotes tagged as "death" Showing 1-30 of 14,861
To the well-organized mind, death is but the next great adventure.
 J.K. Rowling, Harry Potter and the Sorcerer's Stone
tags: death, inspirational25020 likesLike
Woody Allen
I'm not afraid of death; I just don't want to be there when it happens.
 Woody Allen
tags: death, fear, humor, life24871 likesLike
Anas Nin
Love never dies a natural death. It dies because we don't know how to replenish its source. It dies of blindness and errors and betrayals. It dies of illness and wounds; it dies of weariness, of witherings, of tarnishings.
 Anais Nin
tags: death, love20976 likesLike
J.R.R. Tolkien
I wish it need not have happened in my time," said Frodo.
"So do I," said Gandalf, "and so do all who live to see such times. But that is not for them to decide. All we have to decide is what to do with the time that is given us.
 J.R.R. Tolkien, The Fellowship of the Ring
tags: adventuring, death, time18243 likesLike
Jimi Hendrix
I'm the one that's got to die when it's time for me to die, so let me live my life the way I want to.
 Jimi Hendrix, Jimi Hendrix - Axis: Bold as Love
tags: death, life16663 likesLike
Mark Twain
The fear of death follows from the fear of life. A man who lives fully is prepared to die at any time.
 Mark Twain
tags: death, life15821 likesLike
Mitch Albom
Death ends a life, not a relationship.
 Mitch Albom, Tuesdays with Morrie
tags: death, life10784 likesLike
Death's got an Invisibility Cloak?" Harry interrupted again.
"So he can sneak up on people," said Ron. "Sometimes he gets bored of running at them, flapping his arms and shrieking...
 J.K. Rowling, Harry Potter and the Deathly Hallows
tags: death, humor, sarcasm9593 likesLike
I DON'T CARE!" Harry yelled at them, snatching up a lunascope and throwing it into the fireplace. "I'VE HAD ENOUGH, I'VE SEEN ENOUGH, I WANT OUT, I WANT IT TO END, I DON'T CARE ANYMORE!"
"You do care," said Dumbledore. He had not flinched or made a single move to stop Harry demolishing his office. His expression was calm, almost detached. "You care so much you feel as though you will bleed to death with the pain of it.
 J.K. Rowling, Harry Potter and the Order of the Phoenix
tags: ache, death, dumbledore, harry-potter, hurt, life, pain8720 likesLike
Lemony Snicket
It is a curious thing, the death of a loved one. We all know that our time in this world is limited, and that eventually all of us will end up underneath some sheet, never to wake up. And yet it is always a surprise when it happens to someone we know. It is like walking up the stairs to your bedroom in the dark, and thinking there is one more stair than there is. Your foot falls down, through the air, and there is a sickly moment of dark surprise as you try and readjust the way you thought of things.
 Lemony Snicket, Horseradish
tags: death7523 likesLike
Oscar Wilde
A thing is not necessarily true because a man dies for it.
 Oscar Wilde
tags: belief, death, ideals, martyr, truth7418 likesLike
Terry Pratchett
It is said that your life flashes before your eyes just before you die. That is true, it's called Life.
 Terry Pratchett, The Last Continent
tags: death, humor, life6239 likesLike
Chuck Palahniuk
I don't want to die without any scars.
 Chuck Palahniuk, Fight Club
tags: death, scars, tyler-durden5750 likesLike
Kinky Friedman
My dear,
Find what you love and let it kill you.
Let it drain you of your all. Let it cling onto your back and weigh you down into eventual nothingness.
Let it kill you and let it devour your remains.
For all things will kill you, both slowly and fastly, but its much better to be killed by a lover.
~ Falsely yours
 Kinky Friedman
tags: death, love5581 likesLike
Mark Twain
I do not fear death. I had been dead for billions and billions of years before I was born, and had not suffered the slightest inconvenience from it.
 Mark Twain
tags: death, inspirational5497 likesLike
William Shakespeare
When he shall die,
Take him and cut him out in little stars,
And he will make the face of heaven so fine
That all the world will be in love with night
And pay no worship to the garish sun.
 William Shakespeare, Romeo and Juliet
tags: death, light, stars5451 likesLike
E.E. Cummings
Unbeing dead isn't being alive.
 E. E. Cummings
tags: death, life, poetry5226 likesLike
Markus Zusak
It kills me sometimes, how people die.
 Markus Zusak, The Book Thief
tags: death5218 likesLike
Hunter S. Thompson
Life should not be a journey to the grave with the intention of arriving safely in a pretty and well preserved body, but rather to skid in broadside in a cloud of smoke, thoroughly used up, totally worn out, and loudly proclaiming "Wow! What a Ride!
 Hunter S. Thompson, The Proud Highway: Saga of a Desperate Southern Gentleman, 1955-1967
tags: adventure, death, life5121 likesLike
Langston Hughes
Life is for the living.
Death is for the dead.
Let life be like music.
And death a note unsaid.
 Langston Hughes, The Collected Poems
tags: death, life, music4906 likesLike
You'll stay with me?'
Until the very end,' said James.
 J. K. Rowling, Harry Potter and the Deathly Hallows
tags: death, final, goodbye, harry-potter, lupin, parents, sirius4606 likesLike
Franois Rabelais
I go to seek a Great Perhaps.
 Franois Rabelais
tags: death, french-renaissance-writer, john-green, last-words, life, looking-for-alaska, meaning-of-life, miles-halter4410 likesLike
Sarah Dessen
That was the thing. You never got used to it, the idea of someone being gone. Just when you think it's reconciled, accepted, someone points it out to you, and it just hits you all over again, that shocking.
 Sarah Dessen, The Truth About Forever
tags: death, life4217 likesLike
Jodi Picoult
If you gave someone your heart and they died, did they take it with them? Did you spend the rest of forever with a hole inside you that couldn't be filled?
 Jodi Picoult, Nineteen Minutes
tags: death, heart, love4203 likesLike
Things we lose have a way of coming back to us in the end, if not always in the way we expect.
 JK Rowling, Harry Potter and the Order of the Phoenix
tags: death, love4161 likesLike
Markus Zusak
Even death has a heart.
 Markus Zusak, The Book Thief
tags: death, life3854 likesLike
Hunter S. Thompson
We are all alone, born alone, die alone, andin spite of True Romance magazineswe shall all someday look back on our lives and see that, in spite of our company, we were alone the whole way. I do not say lonelyat least, not all the timebut essentially, and finally, alone. This is what makes your self-respect so important, and I don't see how you can respect yourself if you must look in the hearts and minds of others for your happiness.
 Hunter S. Thompson, The Proud Highway: Saga of a Desperate Southern Gentleman, 1955-1967
tags: alone, birth, death, growing-up, growth, life, lonely, love, self-respect3806 likesLike
Rick Riordan
Don't feel bad, I'm usually about to die.
 Rick Riordan, The Battle of the Labyrinth
tags: death, greek, humor, mythology, percy-jackson, sorry3670 likesLike
Laurie Halse Anderson
When people don't express themselves, they die one piece at a time.
 Laurie Halse Anderson, Speak
tags: death, inspirational, voice3434 likesLike
William Shakespeare
To be, or not to be: that is the question:
Whether 'tis nobler in the mind to suffer
The slings and arrows of outrageous fortune,
Or to take arms against a sea of troubles,
And by opposing end them? To die: to sleep;
No more; and by a sleep to say we end
The heart-ache and the thousand natural shocks
That flesh is heir to, 'tis a consummation
Devoutly to be wish'd. To die, to sleep;
To sleep: perchance to dream: ay, there's the rub;
For in that sleep of death what dreams may come
When we have shuffled off this mortal coil,
Must give us pause: there's the respect
That makes calamity of so long life;
For who would bear the whips and scorns of time,
The oppressor's wrong, the proud man's contumely,
The pangs of despised love, the law's delay,
The insolence of office and the spurns
That patient merit of the unworthy takes,
When he himself might his quietus make
With a bare bodkin? who would fardels bear,
To grunt and sweat under a weary life,
But that the dread of something after death,
The undiscover'd country from whose bourn
No traveller returns, puzzles the will
And makes us rather bear those ills we have
Than fly to others that we know not of?
Thus conscience does make cowards of us all;
And thus the native hue of resolution
Is sicklied o'er with the pale cast of thought,
And enterprises of great pith and moment
With this regard their currents turn awry,
And lose the name of action.--Soft you now!
The fair Ophelia! Nymph, in thy orisons
Be all my sins remember'd!
 William Shakespeare, Hamlet
tags: death, existence, life3400 likesLike

Death Quotes
Quotes tagged as "death" Showing 31-60 of 14,861
Terry Pratchett
I meant," said Ipslore bitterly, "what is there in this world that truly makes living worthwhile?"
Death thought about it.
CATS, he said eventually. CATS ARE NICE.
 Terry Pratchett, Sourcery
tags: cats, death, life3229 likesLike
Herbert Hoover
Older men declare war. But it is youth that must fight and die.
 Herbert Hoover
tags: age, death, fighting, old-age, war, youth3121 likesLike
Terry Pratchett
DON'T THINK OF IT AS DYING, said Death. JUST THINK OF IT AS LEAVING EARLY TO AVOID THE RUSH.
 Terry Pratchett, Good Omens: The Nice and Accurate Prophecies of Agnes Nutter, Witch
tags: death, humor3037 likesLike
Jodi Picoult
If you have a sister and she dies, do you stop saying you have one? Or are you always a sister, even when the other half of the equation is gone?
 Jodi Picoult, My Sister's Keeper
tags: death, loss, sisters2863 likesLike
The last enemy that shall be destroyed is death.
 J.K. Rowling
tags: bible, death, enemy2777 likesLike
Ayn Rand
I could die for you. But I couldn't, and wouldn't, live for you.
 Ayn Rand, The Fountainhead
tags: death, die, fountainhead, life, live, mortality2752 likesLike
Chuck Palahniuk
If death meant just leaving the stage long enough to change costume and come back as a new character...Would you slow down? Or speed up?
 Chuck Palahniuk, Invisible Monsters
tags: death2640 likesLike
Ian Fleming
You only live twice:
Once when you are born
And once when you look death in the face
 Ian Fleming, You Only Live Twice
tags: death, haiku, james-bond, philosophy, poetry2590 likesLike
Richelle Mead
Stop fighting me!" he said, trying to pull on the arm he held.

He was in a precarious position himself, straddling the rail as he tried to lean over far enough to get me and actually hold onto me.

Let go of me! I yelled back.

But he was too strong and managed to haul most of me over the rail, enough so that I wasnt in total danger of falling again.

See, heres the thing. In that moment before I let go, I really had been contemplating my death. Id come to terms with it and accepted it. I also, however, had known Dimitri might do something exactly like this. He was just that fast and that good. That was why I was holding my stake in the hand that was dangling free.

I looked him in the eye. "I will always love you."

Then I plunged the stake into his chest.

It wasnt as precise a blow as I would have liked, not with the skilled way he was dodging. I struggled to get the stake in deep enough to his heart, unsure if I could do it from this angle. Then, his struggles stopped. His eyes stared at me, stunned, and his lips parted, almost into a smile, albeit a grisly and pained one.

"Thats what I was supposed to say. . . he gasped out.

Those were his last words.
 Richelle Mead, Blood Promise
tags: blood, bridge, death, dhampir, dimitri, love, magic, promise, rose, stake, strigoi2504 likesLike
Markus Zusak
A small but noteworthy note. I've seen so many young men over the years who think they're running at other young men. They are not. They are running at me.
 Markus Zusak, The Book Thief
tags: death, war2503 likesLike
Chuck Palahniuk
A girl calls and asks, "Does it hurt very much to die?"
"Well, sweetheart," I tell her, "yes, but it hurts a lot more to keep living.
 Chuck Palahniuk, Survivor
tags: death, living2466 likesLike
Charles Bukowski
there is a place in the heart that
will never be filled

a space

and even during the
best moments
and
the greatest times
times

we will know it

we will know it
more than
ever

there is a place in the heart that
will never be filled
and

we will wait
and
wait

in that space.
 Charles bukowski
tags: death, inspirational2458 likesLike
Death is so terribly final, while life is full of possibilities.
 George R.R. Martin, A Game of Thrones
tags: death, life2429 likesLike
Victor Hugo
It is nothing to die. It is frightful not to live.
 Victor Hugo, Les Misrables
tags: death, living-life2386 likesLike
Mahatma Gandhi
Each night, when I go to sleep, I die. And the next morning, when I wake up, I am reborn.
 Mahatma Gandhi
tags: day, death, night, rebirth, reincarnation, sleep2316 likesLike
John Irving
When someone you love dies, and you're not expecting it, you don't lose her all at once; you lose her in pieces over a long timethe way the mail stops coming, and her scent fades from the pillows and even from the clothes in her closet and drawers. Gradually, you accumulate the parts of her that are gone. Just when the day comeswhen there's a particular missing part that overwhelms you with the feeling that she's gone, foreverthere comes another day, and another specifically missing part.
 John Irving, A Prayer for Owen Meany
tags: death, grief, loss2278 likesLike
John Green
I found myself thinking about President William McKinley, the third American president to be assassinated. He lived for several days after he was shot, and towards the end, his wife started crying and screaming, "I want to go too! I want to go too!" And with his last measure of strength, McKinley turned to her and spoke his last words: "We are all going.
 John Green, Looking for Alaska
tags: death, last-words2227 likesLike
Edgar Allan Poe
Sleep, those little slices of death  how I loathe them.
 Edgar Allan Poe
tags: death, sleep2189 likesLike
Does it hurt?" The childish question had escaped Harry's lips before he could stop it.

"Dying? Not at all," said Sirius. "Quicker and easier than falling asleep.
 J.K. Rowling, Harry Potter and the Deathly Hallows
tags: death2113 likesLike
Death is Peaceful, Life is Harder
 Stephenie Meyer, Twilight
tags: bella, death, life2063 likesLike
Terry Pratchett
And what would humans be without love?"
RARE, said Death.
 Terry Pratchett, Sourcery
tags: death, love2025 likesLike
Mitch Albom
Love is how you stay alive, even after you are gone.
 Mitch Albom
tags: death, immortality, love2005 likesLike
  
   ..     
   
tags: death, life2002 likesLike
Haruki Murakami
Death is not the opposite of life, but a part of it.
 Haruki Murakami, Blind Willow, Sleeping Woman: 24 Stories
tags: death, life1946 likesLike
Markus Zusak
His soul sat up. It met me. Those kinds of souls always do - the best ones. The ones who rise up and say "I know who you are and I am ready. Not that I want to go, of course, but I will come." Those souls are always light because more of them have been put out. More of them have already found their way to other places.
 Markus Zusak, The Book Thief
tags: death1844 likesLike
J.D. Salinger
When you're dead, they really fix you up. I hope to hell when I do die somebody has sense enough to just dump me in the river or something. Anything except sticking me in a goddam cemetery. People coming and putting a bunch of flowers on your stomach on Sunday, and all that crap. Who wants flowers when you're dead? Nobody.
 J.D. Salinger, The Catcher in the Rye
tags: cemetery, death, funeral-rites, holden1843 likesLike
Isaac Asimov
Life is pleasant. Death is peaceful. It's the transition that's troublesome.
 Isaac Asimov
tags: comment, death, death-and-dying, funny, life, transition1819 likesLike
Jodi Picoult
and he suddenly knew that if she killed herself, he would die. Maybe not immediately, maybe not with the same blinding rush of pain, but it would happen. You couldn't live for very long without a heart.
 Jodi Picoult
tags: death, heart, love, mourning, suicide1780 likesLike
Helen Keller
Death is no more than passing from one room into another. But there's a difference for me, you know. Because in that other room I shall be able to see.
 Helen Keller
tags: blindness, death, faith, inspirational, wisdom1776 likesLike
Martin Luther King Jr.
No one really knows why they are alive until they know what they'd die for.
 Martin Luther King Jr.
tags: death, inspirational1772 likesLike

Death Quotes
Quotes tagged as "death" Showing 61-90 of 14,861
Neil Gaiman
I think I fell in love with her, a little bit. Isn't that dumb? But it was like I knew her. Like she was my oldest, dearest friend. The kind of person you can tell anything to, no matter how bad, and they'll still love you, because they know you. I wanted to go with her. I wanted her to notice me. And then she stopped walking. Under the moon, she stopped. And looked at us. She looked at me. Maybe she was trying to tell me something; I don't know. She probably didn't even know I was there. But I'll always love her. All my life.
 Neil Gaiman, World's End
tags: death, friends, love1786 likesLike
Steve Jobs
Your time is limited, so don't waste it living someone else's life. Don't be trapped by dogma - which is living with the results of other people's thinking. Don't let the noise of other's opinions drown out your own inner voice. And most important, have the courage to follow your heart and intuition. They somehow already know what you truly want to become. Everything else is secondary.
 Steve Jobs
tags: death, life, r-i-p, steve1746 likesLike
Will Rogers
If there are no dogs in Heaven, then when I die I want to go where they went.
 Will Rogers
tags: afterlife, death, dogs, heaven1728 likesLike
Anas Nin
People living deeply have no fear of death.
 Anas Nin
tags: death1677 likesLike
Your mother died to save you. If there is one thing Voldemort cannot understand, it is love. Love as powerful as your mother's for you leaves it's own mark. To have been loved so deeply, even though the person who loved us is gone, will give us some protection forever.
 J.K. Rowling, Harry Potter and the Sorcerer's Stone
tags: death, love1669 likesLike
Markus Zusak
I carried [Rudy] softly through the broken street...with him I tried a little harder [at comforting]. I watched the contents of his soul for a moment and saw a black-painted boy calling the name Jesse Owens as he ran through an imaginary tape. I saw him hip-deep in some icy water, chasing a book, and I saw a boy lying in bed, imagining how a kiss would taste from his glorious next-door neighbor. He does something to me, that boy. Every time. It's his only detriment. He steps on my heart. He makes me cry.
 Markus Zusak, The Book Thief
tags: death1668 likesLike
Kenzabur e
The dead can survive as part of the lives of those that still live.
 Kenzabur e, Hiroshima Notes
tags: death1645 likesLike
Ernest Hemingway
Every man's life ends the same way. It is only the details of how he lived and how he died that distinguish one man from another.
 Ernest Hemingway
tags: death, life1642 likesLike
Arthur Golden
At the temple there is a poem called "Loss" carved into the stone. It has three words, but the poet has scratched them out. You cannot read loss, only feel it.
 Arthur Golden, Memoirs of a Geisha
tags: death, loss1631 likesLike
Antonio Porchia
One lives in the hope of becoming a memory.
 Antonio Porchia
tags: death, hope, immortality, life, memory, remembrance1627 likesLike
Connie Willis
That's what literature is. It's the people who went before us, tapping out messages from the past, from beyond the grave, trying to tell us about life and death! Listen to them!
 Connie Willis, Passage
tags: death, life, literature, messages1597 likesLike
Sylvia Plath
Dying
Is an art, like everything else.
I do it exceptionally well.
I do it so it feels like hell.
I do it so it feels real.
I guess you could say I have a call.
 Sylvia Plath, Ariel
tags: death1597 likesLike
Lao Tzu
A man with outward courage dares to die; a man with inner courage dares to live.
 Lao Tzu, Tao Te Ching
tags: courage, death, inspirational, life, moral-courage, real-life1572 likesLike
Richard Dawkins
We are going to die, and that makes us the lucky ones. Most people are never going to die because they are never going to be born. The potential people who could have been here in my place but who will in fact never see the light of day outnumber the sand grains of Arabia. Certainly those unborn ghosts include greater poets than Keats, scientists greater than Newton. We know this because the set of possible people allowed by our DNA so massively exceeds the set of actual people. In the teeth of these stupefying odds it is you and I, in our ordinariness, that are here.We privileged few, who won the lottery of birth against all odds, how dare we whine at our inevitable return to that prior state from which the vast majority have never stirred?
 Richard Dawkins, Unweaving the Rainbow: Science, Delusion and the Appetite for Wonder
tags: death, inspirational, science, wonder1565 likesLike
Here lies Dobby, a free elf.
 J.K. Rowling, Harry Potter and the Deathly Hallows
tags: death, epitaph1541 likesLike
Benjamin Franklin
Many people die at twenty five and aren't buried until they are seventy five.
 Benjamin Franklin
tags: death, life, wordplay1497 likesLike
Franz Kafka
The meaning of life is that it stops.
 Franz Kafka
tags: death, life1485 likesLike
Jandy Nelson
My sister will die over and over again for the rest of my life. Grief is forever. It doesn't go away; it becomes a part of you, step for step, breath for breath. I will never stop grieving Bailey because I will never stop loving her. That's just how it is. Grief and love are conjoined, you don't get one without the other. All I can do is love her, and love the world, emulate her by living with daring and spirit and joy.
 Jandy Nelson, The Sky Is Everywhere
tags: death, grief, grieving, loss, love, sadness1482 likesLike
To live in hearts we leave behind is not to die.
 Thomas Campbell
tags: death, epitaph, immortality, memory, remembrance1327 likesLike
Neil Young
It's better to burn out than to fade away.
 Neil Young
tags: death, end, life1308 likesLike
Ginny, listen...I can't be involved with you anymore. We've got to stop seeing each other. We can't be together."
"It's for some stupid noble reason isn't it?"
"It's been like...like something out of someone else's life these last few weeks with you. But I can't...we can't...I've got to do things alone now. Voldemort uses people his enemies are close to. He's already used you as bait once, and that was just because you were my best friend's sister. Think how much danger you'll be in if we keep this up. He'll know, he'll find out. He'll try and get me through you."
"What if I don't care?"
"I care. How do you think I'd feel if this was your funeral...and it was my fault...
 J.K. Rowling, Harry Potter and the Half-Blood Prince
tags: death, ginny-weasley, harry-potter, love, voldemort1276 likesLike
Terry Pratchett
Death: "THERE ARE BETTER THINGS IN THE WORLD THAN ALCOHOL, ALBERT."
Albert: "Oh, yes, sir. But alcohol sort of compensates for not getting them.
 Terry Pratchett
tags: alcohol, death, drinking, humor1271 likesLike
Marcus Aurelius
It is not death that a man should fear, but he should fear never beginning to live.
 Marcus Aurelius, Meditations
tags: death, fear, inspirational1270 likesLike
Jeaniene Frost
If I die, I will wait for you, do you understand? No matter how long. I will watch from beyond to make sure you live every year you have to its fullest, and then well have so much to talk about when I see you again (Bones)
 Jeaniene Frost
tags: death, eternity, love, romance, waiting1244 likesLike
Markus Zusak
Together, they would watch everything that was so carefully planned collapse, and they would smile at the beauty of destruction.
 Markus Zusak, The Book Thief
tags: death, destruction, failure1240 likesLike
Benjamin Franklin
Fear not death for the sooner we die, the longer we shall be immortal.
 Benjamin Franklin
tags: death1236 likesLike
She's not here," I tell him. Buttercup hisses again. "She's not here. You can hiss all you like. You won't find Prim." At her name, he perks up. Raises his flattened ears. Begins to meow hopefully. "Get out!" He dodges the pillow I throw at him. "Go away! There's nothing left for you here!" I start to shake, furious with him. "She's not coming back! She's never ever coming back here again!" I grab another pillow and get to my feet to improve my aim. Out of nowhere, the tears begin to pour down my cheeks. "She's dead, you stupid cat. She's dead.
 Suzanne Collins, Mockingjay
tags: bereavement, death, loss1200 likesLike
Arthur Golden
The heart dies a slow death, shedding each hope like leaves until one day there are none. No hopes. Nothing remains.
 Arthur Golden, Memoirs of a Geisha
tags: death, hope1196 likesLike
Haruki Murakami
No truth can cure the sorrow we feel from losing a loved one. No truth, no sincerity, no strength, no kindness can cure that sorrow. All we can do is see it through to the end and learn something from it, but what we learn will be no help in facing the next sorrow that comes to us without warning.
 Haruki Murakami, Norwegian Wood
tags: death, sorrow1152 likesLike
Terry Pratchett
He'd been wrong, there was a light at the end of the tunnel, and it was a flamethrower.
 Terry Pratchett, Mort
tags: death, humor1144 likesLike
 previous 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9  99 100 n

Death Quotes
Quotes tagged as "death" Showing 91-120 of 14,861
Roberto Bolao
Books are finite, sexual encounters are finite, but the desire to read and to fuck is infinite; it surpasses our own deaths, our fears, our hopes for peace.
 Roberto Bolano
tags: death, fear, hope, peace, reading, sex1279 likesLike
David Mitchell
People pontificate, "Suicide is selfishness." Career churchmen like Pater go a step further and call in a cowardly assault on the living. Oafs argue this specious line for varying reason: to evade fingers of blame, to impress one's audience with one's mental fiber, to vent anger, or just because one lacks the necessary suffering to sympathize. Cowardice is nothing to do with it - suicide takes considerable courage. Japanese have the right idea. No, what's selfish is to demand another to endure an intolerable existence, just to spare families, friends, and enemies a bit of soul-searching.
 David Mitchell, Cloud Atlas
tags: death, guilt, selfishness, suffering, suicide1178 likesLike
Madeline Miller
When he died, all things soft and beautiful and bright would be buried with him.
 Madeline Miller, The Song of Achilles
tags: death, death-of-a-loved-one, love1176 likesLike
Arthur Schopenhauer
Mostly it is loss which teaches us about the worth of things.
 Arthur Schopenhauer, Parerga and Paralipomena
tags: attachment, death, loss, worth1153 likesLike
Maya Angelou
When Great Trees Fall

When great trees fall,
rocks on distant hills shudder,
lions hunker down
in tall grasses,
and even elephants
lumber after safety.

When great trees fall
in forests,
small things recoil into silence,
their senses
eroded beyond fear.

When great souls die,
the air around us becomes
light, rare, sterile.
We breathe, briefly.
Our eyes, briefly,
see with
a hurtful clarity.
Our memory, suddenly sharpened,
examines,
gnaws on kind words
unsaid,
promised walks
never taken.

Great souls die and
our reality, bound to
them, takes leave of us.
Our souls,
dependent upon their
nurture,
now shrink, wizened.
Our minds, formed
and informed by their
radiance,
fall away.
We are not so much maddened
as reduced to the unutterable ignorance
of dark, cold
caves.

And when great souls die,
after a period peace blooms,
slowly and always
irregularly. Spaces fill
with a kind of
soothing electric vibration.
Our senses, restored, never
to be the same, whisper to us.
They existed. They existed.
We can be. Be and be
better. For they existed.
 Maya Angelou
tags: american-writers, death, i-shall-not-be-moved, life, maya-angelou, peace, poem, poems, poet, poetry, poets, soul, souls, trees, when-great-trees-fall, writers, writing1114 likesLike
Elizabeth Berg
There is love in holding and there is love in letting go.
 Elizabeth Berg, The Year of Pleasures
tags: death, love, separation1093 likesLike
Rachel Caine
I'm gonna kill him," Eve said, or at least that was what it sounded like filtered through the pillow.
Stake him right in the heart, shove garlic up his ass, and-and-"

And what?" (Michael)

When did you get home?" Claire demanded.

Apparently just in time to hear my funeral plans. I especially like the garlic up the ass. It's...different.
 Rachel Caine, Feast of Fools
tags: death, humor, vampires1080 likesLike
Dylan Thomas
Though lovers be lost, love shall not; And death shall have no dominion.
 Dylan Thomas
tags: death, lost-love, love, mourning1046 likesLike
Cassandra Clare
No one can say that death found in me a willing comrade, or that I went easily.
 Cassandra Clare, Clockwork Princess
tags: brb-crying, cassandra-clare, clockwork-princess, death, dying, i-can-t-even, mortality, omg-my-feels, the-infernal-devices1040 likesLike
Dylan Thomas
Do not go gentle into that good night,
Old age should burn and rage at close of day;
Rage, rage against the dying of the light.
Though wise men at their end know dark is right,
Because their words had forked no lightning they
Do not go gentle into that good night.

Good men, the last wave by, crying how bright
Their frail deeds might have danced in a green bay,
Rage, rage against the dying of the light.

Wild men who caught and sang the sun in flight,
And learn, too late, they grieved it on its way,
Do not go gentle into that good night.

Grave men, near death, who see with blinding sight
Blind eyes could blaze like meteors and be gay,
Rage, rage against the dying of the light.

And you, my father, there on the sad height,
Curse, bless me now with your fierce tears, I pray.
Do not go gentle into that good night.
Rage, rage against the dying of the light.
 Dylan Thomas, Do Not Go Gentle Into That Good Night
tags: death, dying, father, poems1028 likesLike
Nalo Hopkinson
The heaviness of loss in her heart hadn't eased, but there was room there for humour, too.
 Nalo Hopkinson, Brown Girl in the Ring
tags: death, death-and-humor, death-and-love, dying, loss1015 likesLike
Dean Koontz
Because God is never cruel, there is a reason for all things. We must know the pain of loss; because if we never knew it, we would have no compassion for others, and we would become monsters of self-regard, creatures of unalloyed self-interest. The terrible pain of loss teaches humility to our prideful kind, has the power to soften uncaring hearts, to make a better person of a good one.
 Dean Koontz, The Darkest Evening of the Year
tags: death, god, loss, purpose, understanding969 likesLike
H. Rider Haggard
Yea, all things live forever, though at times they sleep and are forgotten.
 H. Rider Haggard, She: A History of Adventure
tags: after-death, death, forget, forgetting, immortality, life, live-forever, mortality, sleep956 likesLike
Kahlil Gibran
For what is it to die but to stand naked in the wind and to melt into the sun? And when the earth shall claim your limbs, then shall you truly dance.
 Kahlil Gibran
tags: death956 likesLike
Killing is not so easy as the innocent believe.
 J.K. Rowling, Harry Potter and the Half-Blood Prince
tags: death, dumbledore, harry-potter, killing949 likesLike
John Green
You do not immortalize the lost by writing about them. Language buries, but does not resurrect.
 John Green, The Fault in Our Stars
tags: death, language, life, writing946 likesLike
The idea of being strong for someone else having never entered their heads, I find myself in the position of having to console them. Since I'm the person going in to be slaughtered, this is somewhat annoying.
 Suzanne Collins, Catching Fire
tags: death, gallows-humor, humor, pique938 likesLike
James Patterson
The funny thing about facing imminent death is that it really snaps everything else into perspective.
 James Patterson, The Angel Experiment
tags: death, understanding938 likesLike
I wish...I wish I were dead...
And what use would that be to anyone?
 J.K. Rowling, Harry Potter and the Deathly Hallows
tags: death, harry-potter, severus-snape, stress, wish935 likesLike
Sarah Ockler
Weeping is not the same thing as crying. It takes your whole body to weep, and when it's over, you feel like you don't have any bones left to hold you up.
 Sarah Ockler, Twenty Boy Summer
tags: crying, death, lost, love, tragedy, weeping934 likesLike
William S. Burroughs
Nobody owns life, but anyone who can pick up a frying pan owns death.
 William S. Burroughs
tags: death, murder934 likesLike
Edgar Allan Poe
The death of a beautiful woman is, unquestionably, the most poetical topic in the world.
 Edgar Allan Poe
tags: beauty, death, poetry, women925 likesLike
Lemony Snicket
It is useless for me to describe to you how terrible Violet, Klaus, and even Sunny felt in the time that followed. If you have ever lost someone very important to you, then you already know how it feels, and if you haven't, you cannot possibly imagine it.
 Lemony Snicket, The Bad Beginning
tags: death, grief, loss925 likesLike
Michael Ondaatje
We die containing a richness of lovers and tribes, tastes we have swallowed, bodies we have plunged into and swum up as if rivers of wisdom, characters we have climbed into as if trees, fears we have hidden in as if caves.

I wish for all this to be marked on by body when I am dead. I believe in such cartography - to be marked by nature, not just to label ourselves on a map like the names of rich men and women on buildings. We are communal histories, communal books. We are not owned or monogamous in our taste or experience.
 Michael Ondaatje, The English Patient
tags: character, death, experience, relationships916 likesLike
Would it hurt to die?
 J.K. Rowling, Harry Potter and the Deathly Hallows
tags: death910 likesLike
Chuck Palahniuk
Reality means you live until you die...the real truth is nobody wants reality.
 Chuck Palahniuk, Survivor
tags: death894 likesLike
Gloria Steinem
Men should think twice before making widowhood women's only path to power.
 Gloria Steinem
tags: death, feminism, men, murder, widowhood, women, womens-rights867 likesLike
Terry Pratchett
We who think we are about to die will laugh at anything.
 Terry Pratchett, Night Watch
tags: death, gallows-humor, humor, laughing844 likesLike
John Green
Because there is no glory in illness. There is no meaning to it. There is no honor in dying of.
 John Green, The Fault in Our Stars
tags: cancer, death, illness835 likesLike
Donna Tartt
That life - whatever else it is - is short. That fate is cruel but maybe not random. That Nature (meaning Death) always wins but that doesnt mean we have to bow and grovel to it. That maybe even if were not always so glad to be here, its our task to immerse ourselves anyway: wade straight through it, right through the cesspool, while keeping eyes and hearts open. And in the midst of our dying, as we rise from the organic and sink back ignominiously into the organic, it is a glory and a privilege to love what Death doesnt touch.
 Donna Tartt, The Goldfinch
tags: death, meaning817 likesLike

Death Quotes
Quotes tagged as "death" Showing 121-150 of 14,861
Jonathan Safran Foer
It's true, I am afraid of dying. I am afraid of the world moving forward without me, of my absence going unnoticed, or worse, being some natural force propelling life on. Is it selfish? Am I such a bad person for dreaming of a world that ends when I do? I don't mean the world ending with respect to me, but every set of eyes closing with mine.
 Jonathan Safran Foer, Everything Is Illuminated
tags: death, dying, fear845 likesLike
Markus Zusak
I want words at my funeral. But I guess that means you need life in your life.
 Markus Zusak, The Book Thief
tags: death, funeral, life839 likesLike
Sarah J. Maas
But death was her curse and her gift, and death had been her good friend these long, long years.
 Sarah J. Maas, Crown of Midnight
tags: death, heartbreak, reflective824 likesLike
Terry Pratchett
Do you not know that a man is not dead while his name is still spoken?
 Terry Pratchett, Going Postal
tags: death, immortality, remembrance818 likesLike
Alice Sebold
Nothing is ever certain.
 Alice Sebold, The Lovely Bones
tags: absolutes, cruel, death, lies, phrases, sad, truth812 likesLike
Charles Bukowski
I carry death in my left pocket. Sometimes I take it out and talk to it: "Hello, baby, how you doing? When you coming for me? I'll be ready.
 Charles Bukowski
tags: death806 likesLike
Rick Riordan
Delaying death is one of my favorite hobbies
 Rick Riordan, The Mark of Athena
tags: attacked, death, delaying, humor, leo, the-mark-of-athena805 likesLike
H.P. Lovecraft
That is not dead which can eternal lie,
And with strange aeons even death may die.
 Howard Phillips Lovecraft, The Nameless City
tags: death792 likesLike
James Baldwin
Life is tragic simply because the earth turns and the sun inexorably rises and sets, and one day, for each of us, the sun will go down for the last, last time. Perhaps the whole root of our trouble, the human trouble, is that we will sacrifice all the beauty of our lives, will imprison ourselves in totems, taboos, crosses, blood sacrifices, steeples, mosques, races, armies, flags, nations, in order to deny the fact of death, the only fact we have. It seems to me that one ought to rejoice in the fact of death--ought to decide, indeed, to earn one's death by confronting with passion the conundrum of life. One is responsible for life: It is the small beacon in that terrifying darkness from which we come and to which we shall return.
 James Baldwin, The Fire Next Time
tags: death, life, living, religion785 likesLike
John Donne
No man is an island, entire of itself; every man is a piece of the continent, a part of the main. If a clod be washed away by the sea, Europe is the less, as well as if a promontory were, as well as if a manor of thy friend's or of thine own were: any man's death diminishes me, because I am involved in mankind, and therefore never send to know for whom the bells tolls; it tolls for thee.
 John Donne, No man is an island  A selection from the prose
tags: community, death, isolation, mankind783 likesLike
Garth Stein
He died that day because his body had served its purpose. His soul had done what it came to do, learned what it came to learn, and then was free to leave.
 Garth Stein, The Art of Racing in the Rain
tags: death, life, philosophy781 likesLike
Jim Morrison
No one here gets out alive.
 Jim Morrison
tags: death, life, verse770 likesLike
John Steinbeck
It seems to me that if you or I must choose between two courses of thought or action, we should remember our dying and try so to live that our death brings no pleasure to the world.
 John Steinbeck,  
tags: death769 likesLike
Markus Zusak
I wanted to explain that I am constantly overestimating and underestimating the human race - that rarely do I even simply estimate it. I wanted to ask her how the same thing could be so ugly and so glorious, and its words and stories so damning and brilliant...I AM HAUNTED BY HUMANS.
 Markus Zusak, The Book Thief
tags: books, death, the-book-thief, words749 likesLike
Yann Martel
To lose a brother is to lose someone with whom you can share the experience of growing old, who is supposed to bring you a sister-in-law and nieces and nephews, creatures who people the tree of your life and give it new branches. To lose your father is to lose the one whose guidance and help you seek, who supports you like a tree trunk supports its branches. To lose your mother, well, that is like losing the sun above you. It is like losing--I'm sorry, I would rather not go on.
 Yann Martel, Life of Pi
tags: death, family, philosophy747 likesLike
Albert Einstein
From the standpoint of daily life, however, there is one thing we do know: that we are here for the sake of each other - above all for those upon whose smile and well-being our own happiness depends, and also for the countless unknown souls with whose fate we are connected by a bond of sympathy. Many times a day I realize how much my own outer and inner life is built upon the labors of my fellow men, both living and dead, and how earnestly I must exert myself in order to give in return as much as I have received.
 Albert Einstein
tags: death, inner-life, metaphysics, science733 likesLike
Neil Gaiman
Everybody going to be dead one day, just give them time.
 Neil Gaiman, Anansi Boys
tags: death, humor, mortality, patience726 likesLike
Albert Camus
It is the job of thinking people not to be on the side of the executioners.
 Albert Camus, Neither Victims Nor Executioners
tags: compassion, death, execution, intelligence, scholars, thinkers721 likesLike
Lili St. Crow
I was always holding onto people, and they were always leaving.
 Lili St. Crow, Jealousy
tags: death, holding-on, leaving, left, loneliness, strange-angels719 likesLike
Arthur Schopenhauer
They tell us that Suicide is the greatest piece of Cowardice... That Suicide is wrong; when it is quite obvious that there is nothing in this world to which every man has a more unassailable title than to his own life and person.
 Arthur Schopenhauer
tags: arthur-schopenhauer, death, right, schopenhauer, suicide, title695 likesLike
Albert Camus
What is called a reason for living is also an excellent reason for dying.
 Albert Camus, The Myth of Sisyphus and Other Essays
tags: absurd, death, dying, life, living693 likesLike
W.H. Auden
He was my North, my South, my East and West,
My working week and my Sunday rest,
My noon, my midnight, my talk, my song;
I thought that love would last forever: I was wrong.
 W. H. Auden, Collected Poems
tags: death, love, poetry693 likesLike
Jeffrey Eugenides
In the end, it wasn't death that surprised her but the stubbornness of life.
 Jeffrey Eugenides, The Virgin Suicides
tags: death, life693 likesLike
Sylvia Plath
Death must be so beautiful. To lie in the soft brown earth, with the grasses waving above ones head, and listen to silence. To have no yesterday, and no tomorrow. To forget time, to forgive life, to be at peace.
 Sylvia Plath, The Bell Jar
tags: death, the-bell-jar684 likesLike
Emily Bront
May she wake in torment!" he cried, with frightful vehemence, stamping his foot, and groaning in a sudden paroxysm of ungovernable passion. "Why, she's a liar to the end! Where is she? Not therenot in heavennot perishedwhere? Oh! you said you cared nothing for my sufferings! And I pray one prayerI repeat it till my tongue stiffensMay she wake in torment!" he cried, with frightful vehemence, stamping his foot, and groaning in a sudden paroxysm of ungovernable passion. "Why, she's a liar to the end! Where is she? Not therenot in heavennot perishedwhere? Oh! you said you cared nothing for my sufferings! And I pray one prayerI repeat it till my tongue stiffensCatherine Earnshaw, may you not rest as long as I am living; you said I killed youhaunt me, then! The murdered do haunt their murderers, I believe. I know that ghosts have wandered on earth. Be with me alwaystake any formdrive me mad! only do not leave me in this abyss, where I cannot find you! Oh, God! it is unutterable! I cannot live without my life! I cannot live without my soul!
 Emily Bront, Wuthering Heights
tags: betrayal, death, hate, love, malediction, obsession, thwarted684 likesLike
Shannon L. Alder
Carve your name on hearts, not tombstones. A legacy is etched into the minds of others and the stories they share about you.
 Shannon Alder
tags: achievements, charity, commencement-speech, death, death-and-dying, dying, epitaph, eulogy, funerals, goals, gravestone, hearts, kindness, legacy, life, life-lessons, life-missions, life-purpose, purpose, speeches, stories, story, tombstones, tribute670 likesLike
Winston S. Churchill
How dreadful are the curses which Mohammedanism lays on its votaries! Besides the fanatical frenzy, which is as dangerous in a man as hydrophobia in a dog, there is this fearful fatalistic apathy. The effects are apparent in many countries. Improvident habits, slovenly systems of agriculture, sluggish methods of commerce, and insecurity of property exist wherever the followers of the Prophet rule or live. A degraded sensualism deprives this life of its grace and refinement; the next of its dignity and sanctity. The fact that in Mohammedan law every woman must belong to some man as his absolute property  either as a child, a wife, or a concubine  must delay the final extinction of slavery until the faith of Islam has ceased to be a great power among men. Thousands become the brave and loyal soldiers of the faith: all know how to die but the influence of the religion paralyses the social development of those who follow it. No stronger retrograde force exists in the world. Far from being moribund, Mohammedanism is a militant and proselytizing faith. It has already spread throughout Central Africa, raising fearless warriors at every step; and were it not that Christianity is sheltered in the strong arms of science, the science against which it had vainly struggled, the civilisation of modern Europe might fall, as fell the civilisation of ancient Rome.
 Winston Churchill, The River War
tags: africa, agriculture, ancient-rome, apathy, brave, central-africa, civilization, commerce, concubine, curse, death, development, dignity, europe, faith-of-islam, fanatical, grace, hydrophobia, influence, insecurity, islam, militant, militant-faith, mohammed, mohammedan, mohammedanism, muslims, paralysis, power, property, proselytizing, religious-fanaticism, retrograde, rome, science, sharia-law, slavery, the-prophet665 likesLike
E.B. White
After all, what's a life, anyway? We're born, we live a little while, we die.
 E.B. White, Charlotte's Web
tags: birth, death, life663 likesLike
Richard Puz
Death leaves a heartache no one can heal, love leaves a memory no one can steal.
From an Irish headstone
 Richard Puz, The Carolinian
tags: death, death-and-love, death-of-a-loved-one, eternal-love, healing, healing-the-past, heartache-love, heartbreak, love-hurts, memorial, memories, memory659 likesLike
Gayle Forman
Adam is crying and somewhere inside of me I am crying, too, because I'm feeling things at last. I'm feeling not just the physical pain, but all that I have lost, and it is profound and catastrophic and will leave a crater in me that nothing will ever fill.
 Gayle Forman, If I Stay
tags: death, loss648 likesLike

Romance Quotes
Quotes tagged as "romance" Showing 1-30 of 16,689
Cassandra Clare
There is no pretending," Jace said with absolute clarity. "I love you, and I will love you until I die, and if there is life after that, I'll love you then.
 Cassandra Clare, City of Glass
tags: mortal-instruments, romance, teen-fantasy19966 likesLike
He's like a drug for you, Bella.
 Stephenie Meyer, Eclipse
tags: drug, romance, simile19589 likesLike
When someone loves you, the way they talk about you is different. You feel safe and comfortable.
 Jess C. Scott, The Intern
tags: desire, emotion, friendship, honesty, imagination, individuality, life, love, passion, reality, relationships, romance, truth, wisdom, wise-words18887 likesLike
Lisa Kleypas
I no longer believed in the idea of soul mates, or love at first sight. But I was beginning to believe that a very few times in your life, if you were lucky, you might meet someone who was exactly right for you. Not because he was perfect, or because you were, but because your combined flaws were arranged in a way that allowed two separate beings to hinge together.
 Lisa Kleypas, Blue-Eyed Devil
tags: love, relationships, romance12182 likesLike
Richelle Mead
You can't force love, I realized. It's there or it isn't. If it's not there, you've got to be able to admit it. If it is there, you've got to do whatever it takes to protect the ones you love.
 Richelle Mead, Frostbite
tags: fiction, romance9669 likesLike
Lady Gaga
Some women choose to follow men, and some women choose to follow their dreams. If you're wondering which way to go, remember that your career will never wake up and tell you that it doesn't love you anymore.
 Lady Gaga
tags: love, romance, work9242 likesLike
Nicholas Sparks
The best love is the kind that awakens the soul and makes us reach for more, that plants a fire in our hearts and brings peace to our minds. And that's what you've given me. That's what I'd hoped to give you forever
 Nicholas Sparks
tags: love, nicholas-sparks, romance, the-notebook9188 likesLike
Cassandra Clare
And I'm suppose to sit by while you date boys and fall in love with someone else, get married...?" His voice tightened. "And meanwhile, I'll die a little bit more every day, watching.
 Cassandra Clare, City of Glass
tags: mortal-instruments, romance, teen-fantasy8699 likesLike
Shana Abe
I heard what you said. Im not the silly romantic you think. I dont want the heavens or the shooting stars. I dont want gemstones or gold. I have those things already. I wanta steady hand. A kind soul. I want to fall asleep, and wake, knowing my heart is safe. I want to love, and be loved.
 Shana Abe
tags: love, romance8405 likesLike
Elizabeth Gilbert
I have a history of making decisions very quickly about men. I have always fallen in love fast and without measuring risks. I have a tendency not only to see the best in everyone, but to assume that everyone is emotionally capable of reaching his highest potential. I have fallen in love more times than I care to count with the highest potential of a man, rather than with the man himself, and I have hung on to the relationship for a long time (sometimes far too long) waiting for the man to ascend to his own greatness. Many times in romance I have been a victim of my own optimism.
 Elizabeth Gilbert, Eat, Pray, Love
tags: disappointment, love, romance7301 likesLike
Nicholas Sparks
They didnt agree on much. In fact, they didnt agree on anything. They fought all the time and challenged each other ever day. But despite their differences, they had one important thing in common. They were crazy about each other.
 Nicholas Sparks, The Notebook
tags: dear-john, love, nicholas-sparks, romance, the-notebook6877 likesLike
Oscar Wilde
The very essence of romance is uncertainty.
 Oscar Wilde, The Importance of Being Earnest and Other Plays
tags: love, romance6619 likesLike
Greg Behrendt
If hes not calling you, its because you are not on his mind. If he creates expectations for you, and then doesnt follow through on little things, he will do same for big things. Be aware of this and realize that hes okay with disappointing you. Dont be with someone who doesnt do what they say theyre going to do. If hes choosing not to make a simple effort that would put you at ease and bring harmony to a recurring fight, then he doesnt respect your feelings and needs. Busy is another word for asshole. Asshole is another word for the guy youre dating. You deserve a fcking phone call.
 Greg Behrendt
tags: busy, call, dating, dating-advice, faith, greg-behrendt, guys, he-s-not-just-into-you, love, marriage, romance, true5840 likesLike
William Shakespeare
If music be the food of love, play on,
Give me excess of it; that surfeiting,
The appetite may sicken, and so die.
 William Shakespeare, Twelfth Night
tags: music, romance, unrequited-love5720 likesLike
Jane Austen
I cannot fix on the hour, or the spot, or the look or the words, which laid the foundation. It is too long ago. I was in the middle before I knew that I had begun.
 Jane Austen, Pride and Prejudice
tags: love, romance5685 likesLike
Kahlil Gibran
If you love somebody, let them go, for if they return, they were always yours. If they don't, they never were.
 Kahlil Gibran
tags: life, love, romance5640 likesLike
I can feel Peeta press his forehead into my temple and he asks, 'So now that you've got me, what are you going to do with me?' I turn into him. 'Put you somewhere you can't get hurt.
 Suzanne Collins, The Hunger Games
tags: love, romance5360 likesLike
Pedro Caldern de la Barca
When love is not madness it is not love.
 Pedro Calderon de la Barca
tags: love, romance5086 likesLike
Richelle Mead
Only a true best friend can protect you from your immortal enemies.
 Richelle Mead, Vampire Academy
tags: friendship, humor, romance4975 likesLike
Nicholas Sparks
True love is rare, and it's the only thing that gives life real meaning.
 Nicholas Sparks, Message in a Bottle
tags: love, romance4894 likesLike
Santosh Kalwar
I was smiling yesterday,I am smiling today and I will smile tomorrow.Simply because life is too short to cry for anything.
 Santosh Kalwar, Quote Me Everyday
tags: cry, inspirational, joke, love, romance, smile4668 likesLike
There was a clatter as the basilisk fangs cascaded out of Hermione's arms. Running at Ron, she flung them around his neck and kissed him full on the mouth. Ron threw away the fangs and broomstick he was holding and responded with such enthusiasm that he lifted Hermione off her feet.
"Is this the moment?" Harry asked weakly, and when nothing happened except that Ron and Hermione gripped each other still more firmly and swayed on the spot, he raised his voice. "OI! There's a war going on here!"
Ron and Hermione broke apart, their arms still around each other.
"I know, mate," said Ron, who looked as though he had recently been hit on the back of the head with a Bludger, "so it's now or never, isn't it?"
"Never mind that, what about the Horcrux?" Harry shouted. "D'you think you could just --- just hold it in, until we've got the diadem?"
"Yeah --- right --- sorry ---" said Ron, and he and Hermione set about gathering up fangs, both pink in the face.
 J.K. Rowling, Harry Potter and the Deathly Hallows
tags: love, romance, war4353 likesLike
Charles Dickens
Never close your lips to those whom you have already opened your heart.
 Charles Dickens
tags: kissing, love, romance4173 likesLike
E.M. Forster
It isn't possible to love and part. You will wish that it was. You can transmute love, ignore it, muddle it, but you can never pull it out of you. I know by experience that the poets are right: love is eternal.
 E.M. Forster, A Room with a View
tags: love, poets, romance4172 likesLike
Becca Fitzpatrick
Say 'provoking' again. Your mouth looks provocative when you do.
 Becca Fitzpatrick, Hush, Hush
tags: fallen-anger, humor, nephlim, romance3978 likesLike
You here to finish me off, Sweetheart?
 Suzanne Collins, The Hunger Games
tags: humor, hunger-games, katniss, mellark, peeta, romance3866 likesLike
Albert Camus
You know what charm is: a way of getting the answer yes without having asked any clear question.
 Albert Camus, The Fall
tags: romance3816 likesLike
Nicholas Sparks
Every great love starts with a great story...
 Nicholas Sparks, The Notebook
tags: romance, storytelling3758 likesLike
Jane Austen
I can listen no longer in silence. I must speak to you by such means as are within my reach. You pierce my soul. I am half agony, half hope. Tell me not that I am too late, that such precious feelings are gone for ever. I offer myself to you again with a heart even more your own than when you almost broke it, eight years and a half ago. Dare not say that man forgets sooner than woman, that his love has an earlier death. I have loved none but you. Unjust I may have been, weak and resentful I have been, but never inconstant. You alone have brought me to Bath. For you alone, I think and plan. Have you not seen this? Can you fail to have understood my wishes? I had not waited even these ten days, could I have read your feelings, as I think you must have penetrated mine. I can hardly write. I am every instant hearing something which overpowers me. You sink your voice, but I can distinguish the tones of that voice when they would be lost on others. Too good, too excellent creature! You do us justice, indeed. You do believe that there is true attachment and constancy among men. Believe it to be most fervent, most undeviating, in F. W.

I must go, uncertain of my fate; but I shall return hither, or follow your party, as soon as possible. A word, a look, will be enough to decide whether I enter your father's house this evening or never.
 Jane Austen, Persuasion
tags: romance3711 likesLike
Diana Gabaldon
I stood still, vision blurring, and in that moment, I heard my heart break. It was a small, clean sound, like the snapping of a flower's stem.
 Diana Gabaldon, Dragonfly in Amber
tags: claire-fraser, historical-fiction, romance, scotland, time-travel3606 likesLikeRomance Quotes
Quotes tagged as "romance" Showing 31-60 of 16,689
J.R.R. Tolkien
And he took her in his arms and kissed her under the sunlit sky, and he cared not that they stood high upon the walls in the sight of many.
 J.R.R. Tolkien
tags: gondor, romance3472 likesLike
Sarah Dessen
I knew, in the silence that followed, that anything could happen here. It might be too late: again, I might have missed my chance. But I would at least know I tried, that I took my heart and extended my hand, whatever the outcome.
"Okay," he said. He took a breath. "What would you do, if you could do anything?"
I took a step toward him, closing the space between us. "This," I said. And then I kissed him.
 Sarah Dessen, The Truth About Forever
tags: romance3421 likesLike
F. Scott Fitzgerald
I'm not sentimental--I'm as romantic as you are. The idea, you know,
is that the sentimental person thinks things will last--the romantic
person has a desperate confidence that they won't.
 F. Scott Fitzgerald, This Side of Paradise
tags: love, romance, romantic, sentimentality3311 likesLike
Cassandra Clare
You could have fooled me. Everytime I called you, Luke said you were sick. I figured you were avoiding me. Again."
"I wasn't. I did want to talk to you. I've been thinking about you all the time."
"I've been thinking about you, too."
"I really was sick. I swear. I almost died back there on the ship, you know."
"I know. Everytime you almost die, I almost die myself.
 Cassandra Clare, City of Ashes
tags: die, love, romance3143 likesLike
Jude Deveraux
My soul will find yours.
 Jude Deveraux, A Knight in Shining Armor
tags: romance3082 likesLike
Peeta, how come I never know when you're having a nightmare? I say.

I don't know. I don't think I cry out or thrash around or anything. I just come to, paralyzed with terror, he says.

You should wake me, I say, thinking about how I can interrupt his sleep two or three times on a bad night. About how long it can take to calm me down.

It's not necessary. My nightmares are usually about losing you, he says. I'm okay once I realize you're here.
 Suzanne Collins, Catching Fire
tags: catching-fire, katniss-and-peeta, katniss-everdeen, love, peeta-mellark, romance, the-hunger-games2964 likesLike
Julio Cortzar
Come sleep with me: We won't make Love, Love will make us.
 Julio Cortzar
tags: love, poem, relationships, romance2917 likesLike
E.L. James
Sometimes I wonder if there's something wrong with me. Perhaps I've spent too long in the company of my literary romantic heroes, and consequently my ideals and expectations are far too high.
 E.L. James, Fifty Shades of Grey
tags: romance2719 likesLike
Jane Austen
The Very first moment I beheld him, my heart was irrevocably gone.
 Jane Austen, Love and Friendship
tags: romance2714 likesLike
Simone Elkeles
Youre dangerous, he says.
Why?
Because you make me believe in the impossible
 Simone Elkeles, Rules of Attraction
tags: romance2711 likesLike
Fannie Flagg
I wonder how many people don't get the one they want, but end up with the one they're supposed to be with.
 Fannie Flagg, Fried Green Tomatoes at the Whistle Stop Cafe
tags: couples, deep, dissapointment, fate, heart, inspirational, love, people, romance2660 likesLike
Ive been fighting to be who I am all my life. Whats the point of being who I am, if I cant have the person who was worth all the fighting for?
 Stephanie Lennox, I Don't Remember You
tags: fighting, funny, humour, husband, inspirational, love, lover, relationships, romance, spiritual, sweet, wife2595 likesLike
Oscar Wilde
When one is in love, one always begins by deceiving one's self, and one always ends by deceiving others. That is what the world calls a romance.
 Oscar Wilde, The Picture of Dorian Gray
tags: romance2544 likesLike
Leigh Bardugo
The heart is an arrow. It demands aim to land true.
 Leigh Bardugo, Six of Crows
tags: arrow, heart, inej, romance, suli-poverb2520 likesLike
William Shakespeare
My only love sprung from my only hate!
Too early seen unknown, and known too late!
Prodigious birth of love it is to me,
That I must love a loathed enemy.
 William Shakespeare
tags: romance, romeo-and-juliet2377 likesLike
Elinor Glyn
Romance is the glamour which turns the dust of everyday life into a golden haze. 
 Elinor Glyn
tags: inspiration, love, romance2231 likesLike
Greg Behrendt
I'm about to make a wild, extreme and severe relationship rule: the word busy is a load of crap and is most often used by assholes. The word "busy" is the relationship Weapon of Mass Destruction. It seems like a good excuse, but in fact in every silo you uncover, all you're going to find is a man who didn't care enough to call. Remember men are never to busy to get what they want.
 Greg Behrendt
tags: behrendt, call, dating, faith, greg, he-s-not-just-into-you, love, marriage, romance, true, true-love, truth2220 likesLike
Charlotte Bront
I am not an angel,' I asserted; 'and I will not be one till I die: I will be myself. Mr. Rochester, you must neither expect nor exact anything celestial of me - for you will not get it, any more than I shall get it of you: which I do not at all anticipate.
 Charlotte Bront, Jane Eyre
tags: character, empowerment, flaws, freedom, gender, ideal-woman, identity, image, independence, integrity, love, men, realism, romance, self-awareness, self-determination, women2201 likesLike
Sometimes when I'm alone, I take the pearl from where it lives in my pocket and try to remember the boy with the bread, the strong arms that warded off nightmares on the train, the kisses in the arena.
 Suzanne Collins, Mockingjay
tags: katniss, love, mockingjay, peeta, romance2152 likesLike
Chase Brooks
When someone cries so hard that it hurts their throat, it is out of frustration or knowing that no matter what you can do or attempt to do can change the situation. When you feel like you need to cry, when you want to just get it out, relieve some of the pressure from the inside - that is true pain. Because no matter how hard you try or how bad you want to, you can't. That pain just stays in place. Then, if you are lucky, one small tear may escape from those eyes that water constantly. That one tear, that tiny, salty, droplet of moisture is a means of escape. Although it's just a small tear, it is the heaviest thing in the world. And it doesn't do a damn thing to fix anything.
 Chase Brooks, Hello, My Love 2: First Love Deserves a Second Chance
tags: crying, fiction, pain, romance2027 likesLike
William Shakespeare
thus with a kiss I die
 William Shakespeare, Romeo and Juliet
tags: history, romance2009 likesLike
E.A. Bucchianeri
So its true, when all is said and done, grief is the price we pay for love.
 E.A. Bucchianeri, Brushstrokes of a Gadfly,
tags: grief, grief-inspirational, heartbreak, life, life-lessons, love, love-hurts, love-story, price-of-love, prices, romance, sad, sad-but-true, sadness, true-love1916 likesLike
Richelle Mead
Sometimes you wake up from a dream. Sometimes you wake up in a dream. And sometimes, every once in a while, you wake up in someone else's dream. 
 Richelle Mead, Succubus Blues
tags: fiction, georgina, romance, succubus, vampire1911 likesLike
Nicholas Sparks
In our time together, you claimed a special place in my heart, one I'll carry with me forever and that no one can ever replace.
 Nicholas Sparks, Dear John
tags: romance1892 likesLike
Jenny Han
Moments, when lost, can't be found again. They're just gone.
 Jenny Han, The Summer I Turned Pretty
tags: bellys, love, missed-chances, romance1789 likesLike
Nicholas Sparks
Romance is thinking about your significant other, when you are supposed to be thinking about something else.
 nicholas sparks
tags: love, nicholas-sparks, romance1770 likesLike
Nicholas Sparks
She wanted something else, something different, something more. Passion and romance, perhaps, or maybe quiet conversations in candlelit rooms, or perhaps something as simple as not being second.
 Nicholas Sparks, The Notebook
tags: love, passion, romance1758 likesLike
Rachel Cohn
It's bullshit to think of friendship and romance as being different. They're not. They're just variations of the same love. Variations of the same desire to be close.
 Rachel Cohn, Naomi and Ely's No Kiss List
tags: friendship, love, romance1729 likesLike
Jamie McGuire
I belong to my beloved, and my beloved is mine.
 Jamie McGuire, Beautiful Disaster
tags: love, romance1719 likesLike
Randy Pausch
When it comes to men who are romantically interested in you, its really simple. Just ignore everything they say and only pay attention to what they do.
 Randy Pausch, The Last Lecture
tags: romance1717 likesLike

Romance Quotes
Quotes tagged as "romance" Showing 61-90 of 16,689
Gabriel Garca Mrquez
He dug so deeply into her sentiments that in search of interest he found love, because by trying to make her love him he ended up falling in love with her. Petra Cotes, for her part, loved him more and more as she felt his love increasing, and that was how in the ripeness of autumn she began to believe once more in the youthful superstition that poverty was the servitude of love. Both looked back then on the wild revelry, the gaudy wealth, and the unbridled fornication as an annoyance and they lamented that it had cost them so much of their lives to find the paradise of shared solitude. Madly in love after so many years of sterile complicity, they enjoyed the miracle of living each other as much at the table as in bed, and they grew to be so happy that even when they were two worn-out people they kept on blooming like little children and playing together like dogs.
 Gabriel Garca Mrquez, One Hundred Years of Solitude
tags: companionship, love, romance1630 likesLike
Meg Cabot
The fact is, I love him. He's the boy I want and one day he'll be MINE.
 Meg Cabot, Princess in Training
tags: romance1613 likesLike
Tessa Dare
Oh no. Don't smile. You'll kill me. I stop breathing when you smile.
 Tessa Dare, A Lady of Persuasion
tags: breathing, desire, humor, love, romance, smile, tease1576 likesLike
Those sweet lips. My, oh my, I could kiss those lips all night long.

Good things come to those who wait.
 Jess C. Scott, The Intern
tags: desire, funny, honesty, humor, humour, love, lust, passion, relationships, romance, sex, truth, wisdom, young, young-adult, young-adults, youth1476 likesLike
Mario Vargas Llosa
One can't fight with oneself, for this battle has only one loser.
 Mario Vargas Llosa, Aunt Julia and the Scriptwriter
tags: romance1401 likesLike
Diana Gabaldon
Ye are Blood of my Blood, and Bone of my Bone,
I give ye my Body, that we Two might be One.
I give ye my Spirit, 'til our Life shall be Done.
 Diana Gabaldon, Outlander
tags: love, marriage, romance1382 likesLike
L.M. Montgomery
Perhaps, after all, romance did not come into ones life with pomp and blare, like a gay knight riding down; perhaps it crept to ones side like an old friend through quiet ways; perhaps it revealed itself in seeming prose, until some sudden shaft of illumination flung athwart its pages betrayed the rhythm and the music, perhaps . . . perhaps . . . love unfolded naturally out of a beautiful friendship, as a golden-hearted rose slipping from its green sheath.
 L.M. Montgomery
tags: love, romance1380 likesLike
Kathleen Tessaro
If you can capture a woman's imagination, then you will have her. But imagination is a strange creature. It needs time and distance to function properly.
 Kathleen Tessaro
tags: love, romance1380 likesLike
Charlaine Harris
You are speaking of my future lover. Be more respectful.
 Charlaine Harris, Club Dead
tags: eric-northman, humor, romance, sookie-stackhouse, true-blood1353 likesLike
Nicholas Sparks
You really love her don't you," she said.
With all my heart."
She looked as sad as I'd ever seen her.
What's your heart telling you to do?"
I don't know."
Maybe", she said gently,"You're trying to hard to hear it.
 Nicholas Sparks
tags: love, romance1312 likesLike
William Shakespeare
For never was a story of more woe than this of Juliet and her Romeo.
 William Shakespeare, Romeo and Juliet
tags: romance, teen-suicide, tragedy1256 likesLike
He sighed. "The clouds I can handle. But I can't fight with an eclipse.
 Stephenie Meyer, Eclipse
tags: jacob-black, romance1249 likesLike
I honestly have no idea how to live without you.
 Stephenie Meyer, New Moon
tags: romance1244 likesLike
Laini Taylor
Love is a luxury."
"No. Love is an element."
An element. Like air to breathe, earth to stand on.
 Laini Taylor, Daughter of Smoke & Bone
tags: akiva, karou, love, romance1244 likesLike
Jeaniene Frost
If I die, I will wait for you, do you understand? No matter how long. I will watch from beyond to make sure you live every year you have to its fullest, and then well have so much to talk about when I see you again (Bones)
 Jeaniene Frost
tags: death, eternity, love, romance, waiting1244 likesLike
It is an absolute human certainty that no one can know his own beauty or perceive a sense of his own worth until it has been reflected back to him in the mirror of another loving, caring human being.
 John Joseph Powell, The Secret of Staying in Love
tags: affection, alone, beauty, camaraderie, caring, caring-for-others, closeness, companionship, compassion, connectedness, connection, disconnection, empathy, estrangement, fellowship, friendship, friendship-quotes, hug, hugs, intimacy, isolation, kindness, kindred-spirits, loneliness, love, love-at-first-sight, love-quotes, lovers, loving, loving-someone, mirror, mutuality, partnership, reciprocal, reciprocity, reflected-in-you, relationship, relationship-quotes, relationships, romance, self-belief, self-esteem, self-hatred, self-realization, self-worth, self-worthiness, soul-mate, soulmates, togetherness, touch, twin-flames1230 likesLike
Nora Roberts
Damn me to hell or take me to heaven, but for Gods sake, do it now....
 Nora Roberts, The Stanislaski Brothers: Mikhail and Alex
tags: romance1222 likesLike
E.L. James
You wanted hearts and flowers, he murmurs.
I blink at him, not quite believing what Im seeing.
You have my heart. And he waves toward the room.
And here are the flowers, I whisper, completing his sentence. Christian, its lovely.
 E.L. James, Fifty Shades Darker
tags: romance1200 likesLike
Diana Gabaldon
Oh, aye, Sassenach. I am your master . . . and you're mine. Seems I canna possess your soul without losing my own.
 Diana Gabaldon, Outlander
tags: romance1160 likesLike
Jane Austen
We all know him to be a proud, unpleasant sort of man; but this would be nothing if you really liked him.
 Jane Austen, Pride and Prejudice
tags: affection, romance1133 likesLike
E.L. James
Don't get your panties in such a twist... and give me back mine.
 E.L. James, Fifty Shades of Grey
tags: erotica, fifty-shades, romance1132 likesLike
Greg Behrendt
Here's something else to think about: calling when you say you're going to is the very first brick in the house you are building of love and trust. If he can't lay this one stupid brick down, you ain't never gonna have a house baby, and it's cold outside.
 Greg Behrendt, He's Just Not That Into You: The No-Excuses Truth to Understanding Guys
tags: behrendt, dating, greg, he-s-not-just-into-you, love, marriage, romance, truth1127 likesLike
Julia Quinn
You always get more respect when you don't have a happy ending.
 Julia Quinn
tags: romance, writing1117 likesLike
E.L. James
Does this mean youre going to make love to me tonight, Christian? Holy shit. Did I just say that? His mouth drops open slightly, but he recovers quickly.
No, Anastasia it doesnt. Firstly, I dont make love. I fuck hard. Secondly, theres a lot more paperwork to do, and thirdly, you dont yet know what youre in for. You could still run for the hills. Come, I want to show you my playroom.
My mouth drops open. Fuck hard! Holy shit, that sounds so hot. But why are we looking at a playroom? I am mystified.
You want to play on your Xbox? I ask. He laughs, loudly.
No, Anastasia, no Xbox, no Playstation. Come. Producing a key from his pocket, he unlocks yet another door and takes a deep breath.
You can leave anytime. The helicopter is on stand-by to take you whenever you want to go, you can stay the night and go home in the morning. Its fine whatever you decide.
Just open the damn door, Christian.
He opens the door and stands back to let me in. I gaze at him once more. I so want to know whats in here. Taking a deep breath I walk in.
And it feels like Ive time-traveled back to the sixteenth century and the Spanish Inquisition.
Holy fuck.
 E.L. James, Fifty Shades of Grey
tags: bdsm, romance1106 likesLike
Oprah Winfrey
If a man wants you, nothing can keep him away. If he doesn't want you, nothing can make him stay.
 Oprah Winfrey
tags: romance1101 likesLike
Amy Sedaris
Don't leave a piece of jewelry at his house so you can go back and get it later; he may be with his real girlfriend.
 Amy Sedaris, I Like You: Hospitality Under the Influence
tags: advice, affairs, dating, jewelry, life, love, men, relationships, romance, women1097 likesLike
Colleen Houck
Falling for him would be like cliff diving. It would be either the most exhilarating thing that ever happened to me or the stupidest mistake Id ever make.
 Colleen Houck
tags: love, love-struck, romance1086 likesLike
Charlie Huston
One day, when I am a braver man, I will tell her these things, and then I will look her in the eye tell her I love her and ask her to be only mine. But until that day, we're just friends.
 Charlie Huston, Already Dead
tags: love, romance1080 likesLike
Janet Evanovich
Romance novels are birthday cake and life is often peanut butter and jelly. I think everyone should have lots of delicious romance novels lying around for those times when the peanut butter of life gets stuck to the roof of your mouth.
 Janet Evanovich
tags: birthday, cake, life, novels, romance1079 likesLike
Charlotte Bront
It is a long way to Ireland, Janet, and I am sorry to send my little friend on such weary travels: but if I can't do better, how is it to be helped? Are you anything akin to me, do you think, Jane?"

I could risk no sort of answer by this time: my heart was still.

"Because, he said, "I sometimes have a queer feeling with regard to you - especially when you are near me, as now: it is as if I had a string somewhere under my left ribs, tightly and inextricably knotted to a similar string situated in the corresponding quarter of your little frame. And if that boisterous channel, and two hundred miles or so of land some broad between us, I am afraid that cord of communion will be snapt; and then I've a nervous notion I should take to bleeding inwardly. As for you, - you'd forget me.
 Charlotte Bront, Jane Eyre
tags: love, romance1053 likesLike

Romance Quotes
Quotes tagged as "romance" Showing 91-120 of 16,689
Greg Behrendt
Lets start with this statistic: You are delicious. Be brave, my sweet. I know you can get lonely. I know you can crave companionship and sex and love so badly that it physically hurts. But I truly believe that the only way you can find out that theres something better out there is to first believe theres something better out there. What other choice is there?
 Greg Behrendt, He's Just Not That Into You
tags: call, dating, dating-advice, guys, love, marriage, romance, truth1058 likesLike
Nicole Krauss
Maybe the first time you saw her you were ten. She was standing in the sun scratching her legs. Or tracing letters in the dirt with a stick. Her hair was being pulled. Or she was pulling someone's hair. And a part of you was drawn to her, and a part of you resisted--wanting to ride off on your bicycle, kick a stone, remain uncomplicated. In the same breath you felt the strength of a man, and a self-pity that made you feel small and hurt. Part of you thought: Please don't look at me. If you don't, I can still turn away. And part of you thought: Look at me.
 Nicole Krauss, The History of Love
tags: love, romance1051 likesLike
Simone Elkeles
We kiss all the time." I clear my throat, then add, "We just...do it in private."
"A smug expression crosses his face. "I don't buy it for a second, 'cause if you were my girlfriend and a stud like me was livin' in your house, I'd kiss you in front of the guy every chance I got as a reminder."
"A reminder of w-w-what?"
"That you were mine.
 Simone Elkeles, Rules of Attraction
tags: boyfriend, couples, kiss, love, relationships, romance1029 likesLike
Nora Ephron
I love that you get cold when it's 71 degrees out. I love that it takes you an hour and a half to order a sandwich. I love that you get a little crinkle above your nose when you're looking at me like I'm nuts. I love that after I spend the day with you, I can still smell your perfume on my clothes. And I love that you are the last person I want to talk to before I go to sleep at night. And it's not because I'm lonely, and it's not because it's New Year's Eve. I came here tonight because when you realize you want to spend the rest of your life with somebody, you want the rest of your life to start as soon as possible.
 Nora Ephron, When Harry Met Sally
tags: crazy, declarations-of-love, foibles, future, harry-burns, in-love, life, love, marriage-proposal, new-year-s-eve, romance, sally-albright, simple-life, simple-pleasures, true-love, when-harry-met-sally1013 likesLike
Nicholas Sparks
Yes, I decided, a man can truly change. The events of the past year have taught me much about myself, and a few universal truths. I learned, for instance, that while wounds can be inflicted easily upon those we love, it's often much more difficult to heal them. Yet the process of healing those wounds provided the richest experience of my life, leading me to believe that while I've often overestimated what I could accomplish in a day, I had underestimated what I could do in a year. But most of all, I learned that it's possible for two people to fall in love all over again, even when there's been a lifetime of disappointment between them.
 Nicholas Sparks, The Wedding
tags: hope, love, personal-growth, romance995 likesLike
J.D. Robb
No. No, I don't believe you'd betray me with her. I don't believe you'd cheat on me. But I'm afraid, and I'm sick in my heart that you might look at her, then at me. And regret.
 J.D. Robb, Innocent in Death
tags: fiction, mystery, romance986 likesLike
Drew Barrymore
Kissing - and I mean like, yummy, smacking kissing - is the most delicious, most beautiful and passionate thing that two people can do, bar none. Better than sex, hands down.
 Drew Barrymore
tags: courtship, kissing, love, romance979 likesLike
Ally Condie
Isn't it funny how the memories you cherish before a breakup can become your worst enemies afterwards? The thoughts you loved to think about, the memories you wanted to hold up to the light and view from every angle--it suddenly seems a lot safer to lock them in a box, far from the light of day and throw away the key. It's not an act of bitterness. It's an act if self-preservation. It's not always a bad idea to stay behind the window and look out at life instead, is it?
 Allyson Braithwaite Condie, First Day
tags: allyson-braithwaite-condie, box, breakup, church, day, first, humor, lockup, love, memories, novel, pain, religion, romance971 likesLike
Laurell K. Hamilton
Only love of a good woman will make a man question every choice, every action. Only love makes a warrior hesitate for fear that his lady will find him cruel. Only love makes a man both the best he will ever be, and the weakest. Sometimes all in the same moment. -Wicked 
 Laurell K. Hamilton
tags: laurell-k-hamilton, love, romance, the-harlequin, true-love, wicked919 likesLike
John Green
Nerd girls are the worlds most underutilized romantic resource. And guys, do not tell me that nerd girls are not hot because that shows a Paris Hilton-esque failure to understand hotness.
 John Green
tags: nerdfighters, nerdiness, romance909 likesLike
Richelle Mead
If I let myself love you, I won't throw myself in front of her. I'll throw myself in front of you.
 Richelle Mead, Vampire Academy
tags: romance, sad, sweet904 likesLike
Rick Riordan
And, Annabeth continued, it reminds me how long weve known each other. We were twelve, Percy. Can you believe that?
No, he admitted. Soyou knew you liked me from that moment?
She smirked. I hated you at first. You annoyed me. Then I tolerated you for a few years. Then
Okay, fine.
She leaned in and kissed: him a good, proper kiss without anyone watchingno Romans anywhere, no screaming satyr chaperones.
She pulled away. I missed you, Percy.
Percy wanted to tell her the same thing, but it seemed too small a comment. While he had been on the Roman side, hed kept himself alive almost solely by thinking of Annabeth. I missed you didnt really cover that.
 Rick Riordan, The Mark of Athena
tags: absence, annabeth-chase, heroes-of-olympus, missing-you, percy-jackson, percy-jackson-and-the-olympians, romance, separation, the-mark-of-athena894 likesLike
Nicholas Sparks
I'd love to, she finally said,"on one condition."
I steadied myself, hoping it wasn't something too awful.
"Yes?"
"You have to promise that you won't fall in love with me."
I knew she was kidding me by the way she laughed, and I couldn't help but breathe a sigh of relief.
Sometimes, I had to admit, Jamie had a pretty good sense of humor.
I smiled and gave her my word.
 Nicholas Sparks
tags: love, romance893 likesLike
Jeaniene Frost
Don't kiss me like a woman if you're going to treat me like a child.
 Jeaniene Frost, Halfway to the Grave
tags: kissing, romance884 likesLike
There is a time for everything, and a season for every activity under heaven:
a time to be born and a time to die,
a time to plant and a time to uproot,
a time to kill and a time to heal,
a time to tear down and a time to build,
a time to weep and a time to laugh,
a time to mourn and a time to dance,
a time to scatter stones and a time to gather them,
a time to embrace and a time to refrain,
a time to search and a time to give up,
a time to keep and a time to throw away,
a time to tear and a time to mend,
a time to be silent and a time to speak,
a time to love and a time to hate,
a time for war and a time for peace.

(Ecclesiastes 3:1-8, NIV)
 Anonymous, Study Bible: NIV
tags: ecclesiastes, life, love, romance, scripture, youth878 likesLike
Groucho Marx
Some people claim that marriage interferes with romance. There's no doubt about it. Anytime you have a romance, your wife is bound to interfere.
 Groucho Marx
tags: marriage, romance, sex878 likesLike
Jennifer L. Armentrout
Ever since Ive met you, Ive wanted to break every rule. Aiden turned away, the muscles in his neck tensing. He sighed. Youll become the centre of someones world one day. And hell be the luckiest son of a bitch on this earth.
 Jennifer L. Armentrout, Pure
tags: romance874 likesLike
Stephanie Laurens
My heart only ever had one thought, one want. One need. Despite all, in spite of all...All my heart has ever wanted is you.
 Stephanie Laurens, The Edge of Desire
tags: adoration, dream, longing, love, need, romance, yearning870 likesLike
I felt like an animal, and animals dont know sin, do they?
 Jess C. Scott, Wicked Lovely
tags: body, cool, desire, erotic, erotica, funny, girl, honesty, humor, humour, incest, love, lust, passion, relationships, romance, sex, sexuality, sister, taboo, truth, wisdom867 likesLike
Rainbow Rowell
What you are is a fucking tragedy, Simon Snow. You literally couldn't be a bigger mess."
He tries to kiss me, but I pull back- "And you like that?"
"I love it." He says
"Why?"
"Because we match.
 Rainbow Rowell, Carry On
tags: adorable, love, mess, romance856 likesLike
Do you want to know why men name their penis? So the most important decisions in their life aren't made by a stranger.
 Linda Howard, After the Night
tags: romance, sobriquet852 likesLike
Rainbow Rowell
Every woman wants a man who'll fall in love with her soul as well as her body.
 Rainbow Rowell, Attachments
tags: love, romance, women838 likesLike
Augustine of Hippo
To fall in love with God is the greatest romance; to seek him the greatest adventure; to find him, the greatest human achievement.
 St. Augustine of Hippo
tags: adventure, confessions, love, romance816 likesLike
L.J. Smith
Why do people always assume that volume will succeed when logic wont? - Damon
 L.J. Smith, Nightfall
tags: argument, damon, elena, fiction, romance, vampire793 likesLike
What about when someone doesn't need a shoulder? What if they need the arms?
 Stephen Chbosky, The Perks of Being a Wallflower
tags: love, romance791 likesLike
Richelle Mead
Well, that depends, I suppose. I heard someone once say that men dance the same way they have sex. So, if you want everyone here to think you're the kind of guy who just sits around and"
He stood up. "Let's dance.
 Richelle Mead, Succubus Blues
tags: dancing, fiction, georgina, persuasion, romance, succubus, vampire781 likesLike
Colleen Houck
You dont take away my choices. You are my choice.
 Colleen Houck
tags: love, romance777 likesLike
Greg Behrendt
You picked a lemon, throw it away lemonade is overrated. Freaks should remain at the circus, not in your apartment. You already have one asshole. You dont need another. Make a space in your life for the glorious things you deserve. Have faith.
 Greg Behrendt , He's Just Not That Into You: The No-Excuses Truth to Understanding Guys
tags: busy, call, dating, dating-advice, faith, guys, love, romance770 likesLike
Kelley Armstrong
You were just worried about me."
An exhale, relieved that I had understood. "Yeah"
I turned. "Because you think I'm worth it"
He put his fingers under my chin. "I absolutely think your worth it."
"But you don't think you are."
His mouth opened. Shut.
"That's what this is about, Derek. You won't let us worry about you because you don't think you're worth it. But I do. I absolutely do.
 Kelley Armstrong, The Reckoning
tags: necromancy, romance, young-adult765 likesLike
Julie Kagawa
But ... but what if I hit you?
A snort. Youre not going to hit me.
How do you know? I bristled at his amused tone. I could hit you. Even master swordsmen make mistakes. I could get a lucky shot, or you might not see me coming. I dont want to hurt you.
He favored me with another patient look. And how much experience do you have with swords and weapons in general?
Um. I glanced down at the saber in my hand. Thirty seconds?
He smiled, that calm, irritatingly confident smirk. Youre not going to hit me.
 Julie Kagawa, The Iron Queen
tags: confidence, romance, sword-fight-lesson752 likesLike

Music Quotes
Quotes tagged as "music" Showing 1-30 of 5,184
Friedrich Nietzsche
Without music, life would be a mistake.
 Friedrich Nietzsche, Twilight of the Idols
tags: inspirational, music, philosophy67680 likesLike
Bob Marley
One good thing about music, when it hits you, you feel no pain.
 Bob Marley
tags: music22979 likesLike
Victor Hugo
Music expresses that which cannot be put into words and that which cannot remain silent
 Victor hugo
tags: literature, music, poetry12821 likesLike
Friedrich Nietzsche
And those who were seen dancing were thought to be insane by those who could not hear the music.
 Friedrich Nietzsche
tags: dance, music9148 likesLike
William Shakespeare
This above all: to thine own self be true,
And it must follow, as the night the day,
Thou canst not then be false to any man.
 William Shakespeare, Hamlet
tags: food, love, music7205 likesLike
Paul McCartney
And, in the end
The love you take
is equal to the love you make.
 Paul McCartney, The Beatles Illustrated Lyrics
tags: beatles, inspirational, live, love, music5927 likesLike
William Shakespeare
If music be the food of love, play on,
Give me excess of it; that surfeiting,
The appetite may sicken, and so die.
 William Shakespeare, Twelfth Night
tags: music, romance, unrequited-love5720 likesLike
Bob Marley
None but ourselves can free our minds.
 Bob Marley
tags: bob-marley, inspirational, music, reggae5353 likesLike
People haven't always been there for me but music always has.
 Taylor Swift
tags: music5298 likesLike
Maya Angelou
Music was my refuge. I could crawl into the space between the notes and curl my back to loneliness.
 Maya Angelou
tags: loneliness, music, refuge5291 likesLike
John Green
Some people have lives; some people have music.
 John Green, Will Grayson, Will Grayson
tags: humor, life, music5088 likesLike
Frank Zappa
Without deviation from the norm, progress is not possible.
 Frank Zappa
tags: music, philosophy, progress5018 likesLike
Albert Einstein
If I were not a physicist, I would probably be a musician. I often think in music. I live my daydreams in music. I see my life in terms of music.
 Albert Einstein
tags: music4922 likesLike
Langston Hughes
Life is for the living.
Death is for the dead.
Let life be like music.
And death a note unsaid.
 Langston Hughes, The Collected Poems
tags: death, life, music4906 likesLike
Kurt Vonnegut Jr.
If I should ever die, God forbid, let this be my epitaph:
THE ONLY PROOF HE NEEDED
FOR THE EXISTENCE OF GOD
WAS MUSIC
 kurt vonnegut
tags: blues, god, life, music4122 likesLike
Aldous Huxley
After silence, that which comes nearest to expressing the inexpressible is music.
 Aldous Huxley, Music at Night and Other Essays
tags: music4028 likesLike
Friedrich Nietzsche
We should consider every day lost on which we have not danced at least once.
 Friedrich Wilhelm Nietzsche
tags: dance, dancing, music3832 likesLike
Johann Wolfgang von Goethe
One ought, every day at least, to hear a little song, read a good poem, see a fine picture, and, if it were possible, to speak a few reasonable words.
 Johann Wolfgang von Goethe, Wilhelm Meister's Apprenticeship
tags: art, good-life, music, poetry, self-improvement3809 likesLike
Nicholas Sparks
Life, he realize, was much like a song. In the beginning there is mystery, in the end there is confirmation, but it's in the middle where all the emotion resides to make the whole thing worthwhile.
 Nicholas Sparks, The Last Song
tags: life, love, music, simile, song3791 likesLike
And I thought about how many people have loved those songs. And how many people got through a lot of bad times because of those songs. And how many people enjoyed good times with those songs. And how much those songs really mean. I think it would be great to have written one of those songs. I bet if I wrote one of them, I would be very proud. I hope the people who wrote those songs are happy. I hope they feel it's enough. I really do because they've made me happy. And I'm only one person.
 Stephen Chbosky, The Perks of Being a Wallflower
tags: music, songs3698 likesLike
Victor Hugo
Music expresses that which cannot be said and on which it is impossible to be silent.
 Victor Hugo, William Shakespeare
tags: music3533 likesLike
Nick Hornby
People worry about kids playing with guns, and teenagers watching violent videos; we are scared that some sort of culture of violence will take them over. Nobody worries about kids listening to thousands - literally thousands - of songs about broken hearts and rejection and pain and misery and loss.
 Nick Hornby, High Fidelity
tags: music, sad3420 likesLike
Ah, music," he said, wiping his eyes. "A magic beyond all we do here!
 J.K. Rowling, Harry Potter and the Sorcerer's Stone
tags: dumbledore, magic, music, power-of-music3012 likesLike
Nick Hornby
It's no good pretending that any relationship has a future if your record collections disagree violently or if your favorite films wouldn't even speak to each other if they met at a party.
 Nick Hornby
tags: films, music, relationships3002 likesLike
We are the music makers, and we are the dreamers of dreams.
 Arthur William Edgar O'Shaughnessy, Poems of Arthur O'Shaughnessy
tags: dreams, music2985 likesLike
Albert Schweitzer
There are two means of refuge from the misery of life  music and cats.
 Albert Schweitzer
tags: attributed-no-source, cats, life, music2890 likesLike
Heinrich Heine
Where words leave off, music begins.
 Heinrich Heine
tags: music, power-of-music2820 likesLike
Charles Darwin
If I had my life to live over again, I would have made a rule to read some poetry and listen to some music at least once every week.
 Charles Darwin, The Autobiography of Charles Darwin, 180982
tags: arts, life, music, poetry2785 likesLike
Jack Kerouac
The only truth is music.
 Jack Kerouac
tags: music, truth2633 likesLike
Jonathan Safran Foer
Why do beautiful songs make you sad?' 'Because they aren't true.' 'Never?' 'Nothing is beautiful and true.
 Jonathan Safran Foer, Extremely Loud & Incredibly Close
tags: beauty, music, sadness2510 likesLike

Popular Quotes
Find quotes by keyword, author
PopularRecentNewFriendsMy Authors
Quotes popular among Goodreads members

I'm selfish, impatient and a little insecure. I make mistakes, I am out of control
I'm selfish, impatient and a little insecure. I make mistakes, I am out of control and at times hard to handle. But if you can't handle me at my worst, then you sure as hell don't deserve me at my best.
 Marilyn Monroe
tags: attributed-no-source, best, life, love, mistakes, out-of-control, truth, worst151788 likesLike
Oscar Wilde
Be yourself; everyone else is already taken.
 Oscar Wilde
tags: attributed-no-source, be-yourself, honesty, inspirational, misattributed-oscar-wilde150785 likesLike
Albert Einstein
Two things are infinite: the universe and human stupidity; and I'm not sure about the universe.
 Albert Einstein
tags: attributed-no-source, human-nature, humor, infinity, philosophy, science, stupidity, universe133207 likesLike
Frank Zappa
So many books, so little time.
 Frank Zappa
tags: books, humor129392 likesLike
Bernard M. Baruch
Be who you are and say what you feel, because those who mind don't matter, and those who matter don't mind.
 Bernard M. Baruch
tags: ataraxy, be-yourself, confidence, fitting-in, individuality, misattributed-dr-seuss, those-who-matter121712 likesLike
Marcus Tullius Cicero
A room without books is like a body without a soul.
 Marcus Tullius Cicero
tags: attributed-no-source, books, simile, soul121517 likesLike
William W. Purkey
You've gotta dance like there's nobody watching,
Love like you'll never be hurt,
Sing like there's nobody listening,
And live like it's heaven on earth.
 William W. Purkey
tags: dance, heaven, hurt, inspirational, life, love, sing119555 likesLike
Dr. Seuss
You know you're in love when you can't fall asleep because reality is finally better than your dreams.
 Dr. Seuss
tags: attributed-no-source, dreams, love, reality, sleep116250 likesLike
Mae West
You only live once, but if you do it right, once is enough.
 Mae West
tags: humor, life108986 likesLike
Mahatma Gandhi
Be the change that you wish to see in the world.
 Mahatma Gandhi
tags: action, change, inspirational, philosophy, wish107471 likesLike
Robert Frost
In three words I can sum up everything I've learned about life: it goes on.
 Robert Frost
tags: life101611 likesLike
If you want to know what a man's like, take a good look at how he treats his inferiors, not his equals.
 J.K. Rowling, Harry Potter and the Goblet of Fire
97040 likesLike
Albert Camus
Dont walk in front of me I may not follow
Dont walk behind me I may not lead
Walk beside me just be my friend
 Albert Camus
tags: attributed-no-source, friends, friendship, misattributed-albert-camus86562 likesLike
Eleanor Roosevelt
No one can make you feel inferior without your consent.
 Eleanor Roosevelt, This is My Story
tags: confidence, inspirational, wisdom86464 likesLike
Mark Twain
If you tell the truth, you don't have to remember anything.
 Mark Twain
tags: lies, lying, memory, truth84876 likesLike
Friendship ... is born at the moment when one man says to another What! You
Friendship ... is born at the moment when one man says to another "What! You too? I thought that no one but myself . . .
 C.S. Lewis, The Four Loves
tags: friendship84656 likesLike
Maya Angelou
I've learned that people will forget what you said, people will forget what you did, but people will never forget how you made them feel.
 Maya Angelou
80101 likesLike
Elbert Hubbard
A friend is someone who knows all about you and still loves you.
 Elbert Hubbard
tags: friend, friendship, knowledge, love79093 likesLike
Oscar Wilde
Always forgive your enemies; nothing annoys them so much.
 Oscar Wilde
tags: attributed-no-source, enemies, forgiveness, strategy76136 likesLike
Oscar Wilde
To live is the rarest thing in the world. Most people exist, that is all.
 Oscar Wilde
tags: life74856 likesLike
Mahatma Gandhi
Live as if you were to die tomorrow. Learn as if you were to live forever.
 Mahatma Gandhi
tags: carpe-diem, education, inspirational, learning73412 likesLike
Martin Luther King Jr.
Darkness cannot drive out darkness: only light can do that. Hate cannot drive out hate: only love can do that.
 Martin Luther King Jr., A Testament of Hope: The Essential Writings and Speeches
tags: darkness, drive-out, hate, inspirational, light, love, peace73069 likesLike
Oscar Wilde
I am so clever that sometimes I don't understand a single word of what I am saying.
 Oscar Wilde, The Happy Prince and Other Stories
tags: intelligence, self-deprecation67871 likesLike
Friedrich Nietzsche
Without music, life would be a mistake.
 Friedrich Nietzsche, Twilight of the Idols
tags: inspirational, music, philosophy67680 likesLike
We accept the love we think we deserve.
We accept the love we think we deserve.
 Stephen Chbosky, The Perks of Being a Wallflower
tags: inspirational, love66684 likesLike
Ralph Waldo Emerson
To be yourself in a world that is constantly trying to make you something else is the greatest accomplishment.
 Ralph Waldo Emerson
tags: accomplishment, attributed-no-source, be-yourself, conformity, individuality65678 likesLike
Here's to the crazy ones. The misfits. The rebels. The troublemakers. The round pegs in the square holes. The ones who see things differently. They're not fond of rules. And they have no respect for the status quo. You can quote them, disagree with them, glorify or vilify them. About the only thing you can't do is ignore them. Because they change things. They push the human race forward. And while some may see them as the crazy ones, we see genius. Because the people who are crazy enough to think they can change the world, are the ones who do.
 Rob Siltanen
tags: advertising, apple, change, commercial, computers, different, madness, misattributed-apple, misattributed-steve-jobs, misfits, nonconformity, progressive, rebels, status-quo, think-different, troublemakers65304 likesLike
Insanity is doing the same thing, over and over again, but expecting different results.
 Narcotics Anonymous
tags: humor, insanity, life, misattributed-ben-franklin, misattributed-mark-twain, misattributed-to-einstein61543 likesLike
I believe that everything happens for a reason. People change so that you can learn
I believe that everything happens for a reason. People change so that you can learn to let go, things go wrong so that you appreciate them when they're right, you believe lies so you eventually learn to trust no one but yourself, and sometimes good things fall apart so better things can fall together.
 Marilyn Monroe
tags: attributed-no-source, misattributed-marilyn-monroe59917 likesLike
